le of his early life, but he did not have a good relationship with his family, and disliked living in Nagano despite its natural beauty. He wished to design video games from an early age. 
While working at Human Entertainment, Suda would often listen to the song "Grasshopper" by the UK band Ride (band) while lying down at his desk. This would later influence the name of his company Grasshopper Manufacture, as he named it that to remind himself of what it was like to create his first game. 
Bernard received oaths of fidelity from Ermengard's vassals and the leading men of Narbonne. The text of just one such oath has survived, that of Bernard of Porta Regia, but it refers to several others, now lost. By the marriage contract, he was excluded from the Narbonnese succession. He does not appear in Narbonnese affairs again, and it is probable that the marriage was arranged solely to render Ermengard ineligible for future marriage. 
In 1148, alongside the count of Barcelona, Bernard took part in the Siege of Tortosa, part of the Second Crusade. His brother, Peter of Anduze became the archbishop of Narbonne in 1149. He witnessed the marriage of William VII of Montpellier and Matilda of Burgundy in 1157. 
This is a list of women writers who were born in Russia or whose writings are closely associated with that country. 
The Speaker of the Connecticut House of Representatives is the presiding officer of the Connecticut House of Representatives. 
The sport of association football in the country of Grenada is run by the Grenada Football Association. The association administers the national football team, as well as the Grenada Premier Division. 
He also treated people in intensive care diagnosed with COVID-19, despite lacking personal protective equipment, which increased his personal risk. 
Riaz died on 23 March 2020, from COVID-19 complications at the age of 26. Riaz was the first Pakistani doctor to die from the virus. 
On 27 March 2020, he was posthumously awarded the Nishan-e-Kashmir, the highest award of the state, by Prime Minister of Azad Kashmir for his services. Hafiz Hafeezur Rehman, Chief Minister of Gilgit-Baltistan called his death a "national tragedy". 
This biographical article related to medicine in Pakistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He partnered with Graham Dawbarn and in 1924 they provided the winning design for classroom and administrative structures of Raffles College in Singapore. From 1947 he partnered with son Michael Farey and John J Adams.[citation needed] 
She is married to the American essayist Lance Morrow. They live on a farm in Columbia County, New York. 
This Armstrong County, Pennsylvania state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It combined modern styles with fine craftsmanship and rich materials. During its heyday, it represented luxury, glamour, exuberance, and faith in social and technological progress. 
Lady with Panther by George Barbier for Louis Cartier, 1914. Display card commissioned by Cartier shows a woman in a Paul Poiret gown (1914) 
Other new technologies that were important to Art Deco were new methods in producing plate glass, which was less expensive and allowed much larger and stronger windows, and for mass-producing aluminum, which was used for building and window frames and later, by Corbusier, Warren McArthur, and others, for lightweight furniture. 
Raymond Duchamp-Villon, 1912, La Maison Cubiste (Cubist House) at the Salon d'Automne, 1912, detail of the entrance 
In 1912, the artists of the Section d'Or exhibited works considerably more accessible to the general public than the analytical Cubism of Picasso and Braque. The Cubist vocabulary was poised to attract fashion, furniture and interior designers. 
Cubism's adumbrated geometry became coin of the realm in the 1920s. Art Deco's development of Cubism's selective geometry into a wider array of shapes carried Cubism as a pictorial taxonomy to a much broader audience and wider appeal. (Richard Harrison Martin, Metropolitan Museum of Art)
The exoticism of the Ballets Russes had a strong influence on early Deco. A drawing of the dancer Vaslav Nijinsky by Paris fashion artist Georges Barbier (1913) 
Illustration by Georges Barbier of a gown by Paquin (1914). Stylized floral designs and bright colors were a feature of early Art Deco. 
Lobby of 450 Sutter Street, San Francisco, California, by Timothy Pflueger (1929), inspired by ancient Maya art 
The gilded bronze Prometheus at Rockefeller Center, New York City, N.Y., by Paul Manship (1934), a stylized Art Deco update of classical sculpture (1936) 
A ceramic vase inspired by motifs of traditional African carved wood sculpture, by Emile Lenoble (1937), Museum of Decorative Arts, Paris 
Glass Salon (Le salon de verre) designed by Paul Ruaud with furniture by Eileen Gray, for Madame Mathieu-Levy (milliner of the boutique J. Suzanne Talbot), 9, rue de Lota, Paris, 1922 (published in L'Illustration, 27 May 1933) 
By the 1930s, the style had been somewhat simplified, but it was still extravagant. In 1932 the decorator Paul Ruoud made the Glass Salon for Suzanne Talbot. It featured a serpentine armchair and two tubular armchairs by Eileen Gray, a floor of mat silvered glass slabs, a panel of abstract patterns in silver and black lacquer, and an assortment of animal skins. 
Postcard of the International Exhibition of Modern Decorative and Industrial Arts in Paris, France (1925) 
Crown of the General Electric Building (also known as 570 Lexington Avenue), New York City, by Cross & Cross (1933) 
Stairway of the Economic and Social Council in Paris, originally the Museum of Public Works, built for the 1937 Paris International Exposition, by Auguste Perret (1937) 
High School in King City, California, built by Robert Stanton for the Works Progress Administration (1939) 
Detail of Time, ceiling mural in lobby of Rockefeller Center (New York City, N.Y.), by the Spanish painter Josep Maria Sert (1941) 
Workers sorting the mail, a mural in the Ariel Rios Federal Building, Washington, D.C, by Reginald Marsh (1936) 
Art in the Tropics, mural in the William Jefferson Clinton Federal Building, Washington, D.C., by Rockwell Kent (1938) 
Aluminum statue of Ceres by John Storrs atop the Chicago Board of Trade Building, Chicago, Illinois (1930) 
The gilded bronze Prometheus at the Rockefeller Center (New York City, N.Y.), by Paul Manship (1934), a stylized Art Deco update of classical sculpture (1936) 
Man Controlling Trade by Michael Lantz at the Federal Trade Commission building, Washington, D.C. (1942) 
Mail Delivery East, by Edmond Amateis, one of four bas-relief sculptures on the Nix Federal Building, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania (1937) 
Ralph Stackpole's sculpture group over the door of the San Francisco Stock Exchange, San Francisco, California (1930) 
Public art deco sculpture was almost always representational, usually of heroic or allegorical figures related to the purpose of the building or room. The themes were usually selected by the patrons, not the artist. Abstract sculpture for decoration was extremely rare. 
In the United States, the most prominent Art Deco sculptor for public art was Paul Manship, who updated classical and mythological subjects and themes in an Art Deco style. His most famous work was the statue of Prometheus at Rockefeller Center in New York City, a 20th-century adaptation of a classical subject. Other important works for Rockefeller Center were made by Lee Lawrie, including the sculptural facade and the Atlas statue. 
In Britain, Deco public statuary was made by Eric Gill for the BBC Broadcasting House, while Ronald Atkinson decorated the lobby of the former Daily Express Building in London (1932). 
One of the best known and certainly the largest public Art Deco sculpture is the Christ the Redeemer by the French sculptor Paul Landowski, completed between 1922 and 1931, located on a mountain top overlooking Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. 
The Flight of Europa, bronze with gold leaf, by Paul Manship (1925) (Whitney Museum of American Art, New York City, N.Y.) 
Many early Art Deco sculptures were small, designed to decorate salons. One genre of this sculpture was called the Chryselephantine statuette, named for a style of ancient Greek temple statues made of gold and ivory. They were sometimes made of bronze, or sometimes with much more lavish materials, such as ivory, onyx, alabaster, and gold leaf. 
Pierre Le Paguays was a prominent Art Deco studio sculptor, whose work was shown at the 1925 Exposition. He worked with bronze, marble, ivory, onyx, gold, alabaster and other precious materials. 
In the 1930s a new genre of posters appeared in the United States during the Great Depression. The Federal Art Project hired American artists to create posters to promote tourism and cultural events. 
The ASIROM Building on Bulevardul Carol I in Bucharest, by Ion Ionescu, with a few small Egyptian Revival ornaments (1930s) 
The Art Deco style was not limited to buildings on land; the ocean liner SS Normandie, whose first voyage was in 1935, featured Art Deco design, including a dining room whose ceiling and decoration were made of glass by Lalique. 
Ceiling and chandelier detail on the lobby of the Carew Tower in Cincinnati, Ohio, by Walter W. Ahlschlager (1930) 
The Marine Air Terminal at La Guardia Airport (1937) was New York City's terminal for the flights of Pan Am Clipper flying boats to Europe 
Streamline Moderne church, First Church of Deliverance in Chicago, Illinois, by Walter T. Bailey (1939). Towers added in 1948. 
The Waterfall style was popular in the 1930s and 1940s, the most prevalent Art Deco form of furniture at the time. Pieces were typically of plywood finished with blond veneer and with rounded edges, resembling a waterfall. 
New industrial materials began to influence the design of cars and household objects. These included aluminum, chrome, and bakelite, an early form of plastic. Bakelite could be easily molded into different forms, and soon was used in telephones, radios and other appliances. 
The use of the style was greatly enhanced by the introduction of the pochoir stencil-based printing system, which allowed designers to achieve crispness of lines and very vivid colors. Art Deco forms appeared in the clothing of Paul Poiret, Charles Worth and Jean Patou. After World War I, exports of clothing and fabrics became one of the most important currency earners of France. 
Late Art Deco wallpaper and textiles sometimes featured stylized industrial scenes, cityscapes, locomotives and other modern themes, as well as stylized female figures, metallic colors and geometric designs. 
Mackay Emerald Necklace, emerald, diamond and platinum, by Cartier (1930) (Smithsonian National Museum of Natural History, USA) 
Jewelry became much more colorful and varied in style. Cartier and the firm of Boucheron combined diamonds with colorful other gemstones cut into the form of leaves, fruit or flowers, to make brooches, rings, earrings, clips and pendants. Far Eastern themes also became popular; plaques of jade and coral were combined with platinum and diamonds, and vanity cases, cigarette cases and powder boxes were decorated with Japanese and Chinese landscapes made with mother of pearl, enamel and lacquer. 
Other notable Art Deco glass manufacturers included Marius-Ernest Sabino, who specialized in figurines, vases, bowls, and glass sculptures of fish, nudes, and animals. For these he often used an opalescent glass which could change from white to blue to amber, depending upon the light. His vases and bowls featured molded friezes of animals, nudes or busts of women with fruit or flowers. His work was less subtle but more colorful than that of Lalique. 
Amiens Cathedral has a rare example of Art Deco stained glass windows in the Chapel of the Sacred Heart, made in 1932-34 by the Paris glass artist Jean Gaudin based on drawings by Jacques Le Breton. 
A grill with two wings called The Pheasants, made by Paul Kiss and displayed at the 1925 Exposition of Decorative and Industrial Arts 
Art Deco visuals and imagery was used in multiple animated films including Batman, Night Hood, All's Fair at the Fair, Merry Mannequins, Page Miss Glory, Fantasia and Sleeping Beauty. 
Art Deco architecture began in Europe, but by 1939 there were examples in large cities on every continent and in almost every country. This is a selection of prominent buildings on each continent. (For a comprehensive of existing buildings by country, see List of Art Deco architecture.) 
Most Art Deco buildings in Africa were built during European colonial rule, and often designed by Italian, French and Portuguese architects. 
Many Art Deco buildings in Asia were designed by European architects. But in the Philippines, local architects such as Juan Nakpil, Juan Arellano and others were preeminent. Many Art Deco landmarks in Asia were demolished during the great economic expansion of Asia the late 20th century, but some notable enclaves of the architecture still remain, particularly in Shanghai and Mumbai. 
1931 Art Deco facade of the Castlemaine Art Museum, architect Percy Meldrum, H. Orlando Dutton frieze, photographed in 2017 
Melbourne and Sydney, Australia, have several notable Art Deco buildings, including the Manchester Unity Building and the former Russell Street Police Headquarters in Melbourne, the Castlemaine Art Museum in Castlemaine, central Victoria and the Grace Building, AWA Tower and Anzac Memorial in Sydney. 
Several towns in New Zealand, including Napier and Hastings were rebuilt in Art Deco style after the 1931 Hawke's Bay earthquake, and many of the buildings have been protected and restored. Napier has been nominated for UNESCO World Heritage Site status, the first cultural site in New Zealand to be nominated. Wellington has retained a sizeable number of Art Deco buildings. 
In Canada, surviving Art Deco structures are mainly in the major cities; Montreal, Toronto, Hamilton, Ontario, and Vancouver. They range from public buildings like Vancouver City Hall to commercial buildings (College Park) to public works (R. C. Harris Water Treatment Plant). 
In Mexico, the most imposing Art Deco example is interior of the Palacio de Bellas Artes (Palace of Fine Arts), finished in 1934 with its elaborate decor and murals. Examples of Art Deco residential architecture can be found in the Condesa neighborhood, many designed by Francisco J. Serrano. 
During the 1930s, Art Deco had a noticeable effect on house design in the United Kingdom, as well as the design of various public buildings. Straight, white-rendered house frontages rising to flat roofs, sharply geometric door surrounds and tall windows, as well as convex-curved metal corner windows, were all characteristic of that period. 
The London Underground is famous for many examples of Art Deco architecture, and there are a number of buildings in the style situated along the Golden Mile in Brentford. Also in West London is the Hoover Building, which was originally built for The Hoover Company and was converted into a superstore in the early 1990s. 
The Bucharest Telephone Palace on Victory Avenue in Bucharest, Romania, qualified as a monument istoric (Romanian for historic monument) 
The U-Drop Inn, a roadside gas station and diner on U.S. Highway 66 in Shamrock, Texas (1936), now a historical monument 
Municipal Auditorium of Kansas City, Missouri: Hoit Price & Barnes, and Gentry, Voskamp & Neville, 1935 
Niagara Mohawk Building, Syracuse, New York. Melvin L. King and Bley & Lyman, architects, completed 1932 
Former Teatro Eden, now Aparthotel Vip Eden in Lisbon, Portugal: Cassiano Branco and Carlo Florencio Dias, 1931 
Rotunda ceiling of Union Terminal in Cincinnati, Ohio; Paul Philippe Cret, Alfred T. Fellheimer, Steward Wagner, Roland Wank, 1933 
Spirano borders the following municipalities: Brignano Gera d'Adda, Cologno al Serio, Comun Nuovo, Lurano, Pognano, Urgnano, Verdello. 
The first inhabitants of the area were some Ligurian tribes which were succeeded by the Cenoman Gauls. 
The Lombard domination guaranteed a new tranquility and prosperity, which continued with the Franks and the Holy Roman Empire. The latter established feudalism, putting the municipal territories under the bishop's control. 
During Middle Ages, Spirano was at the center of fratricidal disputes between Guelphs and Ghibellines with clashes that led to tragic results, as in 1312 when the village was plundered and devastated. 
A castle was built during the XIII century, that characterized the life of the village for a long time; it had defensive functions and it was the residence of the Suardi family, who managed the fate of the town for several years. Subsequently, they were abolished in favour of the Visconti of Milan, until the whole area passed to the Republic of Venice in 1428.  
The Serenissima carried out numerous interventions aimed at improving social and working conditions, tilling land and building irrigation canals. Among these, there was the Bergamasque ditch, mainly used to establish definitively the territorial boundaries of the land state of Venice with the Duchy of Milan. This also touched the territory of Spirano, delimiting it to the South. 
Since then, the town has maintained a strong rural connotation and tradition, with agriculture and livestock farming predominanting. However, in these years, the country, which was located near the border with the territories of Milan, had to suffer raids of neighbors, intending to take back these territories. Some quiet time occurred with the advent of the Austrian domination which was replaced by the Kingdom of Italy in 1859. 
During the XX century, the country has seen a significant demographic growth, and also a substantial change in working life: agriculture was replaced by industry and the tertiary sector, relegating work in the fields to a minority. 
According to some sources, Asperianum was the ancient name of the settlement, and it probably indicated a harsh, disastrous, inaccessible place, or rather from the town of the Asperij. The name Asperianum is also reported on the ancient coat of arms of the town represented as carved in stone. 
The term could be of Celtic origin, in fact it has some characteristics in common with many names with Celtic form in the ac ending that in ancient times preceded most of the names ending with anum. 
The first documented attestation of the ancient name of Spirano, dates back to July 1033 and is a deed of sale. In this document, the territory is called Asperiano. In March 1395, on the other hand, in a document concerning the definition of a portion of the border with some neighboring countries, the name Spirano appears. 
The most important religious building is the parish church of San Gervasio and Protasio, of which we have news from the 13th century. 
On 9 February 1776 the bishop Marco Molin elevated the church to a provost. Since 1734 the existence of a vicariate headed by the church of Spirano is attested. At the beginning of the nineteenth century the faithful of Spirano were 1460, rising to 1976 in 1861. The new high altar was consecrated in 1954 by the bishop Giuseppe Piazzi. In 1971 the parish of Spirano passed to the pastoral area XVII, only to be aggregated in 1979 to the new vicariate of Spirano-Verdello. 
The characterizing elements of the interior of this church are certainly the altars: the high altar, the altar of the Madonna del Patrocinio, the altar of San Sebastiano, the altar of Sant'Anna and the altar of the Addolorata. Another fundamental element of this church is the organ which with the passage of time was replaced and renovated several times. 
The bell tower of the church was considered unsafe for several centuries until the beginning of the renovations, that was completed in 1681. 
On the occasion of the reconstruction of the entire arrangement of the bells in 1772, a new and more robust wooden structure was built to support the complex of bells. Eleven years later the concert was recast and a new element was added. 
In 1845 other restoration works began on the wooden structure in support of the concert as it was ruined and unsafe but the problem was not solved, in fact, the precariousness of the structure reappeared and the building had to be rebuilt from scratch. The structure of the bell tower received its final layout in the second half of the 19th century. 
The rural chapel of the Morti dell'Arca is located on the border between Spirano and Cologno al Serio, near the Fontanili del Consacolo, and dates back to the first half of the 19th century. 
The popular tradition has developed a legend around this small church and it tells of a stone ark that was used as a burial in ancient times. After a period of neglect, the ark was found by a farmer who took it to his home with the intention of using it as a drinking trough for his animals. However, the ark mysteriously returned to its place of origin. The farmer tried unsuccessfully several times to take the ark with him. 
The church was built after the plague that hit the citizens of the town, whose victims were buried in the area where the church currently stands. 
The first evidence of the church dates back to 1646 following the pastoral visit of Bishop Grimani, in which he stated that the church should remained closed for the whole year except during the saint's feast, in which it was possible to celebrate the mass inside the building. The church was visited again in 1659 by the bishop of Bergamo Barbarigo who found it without any parameters; idea shared also by Bishop Giustiniani in 1667. 
The first plan of the building was in the shape of a T and the main altar was located in the center of the transept perpendicular to the main nave. On the altar there was an altarpiece depicting the Virgin Mary, San Rocco and San Sebastiano dating back to the 1930s; otherwise the church was bare, except for a small organ. In 1794 a bell was placed inside the bell tower bearing the image of San Rocco, San Sebastiano, a crucifixion and the date A.D. 1794. 
At the end of the 1800s a new epidemic, smallpox, struck the area and the church of San Rocco was reduced to a hospital. 
In 1839, the church was restored. In 1855 the reconstruction works began but before 1858 they were suspended for some time until it was completed in 1867. The new church was built in the form of a Greek cross with two altars: a main altar and a side altar devoted to St. Joseph. In the first papers of the new church, the portico and the double sloping roof are not represented, probably because they were built later. 
The land on which the church was built, was owned by the Municipality of Spirano since the 1930s. However, during a council meeting on May 31 1864, it was approved the free transfer of the building to the Parish Church of Spirano. 
Currently the church is surrounded by a large equipped recreational area and by the San Rocco fountain immersed in wooded strips; it is also a destination for pilgrimages. 
In some papers of 1500, it is reported the presence of a place near the church destined for the burial of corpses. Several dead bodies were buried in this area until the early 1800s, a period in which, following the Napoleonic edict of Saint-Cloud of 12 June 1804, the construction of the Campo Santo was arranged outside the town. Consequently, the names old cemetery and new cemetery were applied in order to distinguish them. 
The new Campo Santo was built along the road leading to Cologno al Serio. On 29 October 1809, it was blessed by the parish priest Angelo Allegreni delegated by the bishop Paolo Dolfin and the first body was buried a few months later. 
In the beginning, the cemetery was simply a fairly bare and fenced piece of land; only a year after its opening, the first noble funeral chapel was built, the one of the Adelasio family. 
Since its opening, all the corpses have been buried in the new cemetery (except for rare exceptions concerning clergymen); for this reason, in 1842 it was enlarged for the first time. 
The Civic Center borders on another important structure, the Stallazzo, which is composed of a courtyard surrounded by structures that once housed the stables and residences of the settlers of the MIA (Misericordia Maggiore di Bergamo) while it is currently used as a residential building public. 
The oldest structures in the Stallazzo dates back to the 14th century. In the 17th century it reached its current size but after a fire in the 19th century, the structure was rearranged and the spaces were reorganized. The Stallazzo was then completely renovated in 2003, becoming the seat of public housing. 
Before taking its current name, in 1813, the church of the Madonna del Carmine was known as the cemetery chapel of San Fermo and San Pantaleone. From 1813, the building was limited to keep the best possible conditions, however, in 1868 the state of conservation of the church became worrying; for this reason, the restoration work began the same year. 
After about ten years of neglect, in 1988 the work for the rehabilitation and restoration of the external part of the building began, which ended the following year. 
This article on a location in the Province of Bergamo is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2014, she won the 31st All-Japan Ninja Championship Tournament. In 2016, she finished the Yokohama Marathon in five hours. 
The Guardian Medal  or Department of Transportation Guardian Medal is an award of the United States Department of Transportation which was established by Secretary of Transportation Norman Y. Mineta following the terrorist attacks on September 11, 2001. 
Mandy Marchak (born November 24, 1984) is a Canadian rugby footballer. She represented Canada at three rugby union World Cups in 2006, 2010 and 2014 and at rugby league in 2017 World Cup. She also played in two Sevens World Cups in 2009 and 2013. 
Marchak retired from rugby union in 2016 due to injury. She then took up rugby league and was selected to represent the Canada Ravens at the 2017 Women's Rugby League World Cup. 
Do That In Real Life? is a radio drama, produced by the ZBS Foundation. It is the fifteenth of the Jack Flanders adventure series and the third of the Travelling Jack sub-series. It combines elements of Old-time radio with psychic phenomena, supernatural beings and energies. 
Jack is having a nightmare of being chased by a zombie when Mojo calls. Mojo's playing piano at Frenchie's in New Orleans and needs Jack to help him with some real life zombie problems in the city. Almost immediately after his arrival in New Orleans, Jack draws the attention of a shape-shifting voodoo princess who may in fact be something even more dangerous from his past! Dealing with Dominique and a wandering zombie are the least of his worries. 
There are a number of references to Jack's prior relationship with an Infrit, Layla Oolupi. Sophia, or the entity who entered her, knows many of the details of Jack's adventures in Morocco and claims to be someone that Jack loved and then abandoned, breaking her heart in the process. Mojo asks Madame Ebbo, who describes the being in such a way that Jack clearly identifies it as Layla but Madame Ebbo disagrees that it is her and suggests it's a rival Infrit, jealous of Layla. 
This story contains an aside in which Dominique tells the tale of Le Petit Lafitte, later given a cd release of its own with three more stories. 
Madame Ebbo: "Do you have another question?" Jack: "You know, I'd love to get an answer to the first one!"  
Every Travelling Jack adventure begins with a phone call from Mojo, asking for Jack's help. Usually the call wakes Jack up. During the call, Mojo drops more and more hints as to where in the world he is. None of the adventures involve the Invisible Realms, as such. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1890s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The G500 was taxiing under its own power at its unveiling on October 14, 2014, and it first flew on May 18, 2015. The model was initially planned to be certified in 2017. In May 2017, the test fleet of four G500 prototypes and the first production aircraft, made over 745 flights in two years for 2,900 flight hours, on track for the certification by the end of the year. 
For the October 2017 NBAA show, the five G500s were completing their campaign with 995 flights and 3,690 h - 10 h 19 min for the longest - the first delivery schedule was maintained as certification was pushed until early 2018. Mach 0.85 range for the G500 was extended by 200 nmi to 5,200 nmi/9,630 km and by 600 nmi/1,111 km to 4,400 nmi/8,149 km at Mach 0.90. 
The 300 flights hours of function and reliability testing required for FAA type certification was to be completed in summer 2018 after 240 were done at the end of May 2018 covering 100,300 nmi in 69 flights, along known icing flight and high-elevation certification tests: the five flight-test G500s made 1,355 flights in 4,955 hours. 
The first G500 was delivered on September 27, 2018. On October 1, Gulfstream announced the acquisition of the nacelle manufacturing line from Nordam. 
The longer G600 had its first flight at Savannah-Hilton Head International Airport on December 17, 2016. Four flight-test aircraft and a production G600 will be used for the test program for a scheduled 2018 introduction: 
In August 2017, the fifth was being outfitted for its third quarter first flight. Through August 20, the four G600s have logged 780 h in 175 flights, the longest lasting 13 h 5 min, it completed testing for initial flight envelope expansion and flying qualities, flutter, brakes, low speed or stall, loads calibration, parameter identification and climb performance, the fifth test aircraft will fly later in the quarter. 
On June 28, 2019, Gulfstream announced the G600 type and production certificates from the FAA. The first G600 was delivered on August 8, 2019. The first EASA-certified G600 was delivered in December 2020 to an Austrian operator. 
On October 4, 2021, Gulfstream introduced the 4,200 nmi (7,780 km) range G400, powered by Pratt & Whitney PW812GA engines and to be delivered from 2025. Priced at $34.5 million, The G400 has a shortened G500 fuselage, with 2.5 zones and 10 Windows, instead of 3 zones and 14 windows. 
The airframe is primarily composed of high-strength aluminum alloys with limited use of steel and titanium alloys. The horizontal stabilizer, fairings, main landing gear doors, rudder and elevators, radome, rear pressure bulkhead and winglets are composite materials. The semi-monocoque fuselage structure is made of stressed skin, frame and longeron. 
The Mont-Tremblant Champ Car Grand Prix was an auto race in the Champ Car World Series. It was held at Circuit Mont-Tremblant, in Mont-Tremblant, Quebec, Canada. 
The race replaced the Grand Prix of Montreal in the Champ Car circuit, and was held in a rural zone north of Montreal. The circuit had previously held a number of significant open-wheel championship events: USAC IndyCar races in 1967 and 1968, before the establishment of the Champ Car Grand Prix; the Sports Car Club of America's Formula 5000 championship held events in 1969 and 1970; and the track held the Formula One Canadian Grand Prix in 1968 and 1970. 
He is a member of the board of directors of the Groupe Danone and Sofina, director and member of the audit committee of the Delhaize Group, and SES. 
This business-related Belgian biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Someone Loves You Honey is a studio album by American country music artist Charley Pride. It was released in November 1978 via RCA Victor Records and contained 11 tracks. The album was co-produced by Jerry Bradley and Pride. Two of Pride's major hits were included on the studio record: "More to Me" and the title track. Both songs became number one hits. The album itself would also reach charting positions following its release. 
The 2019 Hall of Fame Open was a men's tennis tournament to be played on outdoor grass courts. It was the 44th edition of the event, and part of the 250 series of the 2019 ATP Tour. It took place at the International Tennis Hall of Fame in Newport, Rhode Island, United States, from July 15 through July 21, 2019. 
He was a graduate of B.M.C. Durfee High School in Fall River. A 1958 graduate of Harvard College, he was well known for writing the scores for several Hasty Pudding shows there. He was also a graduate of L'Ecole Normale de Musique in Paris, where he studied with Nadia Boulanger. 
Raposo was the musical supervisor and arranger of the original off-Broadway run of You're a Good Man, Charlie Brown, and he contributed additional music to that show. He was also responsible for the memorable theme music for New York City television station WABC-TV's The 4:30 Movie; the piece, called "Moving Pictures," was also used for the station's other movie shows, and subsequently by ABC's other owned-and-operated stations. 
Aside from his musical contributions, Raposo performed several uncredited stock characters on Sesame Street during the early 1970s. According to his son Nicholas in a 2002 telephone conversation, Joe Raposo usually chose to portray anonymous, silly characters in these segments, which were nearly always produced on 16 mm film. He also did voice-overs for a few animated segments. 
The Sesame Street character Don Music maintained a framed and autographed glamour photograph of Raposo on the wall of his Muppet atelier. 
Raposo was very fond of sweets according to many who knew him. One favorite food of his was cookies. It has been rumored the Wheel-Eating Monster created for commercial advertisers in the 1960s by Jim Henson may have been altered by Henson specifically into a "cookie" monster after Henson observed Raposo's unusual propensity for cookies; this has never been substantiated. His widow Pat Collins-Sarnoff celebrated his life with a milk and cookies reception. 
One of Raposo's Sesame Street compositions, "The Square Song", was used in the film Close Encounters of the Third Kind. 
In 1971, Children's Television Workshop created the show The Electric Company, meant to help teach reading to children who had outgrown Sesame Street. Raposo served as the musical director of the show for its first three seasons, and contributed songs throughout the show's run, until 1977. 
The HBO animated adaptation of Madeline, for which Raposo composed the music and songs (with writer/lyricist Judy Rothman), aired four months after Raposo's death; the cartoon The Smoggies, for which Raposo wrote the theme song, premiered in Canada. 
Although primarily known for work in live-action and animated children's television, Joe Raposo actually aspired to become a Broadway musical composer. 
In 1962, he set Eric Bentley's English-language translation of song texts and poems in Bertolt Brecht's play A Man's a Man at the Loeb Drama Center (in Cambridge, Massachusetts) and the Masque Theatre (New York City). Portions of the production were subsequently shown on CBS-TV, and the entire production (dialogue, songs, and all) was recorded and released on the Spoken Arts label as Spoken Arts SA 870 (1974). 
In the 1970s, Raposo wrote original music for the animated film Raggedy Ann & Andy: A Musical Adventure; he later teamed with William Gibson (The Miracle Worker) to create a stage musical about Raggedy Ann. The musical was the first theatre company production from the United States to perform in the Soviet Union upon resumption of cultural relations between the two countries. It later had a brief run on Broadway in 1986. 
Raposo also collaborated with Sheldon Harnick (Fiddler on the Roof) on a musical adaptation of the 1946 film It's a Wonderful Life. A Wonderful Life was first performed at the University of Michigan in 1986, and had a successful run at Washington, DC's Arena Stage in 1991. It was performed in concert on Broadway for one night only on December 12, 2005; the production starred Brian Stokes Mitchell, David Hyde Pierce, and Judy Kuhn. 
During his career Raposo composed themes for several sitcoms such as Ivan The Terrible, Three's Company, The Ropers and Foot in the Door, film scores such as The Possession of Joel Delaney (1972), Savages (1972) and Maurie (1973), and documentaries, most notably Peter Rosen's production America Is for which Raposo not only scored a patriotic, critically well-received title theme but, unusually, served as its on-screen narrator. 
Raposo's songwriting tended toward wistful introspections on life and nature. Primarily celebrated for his bright, uptempo major key compositions, he also showed skill at arranging original blues and jazz pieces in minor key and often took sudden melancholy lyrical detours in the midst of otherwise cheerful songs. 
Vocally, Joe Raposo was a tenor, possessing an unusually warm, buttery attack and an easily identifiable, very stable, mellow trademark vibrato. 
Raposo was married twice. He had two sons, Joseph and Nicholas, from his first marriage. He had a son, Andrew, and daughter, Elizabeth (Liz), from his marriage to Pat Collins-Sarnoff. 
Raposo was a close friend of Frank Sinatra, Tom Lehrer, WNYC radio personality Jonathan Schwartz, and Academy Award-winning filmmaker Bert Salzman. 
Raposo died on February 5, 1989 in Bronxville, New York of non-Hodgkin lymphoma, three days before his 52nd birthday. He was survived by wife, Pat Collins, his four children and by his parents who were at the time living in Chatham, Massachusetts. His grave is located at Union Cemetery in Chatham. 
Raposo was eulogized in the April 1990 documentary Sing! Sesame Street Remembers Joe Raposo and His Music, which was hosted and directed by Sesame Street crew member Jon Stone. A tribute CD was released in 1992 commemorating his work on Sesame Street. 
Along with five Grammy Awards and Emmy nods, his song "The First Time It Happens," from The Great Muppet Caper, was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Original Song in 1981, losing to "Arthur's Theme (Best That You Can Do)" from the film Arthur. 
The Lake Trenche is located in the unorganized territory of Lac-Ashuapmushuan, in Haute-Mauricie, in Le Domaine-du-Roy Regional County Municipality, in the administrative region of Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean, in Quebec, in Canada. This lake is located entirely in forest land. 
This lake is a natural extension of the river Trenche which flows from north to south, and empties into the Lake Tourouvre formed by the Dam Trenche the Saint-Maurice River. Located entirely in forest areas, the surface of "Trenche Lake" is frozen from November until early April. 
Trenche the lake is very deformed, consisting of islands, peninsulas, natural piers jutting out into the lake and numerous bays. Its shape resembles a "Y" formed by a series of smaller lakes, as if they had been created by the fall of meteorites. The Trenche lake fed by the north into two parts: the branch of the northwest and the northeast branch (the most important). The latter is an extension of the River Trenche (La Tuque), flowing from north to south. 
Visitors can access to the "lake Trenche" by forest paths of Consolidated Bathurst, which roughly follow the path of the River Trenche, one of the five largest tributaries of the Saint-Maurice River. 
Upon her election in 1962, she became the first woman to be elected to a constitutional office in Arkansas. 
Nancy Pearl Johnson was born on October 5, 1904 in Prescott, Arkansas to George Sim Johnson and Minnie Bryan Johnson. From the age of 6 she lived in Little Rock, Arkansas and attended Little Rock Public Schools. Her early career included work as staff for the Arkansas Legislative Council and Arkansas Commissioner of State Lands. Johnson married Claris G. "Crip" Hall on October 5, 1929, and had one daughter. When Crip became Arkansas Secretary of State in 1936 Nancy Hall joined his staff. 
Hall was elected State Treasurer in 1962, and became the first woman elected to constitutional office in Arkansas, and the second woman to win a statewide election after Senator Hattie Wyatt Caraway. As Treasurer, Hall oversaw the automation and computerization of state accounting procedures. 
Hall did not run for reelection in 1980. After serving for 18 years and 9 terms, Hall left office in 1981 and was succeeded by Jimmie Lou Fisher. Hall died on January 1, 1991 at age 86. 
The Boucher Manufacturing Company was an American toy company that specialized in toy boats and toy trains. It is best remembered today as the last manufacturer of Standard Gauge/Wide gauge toy trains until the much smaller McCoy Manufacturing revived the old standard in the mid-1960s. 
Finland competed at the 1928 Winter Olympics in St. Moritz, Switzerland.  Finland took home 4 medals, all in speed skating.  These were won by Clas Thunberg, Julius Skutnabb, and Jaakko Friman.  Finland also took second place in the Military Patrol, at that time classed as a demonstration event with no medals. 
The ski jumping (normal hill) event was held separate from the main medal event of ski jumping, results can be found in the table below. 
He joined Jeonnam Dragons in 2012. He made his first appearance at opening match of K-League 2012 against Gangwon FC. 
This biographical article related to a South Korean association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Warhammer Campaign is a set of two adventures published by Games Workshop (GW) in 1988 for the fantasy role-playing game Warhammer Fantasy Roleplay. 
The two adventures, both designed by Jim Bambra, Phil Gallagher, and Graeme Davis, would become the first two parts of the six-part The Enemy Within Campaign, followed by Death on the Reik (1987), Power Behind the Throne (1988), Something Rotten in Kislev (1989), and Empire in Flames (1989). 
In Issue 8 of The Games Machine, John Woods found the book to be well-produced and easy to follow, and he liked the short introductory scenario "Mistaken Identity", calling it "entertaining and clearly written to make the referee's job easier." But he had mixed feelings overall, saying, "the linearity of plot makes life very difficult for a referee whose players try to tackle problems in unusual ways and come up with angles the designers haven't thought of." 
In the past, Woodlands Memorial Ground was shared by Blackpool Rugby League Club and Fleetwood Town FC (training). 
Fylde Rugby Club was founded on 25 July 1919, literally on the toss of a coin when a group of Huddersfield businessmen met at Ansdell Institute to discuss the formation of either a rugby union or a football club. A coin was tossed and it fell in favour of rugby union. Hence the similarity in kit between clubs. The club grew steadily and achieved a strong fixture list by the 1960s and has been in the National Leagues since the league's inception in 1987. 
It takes its name from The Fylde, a roughly 13-mile (20-kilometre) square-shaped peninsula, bounded by Morecambe Bay to the north, the Ribble estuary to the south, the Irish Sea to the west, and the Bowland hills to the east, with Blackpool to the north and Preston to the east. 
During the World War II, Fylde, along with many other clubs, had to close as the Army took over the ground. In 1946 the President, G.W. Parkes, welcomed back members from the war and by this time the ground had been purchased and named the Woodlands Memorial Ground in recognition of those members who gave their lives during the war. 
In the 1950s, the dressing rooms were built and Pop Ogden was elected President of Lancashire. Arthur Bell and Rothwell Bamber were given life memberships for their work with the club. Bell served for 34 years as the Honorary Secretary. 
In 1964 the second England trial was held at Fylde and Sir Laurie Edwards opened the new pavilion extension and presented the club with a rugby union shield which is still on the clubhouse wall. 
In the same era, a young Roger Uttley, subsequently to skipper and then manage England, and Brian Ashton, England's Head Coach, also played for Fylde. Other more recent internationals associated with Fylde include England wingers Tony Swift and Simon Smith, who were capped in the 1980s after leaving the club and locks Steve Bainbridge and Wade Dooley, established internationals who won further caps whilst with Fylde. 
England 'A' winger Mark Preston had a record of scoring 98 tries in 131 appearances. He subsequently made a similar impact in rugby league with Wigan and Halifax. 
The club fields eleven mini/junior sides, a Junior Colts squad and three other senior teams, the Hawks, the Saracens and the Vandals. In more recent seasons the club has also promoted more community rugby teams to promote rugby across all ages and abilities such as walking rugby. It further has a flourishing community rugby set up to promote, encourage and develop rugby in the surrounding community especially in the more disadvantaged areas at both junior and senior level.  
Apart from a new clubhouse completed in September 2005, the club has developed an all weather pitch, upgraded facilities and non-rugby items and activities forming a core to the local and regional community.  
In June 2010, it was  announced that former England manager Brian Ashton would be a coaching consultant for his former club. On the 26 July 2010, it was announced that former England international Jason Robinson would be making his comeback at the club. 
Hooghly was a full-rigged merchant ship built on the Thames, England, and launched in 1819. She made two voyages under charter to the British East India Company (EIC), four voyages transporting convicts from England and Ireland to Australia, as well as voyages transporting emigrants to South Australia between 1839 and 1856. Around 1858 she was re-rigged as a barque. She sank off Algiers in 1863. 
Captain James Thomas Lamb sailed from the Downs on 27 May 1819, bound for Bengal. Hooghly then reached Calcutta on 23 September. Homeward bound, she passed Kedgeree on 1 January 1820. She then reached the Cape of Good Hope on 3 March and St Helena on 5 April, before arriving back at the Downs on 30 May. 
Under the command of Peter Reeves and surgeon Robert Tainsh, she left Cork, Ireland on 5 January 1825, arriving in Sydney, New South Wales on 22 April. She embarked 195 male convicts, of whom two died en route. Hooghly departed Port Jackson on 21 May bound for Bombay. 
On her second convict voyage under the command of Peter Reeves and surgeon Alexander Nisbet, she left London, England on 5 November 1827, arriving in Sydney on 24 February 1828. She embarked 99 male convicts, all of whom arrived. Hooghly departed Port Jackson on 4 April, bound for Batavia. 
Hooghly arrived in Clarence, off Garden Island, Western Australia on 13 February 1830, bringing 173 settlers to the Swan River Colony. She was one of three ships that Thomas Peel had chartered to deliver 400 settlers. The other two vessels were  Gilmore and Rockingham. 
Gilmore, the first to leave, had arrived on 15 December 1829 in the Swan River Colony with Thomas Peel and 182 settlers in all. Rockingham (180 passengers), arrived in mid-May 1830. She was wrecked shortly after landing her passengers, but all survived. 
Her next convict voyage was under the command of Peter John Reeves and surgeon James Ellis. Hooghly left Cork, Ireland on 24 June 1831 and arrived in Sydney on 27 September. She embarked 184 female convicts and had no convict deaths en route. Hooghly departed Port Jackson on 22 October, bound for China and London. The departing former Governor of New South Wales, Sir Ralph Darling, was a passenger on the vessel. 
Captain Reeves and Hooghly left China on 16 January 1832. They reached St Helena on 8 April, and arrived at the Downs on 31 May. 
On her fourth convict voyage under the command of George Bayly and surgeon James Rutherford, she left Portsmouth, England on 28 July 1834, arriving in Sydney on 18 November. She disembarked her full complement of 260 male convicts. 
On one voyage she sailed from London on 19 February 1839 and arrived at Port Adelaide on 17 June. There she landed 290 migrants. 
In 1859 Hooghly left London on 10 September and arrived in Hobart on 21 December. She transported 131 immigrants, including many single women. 
At some point Hooghly also sailed from Cork, Ireland to Port Jackson, New South Wales, with Irish migrants. 
Hooghly foundered off Algiers on 10 December 1863 while on a voyage to Cork, Ireland, from Constantinople. After the crew safely abandoned her the British steamship Ida rescued them, landing them at Gibraltar five days later. 
He was born Peter Wirth in the town of Niederbreitbach, then in the Rhine Province of the Kingdom of Prussia, on 15 October 1830, the fourth child of Theodor Wirth and Katharina Andries. His father was a shepherd while his mother ran a small pub. He lost his father at the age of nine and his mother a year later. Because of this tragedy, the impoverished children were separated, and Wirth was raised by his uncle and godfather, Johann Peter Andries, who was a teacher in the local school. 
Wirth was a pious young man. While still working at his trade, he joined the Third Order of Saint Francis, whose members were active in addressing the social and religious needs of the region. He felt drawn, however, to lead a spiritual and prayerful life. To this end, after he had completed his apprenticeship, he and two friends founded a house of "pious craftsmen" in the summer of 1854. This attempt failed and the small group dispersed. 
While caring for smallpox patients, Wirth himself became infected and died on 28 March 1871. Today his remains are kept in the chapel of St. Joseph Monastery in Hausen. 
In 1783, he was elected unopposed was a Member of Parliament (MP) for the rotten borough of Great Marlow, succeeding his father.  He held the seat until he stood down at the general election in 1790. 
In 1799 he inherited the baronetcy of his first cousin Sir Robert Clayton and Marden Park, which was rented among people to Joseph Buonaparte. He died aged 71 on 26 January 1834, and was succeeded in the baronetcy by his eldest son, William Robert, who became an MP for Great Marlow from 1832 to 1842. 
In 1785, he married Mary East, the daughter of Sir William East, 1st Baronet, a former High Sheriff of Berkshire. They had 5 sons and 2 daughters: 
This biography of a baronet in the baronetage of Great Britain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Peculiar Lives was released as an audiobook in November 2011, read by John Leeson and published by Fantom Films. 
In connection with the general crisis in the music business, the collapse of the Neuer Markt and the high costs of integrating the additional companies, a crisis followed in 2001, which jeopardised the company's continued existence. In 2002, Edel and Roland Berger Strategy Consultants implemented an extensive corporate restructuring program. Parts of the company and shareholdings were repelled and loss-making companies were closed. 
Of more than 1,700 employees, about 750 remained in the company. Thanks to this consolidation and the stable business of the manufacturer's subsidiary, positive business figures were again achieved. At the end of the short financial year 2001 (30.09.) Edel changed from listing in the Neuer Markt to the Regulated Market / General Standard of the Frankfurt Stock Exchange, which was transferred to the Regulated Market in 2007. 
In February 2007, edel music AG took over the book division of Pabel-Moewig with cookbooks, guides, puzzle books, children's books and some licenses such as the silver volumes of the science fiction series Perry Rhodan, thus expanding its media division. 
At the Annual General Meeting in May 2007 it was decided to remove the addition "music" in the company name. The company then operated under the name edel AG until 2010. In December 2009, the listing on the Regulated Market was revoked. The stock has since been traded on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange. 
In 2010, Edel took over 75% of the then ZS publishing house, followed by the remaining 25% in October 2014. 
In March 2011, Edel AG finally acquired the evaluation rights for the TV and cinema films around the cartoon characters Pettersson and Findus from the insolvent TV-Loonland AG. 
In October 2012, Edel AG acquired 100% of the shares in Brilliant Classics B.V., which is one of the leading companies in the field of classical music. The label, based in Leeuwarden, Netherlands, sells its products through a worldwide network of distributors. 
In March 2016, Jonas Haentjes, the son of the company's founder, took over the position of Director Corporate Development at Edel. 
As of December 2017, Michael Haentjes and Jonas Haentjes jointly led Edel AG as co-CEOs, and Jonas Haentjes was appointed to the board of management of Edel AG. 
In April 2018, the executive board and supervisory board of Edel AG decided to convert the company into a limited partnership for shares (KGaA). 
The change of form is intended to ensure the influence of the family after a generational succession. In addition, the general partner of KGaA should be given the legal form of a European Company (SE). 
In March 2019, the generational transition was completed and the change of legal form to SE & Co. KGaA was completed. Jonas Haentjes has been the sole CEO ever since. 
100%: Edel Germany GmbH with the divisions Edel Kultur, Edel Books, Eden Books, Edel Motion, Edel Kids, Edel Kids Books. Edel Distribution, and earMUSIC. 
100%: optimal media GmbH with the areas of production and distribution of sound and data media, production and distribution of books. to 
66.8%: Kontor Records GmbH, dance label with the brands Kontor Top of the Clubs and Kontor House of House. 
Furthermore, Edel holds 75% of the shares of Pandastorm Pictures GmbH and 100% of the Dutch Brilliant Classics B.V. 
Melieria theodori is a species of ulidiid or picture-winged fly in the genus Melieria of the family Ulidiidae. 
This article related to members of the insect family Ulidiidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Curby is an unincorporated community in Jennings Township, Crawford County, Indiana. It is a populated place that is not incorporated and has no legal boundaries. 
A post office was established at Curby in 1904, and remained in operation until it was discontinued in 1915. The community was named after the maiden name of the wife of an early settler. 
She was a member of the Chinese handball team which won the bronze medal. She played all five matches as goalkeeper.[citation needed] 
This biographical article relating to People's Republic of China team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Red-backed flameback, Lesser Sri Lanka flameback, Sri Lanka red-backed woodpecker or Ceylon red-backed woodpecker (Dinopium psarodes) is a species of bird in the family Picidae. It is endemic to Sri Lanka, only absent in the far-north. It is sometimes considered a subspecies of the Black-rumped flameback. 
It has been considered an endemic species since the time of Legge. It was first placed in the genus Brachypternus as Brachypternus ceylonus. It was later lumped as subspecies of the Black-rumped flameback (Dinopium benghalense), as Dinopium benghalense psarodes. It was elevated to full species status in a study by Sampath S. Seneviratne, Darren E. Irwin, and Saminda P. Fernando. 
In this study, it was found to hybridize with the Black-rumped flameback. The hybridization is concentrated north of a border from Trincomalee to the base of Puttalam lagoon and south of a border from Mullaitivu to Mannar. Hybridization is less out of this border, where the Black-rumped flameback dominates north of the border while the Red-backed flameback dominates south of the border. It is a case of Hybrid inferiority, in which the pure species are more successful than the hybrids. 
Its main source of food are ants. It seems to prefer Carpenter ants (Camponotus spp.), ants in the genus Meranoplus, and the pupae and larvae of Asian weaver ants (Oecophylla smaragdina). Other invertebrates eaten include spiders, caterpillars, weevils and beetles. Also feeds on some fruit occasionally, as a source of dietary fiber and other nutrients. 
It uses its tail as a support to climb trees, and flies in a flap-and-glide bounding pattern. It breaks into leaf nests of weaver ants in the trees themselves but descends to the ground to access nests of ground ants. Forages alone, in pairs or as a family group, and often joins multi-species foraging flocks, like other Dinopium flamebacks. It is often quite untame and is easy to flush.  
It drills nest holes at many variable heights. These holes, which can only be built by woodpeckers, barbets and other Piciformes, are nesting sites for other cavity-nesting birds like parrots, who cannot make their own holes. Sometimes broods twice, but usually only one clutch is laid per season. It breeds from December-September, predominantly from August-September and from February-June. Two-three eggs are laid per clutch. 
It is marked as least concern on the IUCN red list, because it has a stable yet unknown population and is common to locally common in its comparatively small range. No declines nor threats have been identified. It is very common, one of the "Common" endemics throughout Sri Lanka, along with the Sri Lankan junglefowl, the Sri Lanka hanging parrot, and the Crimson-fronted barbet. It is the most common woodpecker species in Sri Lanka. 
The Price of Wisdom is a 1935 British drama film directed by Reginald Denham and starring Mary Jerrold, Roger Livesey and Lilian Oldland. It was made at Elstree Studios as a quota quickie for release by the British subsidiary of Paramount Pictures. 
This article related to a British film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Clinton Matthew Langston, CB, QHC (born 1962) is a British Anglican priest and military chaplain. He has served as Chaplain General of the Royal Army Chaplains' Department, British Army since 2018 and as Archdeacon for the Army in the Church of England since 2017. He was previously Deputy Chaplain General from 2017 to 2018. 
Langston was born in 1962. He studied at the Derby College of Education, graduating with a Bachelor of Combined Studies (BCombStuds) in 1986. In 1987, he matriculated into Queen's College, Birmingham, an ecumenical theological college in Birmingham to train for ordained ministry and to study theology. 
Langston was ordained in the Church of England as a deacon in 1990 and as a priest in 1991. From 1990 to 1994, he served his curacy at St James the Great, Shirley in the Diocese of Birmingham. 
In addition to seeing service in Great Britain, Langston has been posted to Germany, Bosnia, Omagh, Northern Ireland, and Iraq. 
Langston has been awarded a number of campaign medals: the NATO Medal for the former Republic of Yugoslavia, the General Service Medal with Northern Ireland clasp, and the Iraq Medal. He has also been awarded the Queen Elizabeth II Golden Jubilee Medal, the Queen Elizabeth II Diamond Jubilee Medal, and the Accumulated Campaign Service Medal. 
In 1964, Ellsworth won Europe's most prestigious race when his newly acquired horse Prince Royal won the Prix de l'Arc de Triomphe at Longchamp Racecourse in Paris, France. 
Bowes sent Cotherstone into training with John Scott who trained forty classic winners at his base at Whitewall stables, Malton, North Yorkshire. The colt was ridden in most of his important races by the trainer's younger brother, Bill Scott. Cotherstone was not an impressive individual at first, being weak and sickly as a yearling, and making little progress as a two-year-old. He was described as being "thin-fleshed" and "always amiss". 
Before he ran as a four-year-old, Cotherstone was sold for 3,000 guineas as a potential Stallion to Lord Spencer. He made his first and only appearance of the year in a Sweepstakes at Goodwood. He broke down injured in the race, and never ran again. 
It is sometimes said to be the same as undifferentiated connective tissue disease, but other experts specifically reject this idea because undifferentiated connective tissue disease is not necessarily associated with serum antibodies directed against the U1-RNP, and MCTD is associated with a more clearly defined set of signs/symptoms. 
MCTD combines features of scleroderma, polymyositis, systemic lupus erythematosus, and rheumatoid arthritis (with some sources adding myositis, dermatomyositis, and inclusion body myositis) and is thus considered an overlap syndrome. 
MCTD is an autoimmune disorder. Anti-RNP antibodies develop against RNP when RNP is found outside of the nucleus. RNP is immunologically protected due to its location, however if a cell dies and RNP is no longer contained in the nucleus and thus unprotected, the immune system can respond by forming antibodies due to cellular mimicry. Risk to develop MCTD can increase if the body has exposed to molecules or viruses with a similar structure to RNP in the past. 
There are currently no known environmental factors or triggers contributing to MCTD.[citation needed]It has been associated with HLA-DR4. 
Distinguishing laboratory characteristics are a positive, speckled anti-nuclear antibody and an anti-U1-RNP antibody. 
After the original 1972 description of MCTD by Sharp, there was some controversy over whether MCTD was a distinct connective tissue disease, however after four decades and more than 2000 publications, it seems that there is a consensus that MCTD should be considered a distinctive clinical entity, and is thus considered as such by the majority of rheumatologists, however there is a subgroup of patients that could evolve in their disease course towards another connective tissue disease. 
Although almost any organ can be affected by MCTD, there are various clinical manifestations that make it more likely to suspect the disease is MCTD over other connective tissue diseases: 
Although MCTD was originally described as a disease with a good treatment response to corticosteroids, the treatment of the disease is based on the specific manifestations and clinical complications, similar to how other signs and symptoms are treated in other connective tissue disease.  
Since pulmonary hypertension is the leading cause of death, its early diagnosis by routine echocardiography and the rapid initiation of treatment with endothelin-1 antagonists (bosentan), phosphodiesterase 5 inhibitors (sildenafil) or endovenous prostacyclins (epoprostenol) manage to considerably improve morbidity and mortality. 
Patients diagnosed with MCTD may progress to a clinical picture more consistent with other connective tissue diseases like SLE, scleroderma, or rheumatoid arthritis. In some studies these patients become reclassified over time with other diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis in 9%, SLE in 15%, and scleroderma in 21% of cases. Such progression is, in part, determined genetically, thus SLE is more likely in patients with HLA-DR3 and scleroderma in patients with HLA-DR5. 
The prevalence of MCTD is higher than that of dermatomyositis and lower than that of SLE. In a 2011 Norwegian study, the prevalence of MCTD was 3.8 per 100,000 adults, with an incidence of 2.1 per million per year. 
The Cruise of Deception was a major cliffhanger and resolution storyline on the daytime drama Days of Our Lives. Billed as a "miniseries" by NBC advertisements, it aired from June 7 until July 16, 1990. 
The story included several of the show's most popular characters attending a masked ball on a cruise ship, which is taken over by a vengeful Ernesto Toscano, played by Charles Cioffi. The miniseries acted as the climax of several stories that had been developing previously to it, and the launching pad of several more, some of which played out through most of the 1990s. The weeks-long storyline was a special production, requiring "long weekend shoots, water tanks, and tilting scenery." 
Among the characters impacted were Bo and Hope, a popular couple. Hope died at the end of the storyline, allowing actress Kristian Alfonso to exit the show. Alfonso was nine months pregnant at the time. Roman's romance the next year with Isabella was considered an example of the storyline's ongoing impact. 
A storyline of this magnitude had not been developed for the series before this time, and even today it is remembered as one of the most ballyhooed ratings events in the show's history. In 2005, SOAPnet named the Cruise of Deception one of the 40 most memorable moments in Days history. 
The show prospered from the Cruise of Deception. In late 1989, its ratings were in a freefall and its popularity was on the wane. Former executive producer Al Rabin, who had helmed Days of our Lives during the popular mid-1980s period, was lured out of retirement to restructure the show. He, along with then-head writers Anne M. Schoettle and Richard J. Allen, concocted the Cruise of Deception. 
The show even changed its opening credits for the first time in its history to correspond to the storyline. At the half-way point of the famous hourglass opening, the shot faded to that of a dark, ominous-looking ocean, and the words "Cruise of Deception" scrolled into place as "Days of Our Lives" appeared in smaller lettering below it. An announcer intoned, "The story continues on 'Cruise of Deception.'" 
NBC promoted the story heavily to lure kids home from school to watch the show during their summer vacation. Ratings rose due to the storyline, but then the ratings retreated, something that would not markedly change for at least the next three years. 
Following their rescue from Ernesto's island, the shipwrecked characters return to the show's hometown of Salem, USA to cope with Hope's "death" and move on with their lives following the life-changing events of the story. Eventually, actress Kristian Alfonso returned to the show four years later, and it was revealed that Hope was in fact switched at the last moment before the explosion with an imposter, Gina von Amberg. Ernesto's fate was never revealed. 
Based on the NBC promos that were broadcast during the storyline, the Cruise of Deception was divided into the following chapters: 
This biographical article related to an Indian cricket person born in 1987 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Back of Law railway station served the city of Dundee, Scotland, from 1833 to 1855 on the Dundee and Newtyle Railway. 
The station opened in May 1833 by the Dundee and Newtyle Railway. It was situated on the south side of Clerpington Road. Trains only served here on Fridays. It closed in July 1855. The site is now occupied by a two-storey house. 
'Nattergale' is a pun - 'Nattergale' could mean both 'nightingale', as the group sing, but also 'Nattergale', which means "night-crazy" - 'lunatics'. 
In later years they have had a comeback with their advent calendars: The Julekalender, Canal Wild Card, and CWC World. 
This article about a Danish band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The PGA National Champion Course is an 18-hole golf course located at the PGA National Golf Club in Palm Beach Gardens, Florida, United States. 
The PGA National Champion Course was opened on November 17, 1981. It was the site of the 1983 Ryder Cup, the 1987 PGA Championship (won by Larry Nelson), and the Senior PGA Championship for 19 years, from 1982 to 2000. The course underwent a $4 million renovation in December 2002, and in 2007 became the home of The Honda Classic. 
A traffic separation scheme (or 'TSS') is an area in the sea where navigation of ships is highly regulated. Each TSS is designed to create lanes in the water with ships in a specific lane all travelling in (roughly) the same direction. 
A TSS is typically created in locations with large numbers of ship movements and vessels travelling in different directions and where there might otherwise be a high risk of collisions. Details of traffic separation schemes and similar routing-systems can be found on Admiralty charts. 
In the list below, where a TSS or routing scheme is not governed by the IMO (IMO), then the governing body is mentioned in brackets. 
The English Channel connects the Atlantic Ocean with the Southern part of the North Sea and belong to the busiest shipping areas in the world with ships going in numerous direction: you have ships that are 'just' passing through from the Southwest to Northeast (or vice versa), ships going to or departing from one of the many ports around the English Channel and then the ferries crossing the channel. In the English Channel several TSS schemes are in operation: 
TSS's in these areas aren't governed by the IMO but by either the government of Russia (marked: R) or the Norwegian government (marked N)[citation needed] 
Most TSS's in the Baltic Sea are governed by the IMO, but some are the responsibility of the local country. 
In the area of the North Sea which lies North of the earlier mentioned Dover Straits several TSS's are in place to manage the traffic to and from some of the busiest ports in the world such as: Port of Rotterdam, Bremerhaven, Port of Amsterdam, Antwerp etc. All of these TSS's and routing-schemes are governed by the IMO 
Numerous TSS's and similar routing-schemes are active in the Mediterranean Sea, the Black Sea and the waters within this area such as the Adriatic Sea. On the charts of the United Kingdom Hydrographic Office some 56 schemes can be found. Many of these schemes are governed by the local state, such as Italy, Spain, Croatia etc.) 
Some of the most important TSS's are mentioned below. A complete list can be retrieved from the Notice 17: TRAFFIC SEPARATION SCHEMES AND INFORMATION CONCERNING ROUTEING SYSTEMS SHOWN ON ADMIRALTY CHARTS 
On the Western shores of the Atlantic Ocean are the eastern coasts of North America with the United States of America and Canada. Then there is the Caribbean Sea, the Gulf of Mexico and South America's east coast. 
Apart from the TSS schemes in the Mediterranean to the north, the African continent has only a few TSS schemes around the waters of South Africa: 
This covers the Red Sea, Arabian Sea and Persian Gulf. Some 15 TSS schemes can be found in this area: in the Red Sea is traffic using the Suez Channel while in the Persian Gulf much of the traffic comprises the (large) oil and gas tankers to Iran and Iraq. All TSS's here are governed by the IMO, except the Approaches to Yanbu which is the responsibility of the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. 
The Indian Ocean region links in the West with the (above) area of the Arabian Sea and the African continent and in the East it borders with the Pacific Ocean. Apart from schemes in these border-areas only two TSS's are mentioned around India and Sri Lanka: 
On the Eastern borders of the Indian Ocean are the Malacca Strait, Singapore Strait and the waters around the Indonesian island of Sumatra. This is a very busy shipping area and also very dangerous (see also this section). 
Some 25 TSS schemes are in operation in and around the China Seas. Shipping is very busy around Hong Kong, the mainland of South-East China and around Taiwan. 
In Japan there are 5 TSS's all governed by the Japanese government.  Apart from these mandatory schemes there are also voluntary and recommended schemes. These are not shown on Admiralty Charts and (thus) not shown in this overview 
In (North) Korean and Pacific Russian waters some 35 schemes are in operation with only 5 of them being governed by the IMO. All major ports in this area have a TSS in operation.  In North Korea none of the TSS schemes are IMO schemes; only locally governed by the North Korean central government. Below an overview of the IMO schemes and some of the most important locally governed schemes: 
There are six TSS's around the Philippines and one in Malaysia. None of them are governed by the IMO: 
In this area there are 5 TSS's in operation: two in the Bass Strait, governed by the IMO and three leading to Australian ports, governed by Australia. 
On the East side of the Pacific Ocean the TSS's are divided in two groups. The North side includes the West coast of Mexico and everything to its North. The other group are formed by the West coast of Central and South America. 
The TSS's in the far North around the Aleutian Islands and Alaska are not put in place because of the high density of shipping but the nature of the ships and the vulnerability of the area. 
Dorothy Lyman (born April 18, 1947) is an American television actress, director and producer. She is most known for her work as Gwen Frame on Another World and on All My Children as Opal Sue Gardner, as Rebecca Whitmore on Generations, and on the sitcom Mama's Family as Naomi Harper. 
In an appearance on Vicki Lawrence's talk show Vicki!, Lyman noted that she continued to perform on All My Children concurrently with the beginning of Mama's Family's production, flying back and forth each week between New York City and Los Angeles.  While the commute was brutal, she remembered it fondly, referring to that stage of her career as "All My Paychecks".[citation needed] 
In 2007, Lyman guest-starred in the third season of the reimagined Battlestar Galactica as Starbuck's mother. Lyman is currently living in New York City after spending time in California. In California, she made a guest appearance on Reba, playing Reba Hart's mother. 
Lyman performed "My Kitchen Wars" in Hollywood and New York as a one-woman show based on the book by Betty Fussell. She also appeared in The Blacklist in Season 6 Episode 4, "The Pawnbrokers". She played the role of Norma in a guest appearance on Murder She Wrote, Season 12 Episode 3 "The Secret of Gila Junction". It first aired on October 5, 1995. 
Subulininae is a subfamily of small tropical air-breathing land snails, terrestrial pulmonate gastropod mollusks in the family Achatinidae. 
In this subfamily, the number of haploid chromosomes lies between 26 and 35 (according to the values in this table). 
Pegorari was twice Italian champion (Slalom 1972, Combined 1973). Best results were a 2nd place (Slalom Mt. St. Anne/4 March 1973) and a 3rd place (Slalom Naeba/13 March 1973). 
This biographical article relating to alpine skiing in Italy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vepris lecomteana, synonym Oricia lecomteana, is a species of plant in the family Rutaceae. It is found in Cameroon, the Republic of the Congo, Gabon and Nigeria. Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist lowland forests. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
Duane served a brief term as United States Secretary of the Treasury in 1833. His refusal to withdraw Federal deposits from the Second Bank of the United States led to his dismissal by President Andrew Jackson. 
Duane was born on May 9, 1780 in Clonmel, County Tipperary, Ireland. Duane emigrated to the United States with his parents, William Duane, and Catherine Corcoran in 1796, settling in Philadelphia. He assisted his father in publishing the Aurora, a pro-Jeffersonian Philadelphia newspaper, until 1806. He became an influential lawyer and served several terms in the Pennsylvania General Assembly, becoming one of the most powerful state politicians in Pennsylvania at the time. 
He was married on December 31, 1805 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, to Deborah Franklin Bache, who was born on October 1, 1781 in Philadelphia, and died on February 12, 1863 in Philadelphia. His father-in-law was Richard Bache, Sr., a marine insurance underwriter and importer in Philadelphia. Bache served as United States Postmaster General from 1776 to 1782. His mother-in-law was Sarah Franklin Bache, the daughter of Benjamin Franklin. 
Duane supported Jackson for president in 1824 and 1828. He declined appointments to serve as government director of the Second Bank of the United States and United States District Attorney. 
Duane defended his own position in his book Narrative and Correspondence Concerning the Removal of the Deposites, and Occurrences Connected Therewith, published in 1838. 
But Duane is not without fault. When all is said and done, he placed his own judgment above that of the President. All because of wounded pride, he challenged not only Jackson's policy but his authority to make that policy. He was a small-minded, inconsequential bureaucrat, and he deserved to be sacked.
Bradley attended the University of Texas at Austin. Bradley found the Texas Longhorns basketball program appealing in part because he had spent parts of his childhood in Arlington, where he became a fan of T. J. Ford. 
In April 2010, Bradley declared for the NBA draft, forgoing his final three years of college eligibility. 
Bradley was selected with the 19th overall pick in the 2010 NBA draft by the Boston Celtics. On July 2, 2010, he signed his rookie scale contract with the Celtics. The same day, he underwent successful ankle surgery and subsequently missed the 2010 NBA Summer League. 
On March 25, 2021, Bradley, Kelly Olynyk, and a 2022 draft pick swap were traded to the Houston Rockets in exchange for Victor Oladipo. The Rockets chose not to pick up his $5.9 million team option which made him a free agent. 
On September 24, 2021, Bradley signed with the Golden State Warriors. However, he was waived on October 15 after four preseason games. 
Bradley has a son, Avery Bradley III, who was born just two weeks after Bradley's mother died, in September 2013. He began hosting a basketball camp, the Avery Bradley Skills Academy, for Boston-area children in the summer of 2014. 
In 1968, Alden Hanson started negotiations with Bob Lange to add Flo-fit to Lange's boot designs. Lange proved interested, and hired Chris, an industrial designer, and his brother Denny (Alden Hanson Jr.), a salesman for Head Skis, to help design a system to incorporate the newly christened "Lange-flo" into their boot lineup. However, Chris proved more interested in developing a new boot design than working on Lange-flo, and Lange dismissed them both in 1969.[N 1] 
However, the liners ended up failing when the Lange-flo interacted with the vinyl in cold weather. This allowed the Lange-flo to squeeze into the boot, and led to millions of dollars in warranty work in the 1969-1970 season. 
During 1969, the Hansons were building prototypes of their new boot design, and in June 1970, they formed Hanson Industries to produce them. The boot was moulded in two halves, front and back, both of relatively simple shaping that made them very easy to remove from the moulds, at least compared to traditional front-entry designs like Lange where the shaping results in complex moulds. A single buckle locked the rear portion forward onto the front for closure. 
During the later half of the 1970s, many ski and boot companies rushed to introduce their own rear-entry designs. This was particularly attractive to companies that had not previously been involved in boots, as the traditional market for front-entry systems was fairly well established. 
O'Brien, Scott and Rosemount all introduced versions similar to the Hanson. K2 introduced the "Three", which reversed the Hanson pattern by making the rear flap much larger and bucking on the front like a conventional front-entry design. None of these had a major impact on Hanson's sales, and in the period between 1978 and 1981, the company was shipping an average of 120,000 pairs of boots a year. This represented about half of the high end boot market in the US, at least on a dollar basis. 
Flush with success, Hanson decided to reverse this pattern and enter the ski market. Hexcel produced a well-regarded product using a honeycomb material in place of wood or foam, but the company decided to focus on the aerospace market and was looking to sell their ski factory. Hanson purchased the entire line. They also arranged a deal with the Spyder ski wear brand, offering high-end racing boots under this marque. 
Hanson had decided from the start to try to keep steady employment through the year, instead of using temporary workers to fill the needs of the winter season rush. To do this, the company borrowed money from the banks to fund production, which it repaid with the proceeds from sales during the winter. When US interest rates soared to 22% in 1980, the company was hard hit. They started looking for a European factory, but never finalized a deal. 
To add to their problems, the winter of 1982-83 was famed for a lack of snow, and the entire ski industry was hard hit. Many Hanson dealers failed to pay, and the company quickly ran out of cash. In 1984, they sold the company to Daiwa, their Japanese distributor, who quickly withdrew the brand from North America and Europe. It continues to exist in Japan.[N 2] 
Salomon started as a ski binding company, but watched the boot market throughout the 1970s. In 1979, they introduced their first boot, the SX90, a complex rear-entry design. The design did not sell well, with only 30,000 examples shipping in the next two seasons. 
Salomon continued development, and in 1983, they introduced the SX91 design. The SX91 offered easy control over almost every possible movement of the boot. It was a huge success, entering the market right as Hanson was in the process of exiting it. Sales were limited only by their ability to manufacture enough to meet demand. Entries from Nordica and the three-part designs from Raichle propelled the rear-entry design to the forefront, making up about 80% of the market in 1987. 
After selling the company, the Hanson brothers continued to work with the Flo-fit material, founding the Flolite company and offering a number of products outside the ski industry. These included boot inserts, bike seats and wheel chair cushions, among others. 
During the 2000s, Denny re-entered the ski boot market with the Apex ski boot. The Apex consists of two entirely separate parts, a semi-stiff boot that uses the Boa Closure System instead of laces or buckles, and an outer carbon fibre shell that provides the needed lateral support and mounting points for conventional downhill ski bindings. 
Ageratina is derived from Greek meaning 'un-aging', in reference to the flowers keeping their color for a long time. This name was used by Dioscorides for a number of different plants. 
All Times Through Paradise is a box set compilation comprising the Saints' albums, singles released between 1977 and 1978, their EP One Two Three Four and unreleased 1977 performances from Paddington Town Hall, Sydney and The Hope and Anchor, London (titled Live In London 26/11/77). The discs were later released separately in 2007, except for Live In London 26/11/77 which remained exclusive to this set. 
Monterrey is a town and municipality in the Department of Casanare, Colombia. It is located approximately 105 kilometers south-west of the city Yopal, the capital of the Casanare department.  
Previous to the Spanish conquest, this area was largely under the influence of the Muisca civilization. The social, cultural and productive organization was the most developed in what is now known as Colombia. The process of conquest began in 1499 and lasted until 1550. Following the conquest, the new government, whose powers were bestowed by Phillip II, subjugated the region and its native peoples.  
Monterrey possesses varied geological reliefs which offers a diversity of mountain landscapes, piedmont, upland, hills, and valleys. 
In Monterrey, the plains are located in two small areas: the Southeast and Northeast. The plains present deposits of sedimentation of fine material, brought in from the rivers originating in the mountainous areas. The plains are largely flat terrain. 
Most of the native vegetation in the municipality has been removed or deforested by its inhabitants. The undergrowth consists of numerous shrubs, woody vines, herbaceous plants and epiphyte. The following vegetation is the most abundant in the area: 
The municipality of Monterrey, like most of the foothills of the Colombian plains has very little wildlife due to extensive hunting and intense human interference over forests and ecosystems, turning natural habitats into pastures and agricultural crops.  
Monterrey hosts a varied and unique range of aviary life. The most common species of bird in the region are the Roadside hawk. The following species of birds are also found:  
The most common are the armadillo, Capybara, Lowland Paca, Deer, Bear, Anteater, Sloth Bear, Bat, Squirrel, Pheasant, Fox, and others.   
Pachyelasma is a genus of flowering plants in the legume family, Fabaceae. It belongs to the subfamily Caesalpinioideae. 
Jason Pawley (born 11 July 1972) is a New Zealand cricketer who played in one first-class and one List A match for Central Districts in 1994/95 and 1995/96. 
This biographical article related to a New Zealand cricketer born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Remember Sports is an American indie rock band from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, United States. Formed in Gambier, Ohio, and originally just named Sports, they have released four albums on Father/Daughter Records. 
In August 2016, Remember Sports released a demo of their song "Makin It Right", which was featured on the Clearmountain Compilation Vol. 1. 
In November 2017, the band announced their name change from Sports to Remember Sports to avoid confusion with other bands, including the Oklahoma-based band, Sports. In 2018, the band released their third album titled Slow Buzz. In 2020, the group contributed a cover of the song "Just the Girl" by the Click Five for a tribute compilation celebrating the life of musician Adam Schlesinger. In 2021, the band announced their fourth LP, Like a Stone, released on April 23, 2021. 
Deception Bay Sea Baths are heritage-listed swimming pools at Captain Cook Parade, Deception Bay, Moreton Bay Region, Queensland, Australia. They were built around the 1880s and 1890s by Joseph Bancroft. It is also known as Bancroft Sea Baths. It was added to the Queensland Heritage Register on 4 July 2006. 
Joseph had property at Deception Bay by the early 1880s and by 1890, owned 1,500 hectares (3,700 acres). He lived at Wickham Terrace and visited his Deception Bay property with his family on weekends and holidays. At the bay, he pastured cattle, established a dried beef factory and experimented with rice crops and artificially cultivating pearls. He also used the property as a research station supporting his studies of botany and zoology. 
The Bancroft family believe that Joseph constructed the baths. Bancroft family members state that Joseph's wife, Ann, suffered with a chronic illness and that Joseph had the Boardwalk Bath shaped for her from natural tidal pools because she found that sea bathing helped her condition. This conclusion is supported by the relatively small size of the bath. 
A number of artificial rock pools, dating to the late 19th Century and early 20th Century, exist in New South Wales, generally of a larger scale than the Deception Bay pools. Like the Deception Bay pools, they are formed by enhancing natural rock formations by excavation and the use of artificial walls. The Deception Bay tidal baths are believed to be the only surviving 19th Century baths of their type in Queensland. 
A number of the Bancroft holdings were bought from Thomas by the Dunne brothers in the early 1900s. They pastured a dairy herd, grew some crops and established oyster leases along the foreshore. The sides of the Fisheries Bath show the remains of oysters and this suggests that the bath was used by the Dunne brothers to cultivate the shellfish. 
The baths have been excavated a number of times. Due to their location within the inter-tidal zone, they fill with silt soon after excavation. In November 2004, an archaeological survey of the baths was completed in which each bath was recorded and analysed in detail. 
Notches to secure timber steps are located on the northern edge. After the 2004 survey, the remnants of the hardwood steps were left in the bath. 
Deception Bay Sea Baths was listed on the Queensland Heritage Register on 4 July 2006 having satisfied the following criteria. 
The baths are uncommon surviving examples of 19th century sea baths. They are likely to be the only extant examples of their type in Queensland. Excavated from the sandstone in the inter-tidal zone of the Deception Bay foreshore, they were filled by the incoming tide. The Boardwalk Bath was drained via a pipe built into the bottom of the bath. 
The place is important in demonstrating the principal characteristics of a particular class of cultural places. 
The place has a special association with the life or work of a particular person, group or organisation of importance in Queensland's history. 
 This Wikipedia article was originally based on "The Queensland heritage register" published by the State of Queensland under CC-BY 3.0 AU licence (accessed on 7 July 2014, archived on 8 October 2014). The geo-coordinates were originally computed from the "Queensland heritage register boundaries" published by the State of Queensland under CC-BY 3.0 AU licence (accessed on 5 September 2014, archived on 15 October 2014). 
"He [Taqizadeh] had won deserved fame by his fearless independence and wonderful grasp of political affairs. There is something so sympathetic in his face, so attractive, with eyes sparkling with cheerful animation. (...). If I am not mistaken he is of those whose genius is capable of inspiring great enthusiasm, great sacrifices, and whose influence leaves a lasting impression of the history of nations." (Edward Granville Browne) 
"In which position was Taqizadeh true and sincere? What were the motives of that contradictory behaviour? He was not adept at political truth and honour." (Fereydun Adamiyat) 
1896: Established the Tarbiyat (Education) school and a bookshop and set up a pharmacy in collaboration with his friends in Tabriz. 
1898: Taught physics at Loqmaniya in Tabriz. Translated the book  'Ajaeb-e Asemani (Astrnomie Populaire) by Camille Flammarion. 
1899/1900: Studied English at the American Memorial School in Tabriz (the Presbyterian mission school in Tabriz). 
1904: Travelled to the Caucasus and Istanbul for six months, to Egypt for several months and to Beirut for fifty days. Published the discourse Tahqiq-e Ahval-e kononi-ye Iran ba Mohakemat-e Tarikhi (Research into the contemporary condition of Iran from historical perspective) in newspaper Hekmat (Wisdom), in Cairo. 
August 1909: Arrived in Tehran after the victory of Mojaheds. Membership to the "Temporarily Board of Directors". Elected deputy to the Second Majles. 
October 1909: Deputy to the Second Majles and parliamentary leader of Ferqeh-ye Demokrat-e Iran (Democratic Party of Iran). 
June 1913: Left for New York, staying for nineteen months in the United States of America. Published four political articles in French about the political situations of Iran, Ottoman and Arabic countries in Revue du Monde Musulman (Study of the Muslim World). 
January 1915: Left the United States of America for Germany (Berlin), travelling through the Netherlands. 
July 1924: Returned to Iran. Elected deputy to the Fifth Majles. Became member of the Ma'aref (Cultural Affairs) Commission. 
June 1926: Travelled to the United States of America as official Iranian representative to the Philadelphia Sesquicentennial Exposition of 1926. Membership of the "Council of Founders" of the "Society of National Opuses". 
1934: Travelled to the United Kingdom for his Lecture at Royal Society of Arts about the Iranian situation. End of his duties assigned to him by the Iranian embassy in Paris. Left for Berlin, staying there for fifteen months. 
1936: Went to London to teach at the then School of Oriental Studies (SOAS), University of London. Taqizadeh was a temporary member of the teaching staff of Iranian and Persian Studies alongside Vladimir Minorsky, A. J. Arberry and W. B. Henning. He briefly moved with SOAS to University of Cambridge when SOAS was evacuated to there at the beginning of the World War II. 
October 1941: Became Iranian ambassador to the United Kingdom. Was Chairman of the Iranian delegation to the United Nations in connection with the case of Azerbaijan. 
October 1947: Elected deputy from Tabriz to the Fifteenth Majles. Was Chairman of the Iranian Board at the Congress of Orientalists (Cambridge, United Kingdom), Chairman of the Iranian Board at International Congress of Avicenna (Baghdad), Chairman of International Congress of Avicenna (Tehran). 
1954: Was Scientific adviser and member of the Board of Directors of the "Translation Institution and Book Publication". 
1957: Chairman of the Iranian Board at Congress of Orientalists (Munich). Went to the United States of America for teaching at Columbia University. 
1958: Was Chairman of the Iranian Society of Philosophy and Humanities. Participated in the establishment of an offset printing-house. 
The Vancouver Giants hosted the 2007 Memorial Cup tournament, which also featured the WHL champion Medicine Hat Tigers.  The Plymouth Whalers represented the Ontario Hockey League, and the Lewiston Maineiacs represented the Quebec Major Junior Hockey League. 
The 2007 WHL Bantam Draft was the 18th Bantam Draft. It was hosted by the Stampede Park Round-Up Centre on Thursday May 3, 2007, via the internet. 
USS Pluck (AMc-94) was an Accentor-class coastal minesweeper acquired by the U.S. Navy for the dangerous task of removing mines from minefields laid in the water to prevent ships from passing. 
Pluck, a wooden-hulled coastal minesweeper, was laid down 7 June 1941 by the Noank Shipbuilding Co., Noank, Connecticut, launched 4 April 1942 and placed in service 6 October 1942, Lt. (j.g.) J. C. Butt, USNR, in charge. 
Following shakedown and training, Pluck departed Miami, Florida, 19 February 1943, for San Juan, Puerto Rico. She soon operated from the American naval base at Trinidad, British West Indies. She conducted minesweeping operations in the Caribbean to protect Allied shipping. 
Pluck was decommissioned 12 November 1945. She was struck from the Naval Vessel Register 8 May 1946. Transferred to the Maritime Commission 24 November 1947, she was subsequently sold. 
Spellman was born Gladys Blossom Noon in New York City and attended Eastern and Roosevelt high schools in Washington, D.C. She graduated from George Washington University, Washington, D.C., and graduate school with the United States Department of Agriculture. 
Spellman became a teacher, and taught in Prince George's County, Maryland, schools. A consummate politician, Spellman was part of the wave of young, new suburban dwellers who moved to Prince George's County from Washington and elsewhere in the years after World War II, and that group remained her constituency throughout her political career. 
During the 1950s and 1960s, Spellman was a teacher and president of the PTA for Happy Acres Elementary School (renamed the Gladys Noon Spellman Elementary School in 1991) and a civic association activist as a young mother and housewife in Cheverly. Her activities led to leadership positions in the reform movement that seized control of the Prince George's County government during the 1960s, ousting the old guard Democratic organization that had managed affairs in Prince George's for decades. 
In 1979, the Supersisters trading card set was produced and distributed; one of the cards featured Spellman's name and picture. 
On October 31, 1980, Spellman was judging a Halloween costume contest at the Laurel Mall when she collapsed after suffering an incapacitating heart attack. She was re-elected to Congress with 80% of the vote against a little-known Republican opponent on November 4, 1980, but it soon became clear that she would be comatose for the remaining years of her life. 
Spellman never regained consciousness and died in a Maryland nursing home on June 19, 1988, after nearly 8 years in a coma. She and her husband are buried at Arlington National Cemetery. 
He served as the captain of the General Lincoln and carried letters for John Adams. He held  a letter of marque from the fledgling American government to harass, sink or capture British and allied shipping. 
He later brought back the first shipload of pepper bought directly from the natives of the Dutch Spice Islands and thus opened the way to that trade in America and made a fortune in the process. 
Osteopygis is a genus of extinct turtle. Osteopygis, as traditionally seen, is a chimera: the postcrania (including the holotype) belong to a non-marine stem-cryptodire, whilst the crania belong to sea turtles. In 2005 the referred material was split between two taxa: the postcrania remained in Osteopygis, while the crania were reassigned to Euclastes wielandi. 
Telmatobius peruvianus, also known as the Peru water frog, is a species of frog in the family Telmatobiidae. This semiaquatic frog is endemic to Andean highlands in southeastern Peru and far northern Chile where found  in streams and small rivers. It is threatened by habitat loss, pollution, collection for human consumption and infection by chytrid fungi, and it has not been seen in Chile since 1986. 
This article about a property in Butler County, Missouri on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is the 25th studio album by Peter Hammill, released on his Fie! label in 1998. There is a large variety in the compositions, ranging from the minimalism of the final song, "The Light Continent", to the rough, almost Nadir-like sound of "Always is Next", the complex "Unrehearsed" and the ballad "Since the Kids". Peter Hammill performed the song "Unrehearsed" live many times. "Nightman" can be heard on the live-album Veracious (2006). 
The cover shows a tree stump and a collection of objects, signifying the passing of time. There is a tachograph disc, ripped out of the machine at high speed on one of the tours, and a picture of a wristwatch that used to belong to Hammill's father. The design was done by RidArt (Paul Ridout). 
The district serves portions of Young County (including the city of Olney), Archer County (including the town of Megargel), Baylor County, and Throckmorton County. 
Prior to fall 2006, Megargel ISD served the town of Megargel and portions of Archer, Baylor, Throckmorton, and Young Counties, while Olney ISD served Olney and portions of Archer and Young counties. 
Megargel School (along with the town of Megargel) had declined for years, and was running out of funds. The school board voted to consolidate with Olney ISD, subject to voter approval on May 13, 2006. The vote was in favor of consolidation with 79% of voters in favor. The school and district closed after the school year ended. Olney ISD announced plans to hire former Megargel ISD employees. 
Lisa Lockhart (born November 11, 1965) is an American professional rodeo cowgirl who specializes in barrel racing. In December 2014 and 2016, she won the Average at the National Finals Rodeo (NFR) in Las Vegas, Nevada. 
Lockhart was born on November 11, 1965, in Wolf Point, Montana. Lockhart started riding at 6-years-old with a pony. Her two sisters were key in drawing her into competition. Lockhart graduated from Montana State University. She then turned her amateur career into a professional one. 
Lockhart joined the WPRA in 1993. In addition to being a two-time NFR Average Champion, Lockhart has the second most qualifications to the NFR with 13, with Charmayne James and Sherry Cervi tied for first with 19 each. She is in 8th place for most money won at an NFR with $151,731 in 2016. For WPRA Career Earnings Leaders through 2018, she is second only to Sherry Cervi with $2,425,713. She is also a two-time winner of the RFD-TV American Rodeo. 
Lockhart qualified for the NFR in the 2019 season. Her season earnings are $146,352. She finished 3rd in the World Rankings. Her career earnings to date are $2,572,065. 
Highlights from this season include winning the following rodeos: the Tri-State Rodeo in Fort Madison, Iowa; the McCone County Fair PRCA Rodeo in Circle, Montana; the BHSU Rally Rode and Bullfights in Spearfish, South Dakota; the Killdeer PRCA Rodeo in Killdeer, North Dakota; the Calgary Stampede in Calgary, Alberta. 
In the 2018 season, Lockhart placed #4 in the World Standings. Her total year earnings were $123.515. Her back number was 39. Her NFR qualifications were 12 (2007-2018). To date, Lockhart's total career earnings are $2,378,482. 
Her prominent horse is named "An Oakie With Cash", nicknamed Louie out of Biebers Oakie by Lady Kaweah Cash. Louie is a 18-year-old buckskin (horse) gelding as of 2021. 
Another of her horses is nicknamed "Rosa" out of Corona Cartel by Dash Ta Vanila. She is an 11-year-old buckskin mare as of 2021. She owns one other horse registered name Prime Diamond, nicknamed Cutter. He is a 10-year-old black gelding by Prime Talent, out of Hugos Diamond. 
In 1994, she married her husband Grady, a professional tie-down roper. They have three children. Lockhart spends her time off riding young horses and spending time with her children. She and her family reside in Oelrichs, South Dakota, a small town of 126 at the 2010 census. 
The Lancashire and Cheshire Women's cricket team was the women's representative cricket team for the historic counties of Lancashire and Cheshire. They competed in the Women's Area Championship from 1980 to 1996 and in the Women's County Championship in 1997, after which they were replaced by individual teams representing Lancashire and Cheshire. 
Players who played for Lancashire and Cheshire and played internationally are listed below, in order of first international appearance (noted in brackets): 
The Wall is a 2017 American war thriller film directed by Doug Liman and written by Dwain Worrell. The film follows two American soldiers (Aaron Taylor-Johnson and John Cena) trapped by an Iraqi sniper. Produced by Amazon Studios, it was released on May 12, 2017 by Roadside Attractions. The film received mixed reviews from audiences but positive reviews from critics and grossed $4.5 million against a $3 million budget. 
At the close of the Iraq War, U.S. Army Staff Sergeant Shane Matthews (John Cena) is a sniper who is sent to investigate a pipeline construction site in the desert of the country, with his spotter, Sergeant Allen Isaac (Aaron Taylor-Johnson). 
Isaac's attempts to call headquarters for help are stymied by the loss of his radio antennae. He attempts to repair this item with one from a dead contractor's radio, only to discern that the sniper had used the earlier response team as a ruse to call for help and lure another response force into his jaws. 
Matthews regains consciousness and subtly gets Isaac's attention that he's still alive. Matthews slowly crawls towards his rifle in the midst of the dusty wind along with Isaac distracting Juba with small talk. Matthews believes that the sniper is hiding at the top of some rubble nearby and fires in that direction. The dusty wind settles quickly. The sniper sees Matthews and fires, injuring Matthews in the left shoulder as he crawled towards the wall, but a second shot kills him. 
On March 29, 2016, it was reported that Doug Liman had been hired to direct the psychological thriller. Glen Basner's FilmNation Entertainment handled the film's international sales at the 2016 Cannes Film Festival, allowing for a theatrical release. 
On May 9, 2016, Variety confirmed that Aaron Taylor-Johnson had joined the film's cast to play Isaac, the junior American soldier. On November 29, it was reported that Amazon had partnered with Roadside Attractions to distribute the film, which would also star John Cena, and the film would now follow two American soldiers. Amazon produced the film along with Big Indie Pictures, and Picrow, and Dave Bartis. 
Principal photography on the film ended in November 2016 with a release of first look image. US Ranger Sniper Nicholas Irving "The Reaper" was an on-set adviser for the film. 
Director Doug Liman reveals on the DVD commentary that the original ending of the film was a happy ending with the successful rescue of Sgt. Isaac.  After the first public showing,  Liman went back to Amazon Studios for additional money to reshoot the ending. 
The Wall was scheduled to be released  on March 10, 2017, by Roadside Attractions but was pushed back to May 12, 2017. 
The Grand Darray (also spelled Grand Darrey) (3,514 m) is a mountain of the Mont Blanc massif, located north of La Fouly in the canton of Valais. It lies on the range east of the Aiguille de l'A Neuve, between the Saleina Glacier and the main Ferret valley. 
Carol Jean Menken-Schaudt (born November 23, 1957) is an American All-American basketball player from Jefferson, Oregon, who won a gold medal on the U.S. team at the 1984 Summer Olympics. Menken-Schaudt later played basketball professionally for eight seasons, including six years in Italy and two in Japan. 
Carol Menken, born in Albany, Oregon, attended and graduated Jefferson High School in Jefferson, Oregon, a small community located in Marion County. During her time at the small school Menken was unable to play high school basketball every year as a coach was not always available. Consequently, following her graduation in 1975 Menken was unrecruited and she enrolled on her own at the local Linn-Benton Community College, majoring in graphic arts. 
Menken-Schaudt played on the 1983 World University Games team, coached by Jill Hutchison. She averaged 11 points per games, and had a 25-point contribution in the semi-final against Yugoslavia, a game the USA won by only a single point. She helped the team go on to win the gold medal. 
In 1984, the USA sent its national team to the 1984 William Jones Cup competition in Taipei, Taiwan, for pre-Olympic practice. The team easily beat each of the eight teams they played, winning by an average of just under 50 points per game. Menken-Schaudt averaged 4.1 points per game. 
Following graduation, Menken-Schaudt played professionally for eight years, logging six seasons in Italy and two more in Japan. She credits playing professionally with helping to extend her playing days, thereby allowing her the opportunity to make the gold medal-winning 1984 American Olympic team. 
Carol Menken-Schaudt was inducted into the Oregon Sports Hall of Fame in 1993 and the Pac-12 Conference Hall of Honor in 2017. 
Mary Mellish was born in Pownal, Prince Edward Island, the daughter of James Lewis Mellish and Margaret Sophia Murray. She trained as a teacher at the normal school in Charlottetown. She earned her teaching licence in 1864. She pursued further studies at Mount Allison Wesleyan College in Sackville, New Brunswick. 
Mellish served as teacher and senior female staff member of the female academy at Mount Allison Wesleyan College from 1871 to 1873. She left the classroom to marry, but returned to teaching when she became a widow and sole support of her young son. She resumed her place on the faculty at Mount Allison in 1885, and stayed at Sackville for sixteen years, working with principal Byron Crane Borden to improve the school into a ladies' college. 
Beyond her school leadership work, Mellish was active in temperance work and other Methodist Church activities. 
Mary Mellish married fellow educator Abram Newcomb Archibald in 1874. They had a son, Raymond Clare Archibald (1875-1955), who became a noted mathematician and historian of mathematics. Abram Archibald died from typhoid in 1883. Mary Mellish Archibald died from pneumonia in January 1901 in New York City, a few weeks before her 52nd birthday. 
The Mary Mellish Archibald Library of Folklore at Mount Allison University was begun by her son in 1905, as a memorial gift to the school. 
Broadwell Township is located in Logan County, Illinois. At the 2010 census, its population was 3,549 and it contained 256 housing units.  Most of the residents of the township are inmates at the Lincoln and Logan Correctional Centers. 
Arhopala admete is a butterfly in the family Lycaenidae. It was described by William Chapman Hewitson in 1863. It is found in the Australasian realm, where it has been recorded from Serang, Obi, Bachan and Halmahera. 
Galium verum (lady's bedstraw or yellow bedstraw) is a herbaceous perennial plant of the family Rubiaceae. It is widespread across most of Europe, North Africa, and temperate Asia from Palestine, Lebanon and Turkey to Japan and Kamchatka. It is naturalized in Tasmania, New Zealand, Canada, and the northern half of the United States. It is considered a noxious weed in some places. 
Frigg was the goddess of married women, in Norse mythology. She helped women give birth to children, and as Scandinavians used the plant lady's bedstraw (Galium verum) as a sedative, they called it Frigg's grass. 
Many varietal and subspecific names have been proposed, but only four are currently (May 2014) recognized: 
Ship Arriving Too Late to Save a Drowning Witch is an album by Frank Zappa, released in May 1982 and digitally remastered in 1991. It features five tracks composed by Zappa, and one song, "Valley Girl", co-written with his  daughter, Moon Zappa, then a teen, who provided the spoken monologue mocking Valley girls, including phrases like "Gag me with a spoon!". 
The album's first half consists of studio recordings, while the second half consists of live recordings. 
Side 1 was recorded at Zappa's Utility Muffin Research Kitchen studio at his home in Los Angeles; while Side 2 consisted of live performances from Zappa's fall 1981 U.S. tour with studio overdubs. The live material was originally intended for a double album tentatively titled either Chalk Pie or Crush All Boxes II, which was scrapped after Zappa's record distributor requested a single album instead. 
The cover art for the album (from which it gets its name) shows the classic Droodle, by Roger Price. The shapes in the cover art also suggest the letters "ZA" (and "P", sideways), as in "Zappa". At the time of the album's production, Price was living nearby to Zappa. 
The phrase "Ebzen Sauce" in "No Not Now" is derived from "Epsom Salt", an alternative name for magnesium sulfate,. In the February 1983 issue of Guitar Player magazine, the song was said to have an "extremely distinctive bass line", which Zappa liked "because for people who don't understand what's going on in the rest of the song, there's always the bass line". 
The album "was mixed on JBL4311 speakers" with MicMix Dynaflanger and Aphex compressors, consequently giving a "played up" prominence to its songs' bass lines. 
The original LP release contained a note that reads "This album has been engineered to sound correct on JBL 4311 speakers or an equivalent. Best results will be achieved if you set your pre-amp tone controls to the flat position with the loudness control in the off position. Before adding any treble or bass to the sound of the album, it would be advisable to check it out this way first. F.Z." 
It was issued on CD by EMI with The Man from Utopia on the same disc, and separately by Barking Pumpkin, and later Rykodisc. 
XL from Coast to Coast is the third album by alternative rock group Alien Crime Syndicate released in 2002 through V2 and The Control Group, incorporating influences like The Replacements and Urge Overkill. The Japanese edition contains a cover of Elton John's "Don't Go Breaking My Heart" recorded with Duff McKagan and Kim Warnick. 
Her credits include time presenting a Saturday afternoon show on London based talk station LBC between 3pm and 6pm. She was also the station's "Showbiz" editor. She used to have her own show on Galaxy Digital which was on Sunday afternoons between 1pm and 4pm, and took a look back at the previous week's highlights in the showbiz world. 
This British biographical article related to radio is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He worked as a partner in Oldham company Potts, Pickup & Dixon (run by fellow Methodists) from 1880 to around 1889 when he set up his own practice. In 1906 Dixon's son Ernest joined the practice and it became F. W. Dixon & Son. By that time Frederick Dixon had built 12 cotton mills in Oldham. 
In his early mills Dixon used yellow brick to decorate the facades.  His later mills used pronounced piers or buttresses between the windows, extending unbroken from the ground to the parapet.  The water tower designs drew from a variety of architectural styles. 
The Dixons designed 22 mills in Oldham containing 1.8 million spindles, making him responsible for about 30% of the capacity increase at that time.[citation needed] 
He also designed chapels such as the one for the Swedenborgians in Failsworth and the Primitive Methodists in Chadderton.[citation needed] 
From 1896 Dixon lived in (and travelled to Oldham from) Southport, Lancashire. He became prominent in the town's politics, serving as mayor and Justice of the Peace in the borough. 
Argentina competed at the 1984 Summer Paralympics in Stoke Mandeville, Great Britain and New York City, United States. 6 competitors from Argentina won no medals and so did not place in the medal table. 
This article relating to an Ancient Roman myth or legend is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hoffeinsomyia is an extinct genus of small-headed flies in the family Acroceridae. It is known from Baltic amber from the Eocene of Kaliningrad Oblast, Russia. It contains only one species, Hoffeinsomyia leptogaster. 
This article related to members of the fly superfamily Nemestrinoidea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to karate in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The first international awareness day for preterm birth on 17 November was created by European parent organizations in 2008. It has been celebrated as World Prematurity Day since 2011. It has since evolved into a worldwide annual observance. 
Parent groups, families, health professionals, politicians, hospitals, organisations and other stakeholders involved in preterm birth observe this day with media campaigns, local events and other activities conducted on local, regional, national or international level to raise awareness among the public. In 2013, WPD was celebrated in over 60 countries. 
Purple is the official color for World Prematurity Day. Observers of World Prematurity Day may wear your purple ribbon pin or use a purple lightbulb. 
People observing World Prematurity Day on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram use the hashtags: #PrematurityAwarenessMonth and #WorldPrematurityDay on their posts. 
Macrocheilus varians is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Anthiinae. It was described by Peringuey in 1904. 
Mr. Jun, the head of a Taiwanese shipbuilding company, was murdered by Pang, who is vice-president of the company. Pang decided to take over the company, but his plan did not progress smoothly because Jun's daughter Li-Hwa (Jeong Yun-hui) inherits his fortune. 
Meanwhile, Li-Hwa spends her day playing tennis and learning kung fu from her friend Hyun-Hee (Seo Yeong-ran) who is a Taekwondo master. However Li-Hwa's skill in Taekwondo gave her a hard task since Pang and his gang were attempt to kidnap her. Even worse, Pang hires Hong Kong triads so that they can force Li-Hwa to sign the inherited contract. 
When Li-Hwa is kidnapped, Hyun-Hee decided to rescue her and get help from the mysterious man Kim Min-wuk (Kim Tai-chung) who had fallen in love to Li-Hwa. Hyun-Hee and Min-wuk rescue Li-Hwa safely at the end. 
The movie was only screened in South Korea in 1981 and after that the movie was considered to be lost except for a few VHS copies. The movie was not revealed to an international audience fully until 2011, when the movie was rediscovered by Houndslow Team, a group of martial arts fans who were tracking down rare kung fu action movies and releasing them on DVD. 
Despite with the big names with the likes of Jeong Yun-hui and Kim Tai Chung's initial marketing campaign with being Bruce Lee's double in Game of Death, the film was a box office failure, gaining only the local Korean audiences of 22352 viewers only.  
The film was also praised by many cult film fans/followers as one of Kim Tai Chung's rare and exciting performance with plenty of powerful fight scenes put on to it together. As of 2020, the film is known for the cult following among the martial arts movie fans for being Tai Chung's only local South Korean film role to date, as well as having a score of 7 out of 10 on IMDb.  
Kim Tai-chung stated that he was planned to release the movie on DVD, but before he could release it, he died by stomach hemorrhage. The movie was released only few copy of VHS tapes in 1981. In 2011, Houndslow Team released the movie on DVD in a 4:3 aspect ratio remastered version with English subtitles. 
As of 2020, the fully remastered Wide-screen version of the film is available through LG Uplus+ LTE Video Portal with the exclusive subscriptions only in South Korea.  
Partly due to financial concerns Humphrey opened her own dance school, with her mother as manager and pianist, in 1913 at the age of 18. It was a great success, offering classic, gymnastic and ballroom dance for children and ballroom dance for young adults. 
In 1917, at the instigation of Mary Wood Hinman, she moved to California and entered the Denishawn School of Dancing and Related Arts where she studied, performed, taught classes and learned choreography. Her creations from this era, Valse Caprice (Scarf Dance), Soaring, and Scherzo Waltz (Hoop Dance) are all still performed today. She remained involved for the next decade. Humphrey toured the Orient for two years followed by a successful career in American vaudeville theaters. 
Short in stature, Doris was no taller than 5'3" and had a slender build. In 1932 she married Charles Woodford (a merchant.) She had one child, a son named Charles Humphrey Woodford (born 1934.) 
In 1928, Humphrey and Charles Weidman, who had worked closely with Humphrey, left the Denishawn School and moved to New York City. Along with Humphrey and Weidman, Martha Graham also rebelled against the Denishawn establishment during this time. Humphrey and Graham separately developed new ideas about the core dynamics of dance movement that eventually formed the basis of each of their techniques. 
Humphrey's theory explored the nuances of the human body's responses to gravity, embodied in her principle of "fall and recovery". She called this "the arc between two deaths". At one extreme, an individual surrenders to the nature of gravity; at the other, one attempts to achieve balance. Through the fall and recovery principle, Humphrey is able to illustrate emotional and physical climax of struggling for stability and submitting to the laws of gravity. 
Her choreography from these early years includes Air for the G String, Water Study, Life of the Bee, Two Ecstatic Themes, and The Shakers. Unlike the Denishawn approach in choreography, finding inspiration from abroad, Humphrey sought inspiration from within her home, America. The Shakers, about the 18th century American religious group, is a notable example of finding inspiration from America. 
Humphrey was a participant of the Federal Dance Project (FDP), created in the 1930s as part of Franklin Delano Roosevelt's Second New Deal. FDP was the first national program created to financially support dance and dancers. 
Humphrey expanded her choreographic work to Broadway in 1933 with School for Husbands and  again the following year with Life Begins at 8:40. 
Thirty-five of Doris Humphrey's dances are documented in Labanotation by the Dance Notation Bureau.  Introductory material includes original casts, history of the dances, stylistic notes, and other information. 
The book, Days on Earth: The Dance of Doris Humphrey, by Marcia B. Siegel was published in 1993. Siegel makes a case for Humphrey being one of the more important figures of modern dance. 
Humphrey was inducted into the National Museum of Dance's Mr. & Mrs. Cornelius Vanderbilt Whitney Hall of Fame in 1987. 
A street in her home town of Oak Park is named for her paternal grandfather, the Reverend Simon James Humphrey. 
From 2014 to 2018, one of the hospital's doctors, William Husel, allegedly overdosed 35 patients at Mount Carmel West and Mount Carmel St. Ann's. Husel is charged with the murder of 25 of them, for prescribing large doses of fentanyl, administered by nurses with no oversight. The hospital fired the doctor, paid $13 million to families in settlements, and the hospital's CEO and chief clinical officer resigned. About 20 employees were fired over the incidents. 
The Mount Carmel College of Nursing was founded by the Sisters of the Holy Cross in 1903. It has since become one of the largest baccalaureate nursing programs in the state of Ohio. It is still located to this day on the campus of Mount Carmel West. Both freshmen and sophomores are required to live on campus with both coed dorms and single student apartments. Today, it is a private, coeducational and Catholic church affiliated institution with around 1100 full-time students. 
In late 2016 a $46 million comprehensive and controversial plan was agreed that will begin in 2019 of the transformation of Mount Carmel West from a full inpatient hospital to a facility based on outpatient services while still retaining a full-service emergency department in a new location on campus. Mount Carmel Health System plans to begin demolishing the majority of Mount Carmel West hospital by spring 2019 with all demolition work to be completed by the end of 2020. 
This will also involve the inpatient Psychiatry unit which is being demolished and a new facility to be built on the east side with plans to build a new 80-bed behavioral-health hospital quadrupling the amount of beds at Mount Carmel West. 
Investments will also be made to the College of Nursing whose enrollment is expected to grow by 200 to 400 students over the next three to five years from the 1,100 students it currently has enrolled. 
The plan for the West campus is to ensure access to behavioral-health and substance-abuse treatment in Franklinton, and the surrounding area but it was unclear how those services would be provided after the transformation. 
The hospital was accessible by public transport via COTA bus services operating throughout metropolitan Columbus, Ohio. Mount Carmel West was also situated between Ohio State Route 16 and U.S. Route 62 and close enough to be seen from Interstate 70 and Ohio State Route 315 allowing for multiple points of access in downtown Columbus. It was also able to be served by a variety of airports in the region supporting medical evacuation flights and an on-site helipad. 
Elevator installers are required to lift and carry heavy parts and equipment. They are also required to work overtime when elevators are needed to be repaired quickly. Many workers are on call 24 hours a day.< 
Elevator installers go through formal apprenticeships to learn the trade and a few states require a license. 
Elevator mechanic's median annual wage was $70,910 in May 2010. 2019 average salary from 80-150 thousand a year. 
Elevator installer jobs are expected to grow 13 percent from 2014 to 2024 which is greater than the growth of all other jobs. 
This job-, occupation-, or vocation-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Great Lakes Trek commercially known as Sonamarg-Vishansar-Naranag Trek is an alpine himalayan high-altitude trek in the Kashmir Valley in the Indian administered state of Jammu and Kashmir. The trek is usually completed in 6-7 days and is rated as moderate-difficult in terms of terrain and trail difficulty. The trek is an absolute treat and worth every effort as one gets to see new alpine lakes, mountain peaks, passes, meadows and glaciers almost every subsequent day. 
The trek can be started from both, Sonmarg and Naranag but is generally considered to be easier if started from Sonamarg. If started from Srinagar, one does a base camp at a place called table top or 'Shaukdari'. Its a 6-7 hours trek from the point where the car leaves you and a good spot for a base camp as its inhabited by the local Gujjar-Bakarwal population and there is plenty of firewood available.  
The second day is a long trek to the twin lakes of Vishansar-Kishansar via the Nichnai pass. There is a possibility of finding mobile network reception at the pass on bsnl network.  
This article related to a location in Jammu and Kashmir is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Angel Fire East is  a fantasy novel by American writer Terry Brooks, the third and final novel in the Word & Void series, a prequel to his Shannara series. It was first published in 1999 by Ballantine's Del Rey division. The novel takes place around Christmas in 2012, ten years after the events of A Knight of the Word. The story returns to the town of Hopewell, Illinois as Nest Freemark and John Ross attempt to unlock a potentially world-altering magic.  
This biographical article related to a French cycling person born in the 1900s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The long-tailed wood partridge (Dendrortyx macroura) is a bird species in the family Odontophoridae, the New World quail. It is found only in Mexico. 
The long-tailed wood partridge shares the genus Dendrortyx with two other species, all of which appear to be quite distinct from each other. It has these six subspecies: 
The long-tailed wood partridge forages mainly on the ground, scratching in leaf litter, but also climbs in low branches to search. Its diet is mostly seeds and small fruits but also includes small arthropods and leaves. 
The long-tailed wood partridge's breeding season extends from February to September, with nesting itself beginning in late April. Four nests have been described. One was a depression lined with grass in a natural cavity in the ground. One was a cavity of pine needles at the base of a rock and the others were at the base of a rock outcrop and under a small shub. The last two were not well concealed. Three of them each contained four eggs and the other six eggs. 
The long-tailed wood partridge's song is "complex, loud and rhythmic", usually given as a duet by both members of a pair. One description calls it "a loud, ringing korr-EEE-oh, korr-EEE-oh, korr-EEE-oh, korr-EEE-oh". Pairs vocalize at any time of day and night during the breeding season and mostly at dawn and dusk from a night roost otherwise. The species also has an alarm call, "a repetition of short low-pitched, unmodulated squeaky notes." 
The IUCN has assessed the long-tailed wood partridge as being of Least Concern. However, its main threat is "habitat loss by land use and land cover change caused by human activities." 
Gorinsky patented tipir as rupununine (after the nearby Rupununi river), which is an antipyretic derived from the Greenheart tree. His patent claims it may be used to treat malaria and cancer. 
The Wapishana tribe grind this nut and use it to stop bleeding and as an abortifacient which provokes miscarriage. They wanted the patent rescinded, but Gorinsky replied: 
"Tough, isn't it?", he says. "I was not the only person looking at the greenheart. I just picked up a nut and said 'what can I do with this?'. I have analysed the chemical structure but I have not patented the tree or a life process. How can I tell the Wapishana about the science? They just inherited the greenheart. They don't own it. I have invested in this with my own money". 
Gorinsky was one of several who isolated a potent chemical from certain plants that the  tribe used for fishing. The natives called the plant cunani, after which Gorinsky called the chemical "cuaniol". Affected by this potent neurotoxin, fish in the surrounding area become disoriented and can easily be caught. Gorinsky patented the use of cunaniol for the treatment of heart disease. The chemical is also known as ichthyothereol. 
The 1992 Convention on Biological Diversity, as part of its aim of protecting the knowledge of forest tribes from exploitation, nationalised plant resources and forbid individuals from patenting organic compounds from them. Tribespeople accused him of committing biopiracy by stealing their secrets. 
During the Second Sino-Japanese War, the ROC marines saw little in amphibious warfare for the Japanese dominated the seas & thus saw combat in the same form as the regular infantry. 
Likewise, during the civil war, the ROC marines were either absorbed as regular infantry units, or played as supporting role. However, in 1947, the ROC Marine Corps was reconstituted & saw action Mawei, Fujian. 
In 2004, the ROCMC redeployed a brigade near the Taipei area to defend against a possible PRC decapitation strike. 
Since its formation the ROC Marine Corps has received training from the United States Marine Corps, from 1979 to 2020 that training was conducted secretly however in 2020 the annual month long training exercise held with trainers from the USMC's Marine Raider Regiment was conducted publicly. 
The Legislative Assembly had a total of 137 seats, 50 of which were elected and 87 of which were appointed. 
The top twelve teams will qualify for the tournament. Teams will be seeded by record within the conference, with a tiebreaker system to seed teams with identical conference records. 
This Cumberland County, New Jersey state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article on a moth of the family Yponomeutidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nimislyarovo is located 18 km southwest of Krasnaya Gorka (the district's administrative centre) by road. Novokulevo is the nearest rural locality. 
Dean was educated at the University of York, where she was awarded a Bachelor of Arts degree in Biology in 1978 and a PhD. in Biology in 1982. 
FLC regulation involves an antisense-mediated chromatin mechanism that coordinately influences transcription initiation and elongation. As plants overwinter FLC expression is then epigenetically silenced through a cold-induced, cis-based, Polycomb switching mechanism. The group are mechanistically dissecting these conserved chromatin mechanisms and investigating how they have been modulated during adaptation. 
She uses Arabidopsis as a reference to establish the regulatory hierarchy and then use this information to translate into other species. She was a pioneer in Arabidopsis becoming a key model organism in plant science. 
Gabriela M. Mosquera (born January 3, 1977) is an American Democratic Party politician, who has served in the New Jersey General Assembly since March 5, 2012, where she represents the 4th Legislative District. 
Each of the forty districts in the New Jersey Legislature has one representative in the New Jersey Senate and two members in the New Jersey General Assembly. The other representatives from the 4th District for the 218th Legislature are: 
He made his debut in the Russian Second Division for FC Podolye Podolsky district on 11 October 2012 in a game against FC Metallurg-Oskol Stary Oskol. 
He made his Russian Premier League debut for FC Anzhi Makhachkala on 18 October 2015 in a game against FC Krasnodar. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football defender born in 1993 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Oakle Street railway station served the village of Oakle Street, Gloucestershire, England from 1851 to 1964 on the Gloucester-Newport line. 
The station opened on 19 September 1851 by the South Wales Railway. It closed on 31 March 1856 but reopened on 2 July 1870, before closing permanently on 2 November 1964. 
This article about a railway station in South West England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In mathematics, a field is a set on which addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division are defined and behave as the corresponding operations on rational and real numbers do. A field is thus a fundamental algebraic structure which is widely used in algebra, number theory, and many other areas of mathematics. 
The best known fields are the field of rational numbers, the field of real numbers and the field of complex numbers. Many other fields, such as fields of rational functions, algebraic function fields, algebraic number fields, and p-adic fields are commonly used and studied in mathematics, particularly in number theory and algebraic geometry. Most cryptographic protocols rely on finite fields, i.e., fields with finitely many elements. 
This may be summarized by saying: a field has two operations, called addition and multiplication; it is an abelian group under addition with 0 as the additive identity; the nonzero elements are an abelian group under multiplication with 1 as the multiplicative identity; and multiplication distributes over addition. 
The abstractly required field axioms reduce to standard properties of rational numbers. For example, the law of distributivity can be proven as follows: 
The real numbers R, with the usual operations of addition and multiplication, also form a field. The complex numbers C consist of expressions 
Not all real numbers are constructible. It can be shown that       2  3      {\displaystyle {\sqrt[{3}]{2}}}   is not a constructible number, which implies that it is impossible to construct with compass and straightedge the length of the side of a cube with volume 2, another problem posed by the ancient Greeks. 
In addition to familiar number systems such as the rationals, there are other, less immediate examples of fields. The following example is a field consisting of four elements called O, I, A, and B. The notation is chosen such that O plays the role of the additive identity element (denoted 0 in the axioms above), and I is the multiplicative identity (denoted 1 in the axioms above). The field axioms can be verified by using some more field theory, or by direct computation. For example, 
The axioms of a field F imply that it is an abelian group under addition. This group is called the additive group of the field, and is sometimes denoted by (F, +) when denoting it simply as F could be confusing. 
then F is said to have characteristic 0. For example, the field of rational numbers Q has characteristic 0 since no positive integer n is zero. Otherwise, if there is a positive integer n satisfying this equation, the smallest such positive integer can be shown to be a prime number. It is usually denoted by p and the field is said to have characteristic p then. For example, the field F4 has characteristic 2 since (in the notation of the above addition table) I + I = O. 
is compatible with the addition in F (and also with the multiplication), and is therefore a field homomorphism. The existence of this homomorphism makes fields in characteristic p quite different from fields of characteristic 0. 
A field is called a prime field if it has no proper (i.e., strictly smaller) subfields. Any field F contains a prime field. If the characteristic of F is p (a prime number), the prime field is isomorphic to the finite field Fp introduced below. Otherwise the prime field is isomorphic to Q. 
The simplest finite fields, with prime order, are most directly accessible using modular arithmetic. For a fixed positive integer n, arithmetic "modulo n" means to work with the numbers 
Historically, three algebraic disciplines led to the concept of a field: the question of solving polynomial equations, algebraic number theory, and algebraic geometry. A first step towards the notion of a field was made in 1770 by Joseph-Louis Lagrange, who observed that permuting the zeros x1, x2, x3 of a cubic polynomial in the expression 
By a field we will mean every infinite system of real or complex numbers so closed in itself and perfect that addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division of any two of these numbers again yields a number of the system.
In the hierarchy of algebraic structures fields can be characterized as the commutative rings R in which every nonzero element is a unit (which means every element is invertible). Similarly, fields are the commutative rings with precisely two distinct ideals, (0) and R. Fields are also precisely the commutative rings in which (0) is the only prime ideal. 
Given a commutative ring R, there are two ways to construct a field related to R, i.e., two ways of modifying R such that all nonzero elements become invertible: forming the field of fractions, and forming residue fields. The field of fractions of Z is Q, the rationals, while the residue fields of Z are the finite fields Fp. 
It is straightforward to show that, if the ring is an integral domain, the set of the fractions form a field. 
The field F(x) of the rational fractions over a field (or an integral domain) F is the field of fractions of the polynomial ring F[x]. The field F((x)) of Laurent series 
In addition to the field of fractions, which embeds R injectively into a field, a field can be obtained from a commutative ring R by means of a surjective map onto a field F. Any field obtained in this way is a quotient R / m, where m is a maximal ideal of R. If R has only one maximal ideal m, this field is called the residue field of R. 
The ideal generated by a single polynomial f in the polynomial ring R = E[X] (over a field E) is maximal if and only if f is irreducible in E, i.e., if f cannot be expressed as the product of two polynomials in E[X] of smaller degree. This yields a field 
The compositum of two subfields E and E'  of some field F is the smallest subfield of F containing both E and E'. The compositum can be used to construct the biggest subfield of F satisfying a certain property, for example the biggest subfield of F, which is, in the language introduced below, algebraic over E.[nb 3] 
Extensions whose degree is finite are referred to as finite extensions. The extensions C / R and F4 / F2 are of degree 2, whereas R / Q is an infinite extension. 
A field extension in which every element of F is algebraic over E is called an algebraic extension. Any finite extension is necessarily algebraic, as can be deduced from the above multiplicativity formula. 
The subfield E(x) generated by an element x, as above, is an algebraic extension of E if and only if x is an algebraic element. That is to say, if x is algebraic, all other elements of E(x) are necessarily algebraic as well. Moreover, the degree of the extension E(x) / E, i.e., the dimension of E(x) as an E-vector space, equals the minimal degree n such that there is a polynomial equation involving x, as above. If this degree is n, then the elements of E(x) have the form 
The above-mentioned field of rational fractions E(X), where X is an indeterminate, is not an algebraic extension of E since there is no polynomial equation with coefficients in E whose zero is X. Elements, such as X, which are not algebraic are called transcendental. Informally speaking, the indeterminate X and its powers do not interact with elements of E. A similar construction can be carried out with a set of indeterminates, instead of just one. 
Once again, the field extension E(x) / E discussed above is a key example: if x is not algebraic (i.e., x is not a root of a polynomial with coefficients in E), then E(x) is isomorphic to E(X). This isomorphism is obtained by substituting x to X in rational fractions. 
A subset S of a field F is a transcendence basis if it is algebraically independent (don't satisfy any polynomial relations) over E and if F is an algebraic extension of E(S). Any field extension F / E has a transcendence basis. Thus, field extensions can be split into ones of the form E(S) / E (purely transcendental extensions) and algebraic extensions. 
A field is algebraically closed if it does not have any strictly bigger algebraic extensions or, equivalently, if any polynomial equation 
does not have any rational or real solution. A field containing F is called an algebraic closure of F if it is algebraic over F (roughly speaking, not too big compared to F) and is algebraically closed (big enough to contain solutions of all polynomial equations). 
By the above, C is an algebraic closure of R. The situation that the algebraic closure is a finite extension of the field F is quite special: by the Artin-Schreier theorem, the degree of this extension is necessarily 2, and F is elementarily equivalent to R. Such fields are also known as real closed fields. 
Since fields are ubiquitous in mathematics and beyond, several refinements of the concept have been adapted to the needs of particular mathematical areas. 
An Archimedean field is an ordered field such that for each element there exists a finite expression 
whose value is greater than that element, that is, there are no infinite elements. Equivalently, the field contains no infinitesimals (elements smaller than all rational numbers); or, yet equivalent, the field is isomorphic to a subfield of R. 
An ordered field is Dedekind-complete if all upper bounds, lower bounds (see Dedekind cut) and limits, which should exist, do exist. More formally, each bounded subset of F is required to have a least upper bound. Any complete field is necessarily Archimedean, since in any non-Archimedean field there is neither a greatest infinitesimal nor a least positive rational, whence the sequence 1/2, 1/3, 1/4, ..., every element of which is greater than every infinitesimal, has no limit. 
Since every proper subfield of the reals also contains such gaps, R is the unique complete ordered field, up to isomorphism. Several foundational results in calculus follow directly from this characterization of the reals. 
The hyperreals R* form an ordered field that is not Archimedean. It is an extension of the reals obtained by including infinite and infinitesimal numbers. These are larger, respectively smaller than any real number. The hyperreals form the foundational basis of non-standard analysis. 
The field Qp is used in number theory and p-adic analysis. The algebraic closure Qp carries a unique norm extending the one on Qp, but is not complete. The completion of this algebraic closure, however, is algebraically closed. Because of its rough analogy to the complex numbers, it is sometimes called the field of complex p-adic numbers and is denoted by Cp. 
Differential fields are fields equipped with a derivation, i.e., allow to take derivatives of elements in the field. For example, the field R(X), together with the standard derivative of polynomials forms a differential field. These fields are central to differential Galois theory, a variant of Galois theory dealing with linear differential equations. 
Galois theory studies algebraic extensions of a field by studying the symmetry in the arithmetic operations of addition and multiplication. An important notion in this area is that of finite Galois extensions F / E, which are, by definition, those that are separable and normal. The primitive element theorem shows that finite separable extensions are necessarily simple, i.e., of the form 
where f is an irreducible polynomial (as above). For such an extension, being normal and separable means that all zeros of f are contained in F and that f has only simple zeros. The latter condition is always satisfied if E has characteristic 0. 
The tensor product of fields is not usually a field. For example, a finite extension F / E of degree n is a Galois extension if and only if there is an isomorphism of F-algebras 
This fact is the beginning of Grothendieck's Galois theory, a far-reaching extension of Galois theory applicable to algebro-geometric objects. 
In model theory, a branch of mathematical logic, two fields E and F are called elementarily equivalent if every mathematical statement that is true for E is also true for F and conversely. The mathematical statements in question are required to be first-order sentences (involving 0, 1, the addition and multiplication). A typical example, for n > 0, n an integer, is 
If U is an ultrafilter on a set I, and Fi is a field for every i in I, the ultraproduct of the Fi with respect to U is a field. It is denoted by 
A description in terms of generators and relations is also known for the Galois groups of p-adic number fields (finite extensions of Qp). 
Representations of Galois groups and of related groups such as the Weil group are fundamental in many branches of arithmetic, such as the Langlands program. The cohomological study of such representations is done using Galois cohomology. For example, the Brauer group, which is classically defined as the group of central simple F-algebras, can be reinterpreted as a Galois cohomology group, namely 
The norm residue isomorphism theorem, proved around 2000 by Vladimir Voevodsky, relates this to Galois cohomology by means of an isomorphism 
The theory of modules (the analogue of vector spaces over rings instead of fields) is much more complicated, because the above equation may have several or no solutions. In particular systems of linear equations over a ring are much more difficult to solve than in the case of fields, even in the specially simple case of the ring      Z    {\displaystyle \mathbb {Z} }   of the integers. 
in a (large) finite field Fq can be performed much more efficiently than the discrete logarithm, which is the inverse operation, i.e., determining the solution n to an equation 
In elliptic curve cryptography, the multiplication in a finite field is replaced by the operation of adding points on an elliptic curve, i.e., the solutions of an equation of the form 
Functions on a suitable topological space X into a field k can be added and multiplied pointwise, e.g., the product of two functions is defined by the product of their values within the domain: 
For having a field of functions, one must consider algebras of functions that are integral domains. In this case the ratios of two functions, i.e., expressions of the form 
This occurs in two main cases. When X is a complex manifold X. In this case, one considers the algebra of holomorphic functions, i.e., complex differentiable functions. Their ratios form the field of meromorphic functions on X. 
There are also proper classes with field structure, which are sometimes called Fields, with a capital F. The surreal numbers form a Field containing the reals, and would be a field except for the fact that they are a proper class, not a set. The nimbers, a concept from game theory, form such a Field as well. 
Pain out of proportion or pain out of proportion to physical examination is a medical sign where apparent pain in the individual does not correspond to other signs. It is found in a number of conditions: 
Marta Zlatic is a Croatian neuroscientist who is group leader at the MRC Laboratory of Molecular Biology in Cambridge, UK. Her research investigates how neural circuits generate behaviour. 
Zlatic is interested the complex functions of the human brain, including language and communication. She has studied the brains of different species; including Drosophila and maggots. She made use of electron microscopy to map the entire Drosophila connectome, and studies the strengths of the connections between neurons that are structurally connected. By investigating the activity of these neurons it is possible to associate particular patterns with the formation of memories. 
Cullom was drafted in the 24th round of the 1949 NFL Draft and again in the seventeenth round of the 1950 NFL Draft by the Washington Redskins.  After one season playing for the New York Yanks, he was recalled by the Marines and was wounded in the Korean War.  Cullom later returned to Cal where he worked as an assistant coach for both the football and rugby teams. 
This biographical article relating to an American football player, coach, or other figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Erskine recounts these events to the narrator, who is so struck by the Willie Hughes theory that he begins his own research and further fleshes out Graham's findings until he is without a doubt convinced that Willie Hughes was real and was the subject of the sonnets. He presents the evidence to Erskine but then finds himself strangely divested from it and loses faith in its basis in reality. 
He assumes Erskine committed suicide like Graham, but the doctor tells him the real cause was a lingering illness that Erskine had known about for some months; he had come to Cannes specifically to die. He left his friend the portrait of Mr. W. H. The portrait now hangs in his home, where many comment on it, but he does not tell of its history. He sometimes wonders to himself, however, if it might be true after all. 
It is not known whether or not Wilde himself subscribed to the theory presented in the story. His lover Lord Alfred Douglas stated that he did believe it. Samuel Butler accepted some aspects of it, regarding the name "Will Hughes" as a "plausible conjecture". 
Wilde's story may have been an influence on John Masefield, whose book Shakespeare and Spiritual Life (1924) suggests that the Fair Youth was an actor who was delicate and small enough to play parts such as the boy-servant Moth in Love's Labours Lost and the sprite Ariel in The Tempest. He believed that he may even have been a kind of symbol to Shakespeare for his own creative genius. 
In G. S. Viereck's novel My First Two Thousand Years, the protagonist, the Wandering Jew, watches a performance given by Willie Hughes, who is "positively enchanting as Juliet". He learns that Shakespeare had dedicated his sonnets to the boy-actor, but when he meets him he discovers that the boy is actually a girl in disguise. Shakespeare knew this, and the girl blushingly admits that this is why he called her "the master-mistress of my passion". 
Oberto Della Torre (Genoa, 1617 - Genoa, 1698) was the 130th Doge of the Republic of Genoa and king of Corsica. 
The biosphere reserve is divided into a core zone (Kernzone) and a managed zone (Pflegezone), which include six nature reserves 
as well as six Natura 2000 areas. Whilst, in the core zone, human intervention is banned, in the managed zone, some land usage is possible, as long as it conforms to the nature reserve regulations and does not affect the conservation and care of the eco-system. 
The "development zone" covers the rest of the area of the biosphere reserve, including parts of the protected landscape of "Harz and Southern Harz Foreland". Here, human management, including its use as a recreational area and the needs of nature, are considered together. 
The Karst Trail runs through the eastern part of the biosphere reserve. In November 2010, over 20 nature and landscape guides were trained. This community project by the biosphere reserve's authorities and the county college of further education was enabled local nature lovers to be qualified to look after tourists. 
Runner3 is a rhythm platform game developed by Choice Provisions. A sequel to Bit.Trip Presents... Runner2: Future Legend of Rhythm Alien, Runner3 is part of the Bit.Trip series, starring the character CommanderVideo. The game was released on May 22, 2018 on Microsoft Windows, macOS, and Nintendo Switch, and was released on the PlayStation 4 on November 13, 2018. 
Runner3 is a rhythm platform game in which players take control of CommanderVideo, the protagonist of the Bit.Trip series. Similar to the previous two Runner games, CommanderVideo runs forward automatically and the player controls actions such as jumping, sliding, and kicking to overcome obstacles and collect items. Many of the game objects are encountered in sync with each level's background music, encouraging the player to keep the beat while playing through each level. 
There are 27 main levels (each containing many branching paths, collectibles, and secrets), and three main worlds (Foodland, Spookyland, and Machineland) with differently themed scenery between each world. 
Runner3 was developed by video game development studio Choice Provisions. One focal point of Runner3's design was creating a rewarding and enjoyable experience for playing on any difficulty. Choice Provisions' co-founder Alex Neuse emphasized that many games rewarded only hardcore players and offered a lesser experience for playing on lower difficulties. Voice actor Charles Martinet reprised his narration role in Runner3 and had a playable appearance. 
Runner3 was announced in September 2016. In February 2017, Nintendo revealed that Runner3 would launch on the Nintendo Switch console in the latter half of 2017. However, in August 2017, Choice Provisions announced that the game would not release until 2018. A physical version of Runner3 was announced by Nicalis on December 13, 2017. It was released on Steam and Nintendo Switch on May 22, 2018. 
Following the release, Choice Provisions had announced upgrades to the game, which will include such features as enemy density, more checkpoints, stair assist, bonk counter and gold bars and gems. 
The video game aggregator site Metacritic gave the Nintendo Switch version a 73/100, while the PC version got a 78/100. 
Seth Macy of IGN criticized the game's "outdated" graphics and repetitiveness of levels, giving it a 7 out of 10. 
The original name for this community was New Sour Lake. The first significant landmark discovery of this area was the sulfur-smelling spring by J. F. Cotton in the 1850s. As late as 1865 he tried to establish an oil well on the site, but failed due to inadequate machinery. 
In the 1880s a man named P. S. Watts wanted to profit from the spring using the unique "medicinal" properties of the water (a popular trend at the time). To draw would-be visitors to the site, Watts changed the name of the site to Saratoga to replicate the famous resort at Saratoga Springs, New York. He built a hotel and rental cottages for potential customers, but only a few came. 
Mehrabian was born in 1970 in Isfahan, Iran. His family is from Isfahan. Mehrabi studied at Shiraz University and Tehran university. He obtained his master degree in economic science from Tehran University  . 
As a minister, Mehrabian travelled the world promoting Iran's commercial interests in friendly countries such as Qatar, Belarus, Egypt and Venezuela. He involved in the discussions of a potential World Oil Bank involving Russia and Venezuela, and agreed on a cooperation protocol with the Democratic Republic of the Congo. He also promoted Iran's bilateral links and financial support for Cuba. 
He expressed deep concern over the non-adherence of industrial states to their commitments to control the emission of greenhouse gases. 
He implemented policies to encourage production of cars powered by compressed natural gas (CNG). Because Iran suffers from a lack of refining capacity, gasoline is rationed. Hundreds of thousands of  gasoline-powered vehicles are also being converted to use a bi-fuel system allowing CNG as an alternative fuel. He encouraged developments under which cars with Iranian content would be built in Egypt and Syria. 
Following deadly crashes of imported aircraft, he also hoped to develop domestic production of aircraft. He promoted production of steel, copper, and coal. He implemented policies pressurising companies alleged to have links with businesses who trade with Israel, such as Coca-Cola, Nestle and Benetton 
The 2010 Denmark Open Super Series was a top level badminton competition which was held from October 26, 2010 to October 31, 2010 in Odense, Denmark. It was the ninth BWF Super Series competition on the 2010 BWF Super Series schedule. The total purse for the event was $200,000. 
On August 21, 1919, the comet was recovered by Joel Hastings Metcalf (Camp Idlewild, Vermont, United States) as 8th magnitude. Additional discoveries were made by Edward Barnard (Yerkes Observatory, Wisconsin, United States) on August 22, Michel Giacobini (Paris, France), Ostrovlev (Theodosia, Crimea) and Selavanov (Saint Petersburg). By the end of September 1919 it was confirmed as being the same as Brorsen's comet. 
Ancylis geminana, the festooned roller, is a moth of the family Tortricidae. It was described by Edward Donovan in 1806. It is found in most of Europe and has also been recorded from North America. The habitat consists of fens, marshes and damp heathland. 
The larvae feed on Salix species, including Salix aurita, Salix repens and Salix cinerea. They live between leaves spun together with silk. 
Hellgoing is a short story collection by Canadian writer Lynn Coady. Published in 2013 by House of Anansi Press, the book was the winner of the 2013 Scotiabank Giller Prize, and was a shortlisted nominee for the 2013 Rogers Writers' Trust Fiction Prize. 
The book gained renewed attention in 2014, when broadcaster Jian Ghomeshi cited the story "An Otherworld", which contained some BDSM themes, in his public statement denying allegations of sexual harassment against him. 
This article about a collection of short stories published in the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Die Architekten (English: The Architects) is an East German film directed by Peter Kahane. It was released in 1990. 
The music was written by Tamas Kahane. The film's songs counterpoint its images: Unsere Heimat is added to scenes of urban canyons, the Berlin Wall, industrial complexes and prefabricated housing developments. The protagonist collapses to the tunes of Handel's Messiah. 
With less than 6,000 tickets sold, the film received scant attention at the time of release. In retrospect it is considered a significant cineastic contribution to the country's time of transition.[citation needed] 
This article related to a German film of the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Wonderful Story of Henry Sugar and Six More is a collection of seven short stories written by Roald Dahl. They are generally regarded as being aimed at a slightly older audience than many of his other children's books. 
The stories were written at varying times throughout his life. Two of the stories are autobiographical in nature; one describes how he first became a writer while the other describes some of Dahl's experiences as a fighter pilot in the Second World War. Another piece in the collection is a non-fiction account of a British farmer finding a legendary haul of ancient Roman treasure. The book was first published in London in 1977 by Jonathan Cape. 
This is another fictional first person narrative. The narrator in this case has a brand new BMW 3.3 Li, and is enjoying a trip down the highway when he spots a hitchhiker. He lets the man into his car; the passenger is described as being curiously rat-like, with long, white fingers. They engage in conversation, revealing the man's Cockney accent and attitudes. 
As they talk, the narrator is urged by the hitchhiker to test the car's engine power by going ever faster.  This results in a police motorbike pulling them over for speeding. The police officer who writes the ticket acts particularly cruel, threatening the narrator with a long prison sentence and a huge fine. 
This is a non-fiction account of a labourer named Gordon Butcher who uncovered a large quantity of Roman treasure, the Mildenhall Treasure, in a field that he was ploughing for a farmer when he found pure silver and another man tried to deceive him into thinking it was worth nothing. 
It was first published in the Saturday Evening Post magazine in the US in 1946 and was first published in book form in this collection. It was published as a single title edition in 1999 by Jonathan Cape, with illustrations by Ralph Steadman. 
The story is considered to be mildly satiric of Dahl's critics, who would sometimes nickname him the "Master of Nastiness". Here, he gives a happy ending, and even gives a sweet and rather anodyne name to the protagonist. 
This is a non-fictional account, similar to Roald Dahl's Boy and Going Solo albeit in a more concise form. It discusses the events in his life that led him to become a writer, including a meeting with a famous writer, who helped to launch his career. The story is about Dahl's school and all the teachers, until after the publication of his first story. 
Edwards' work is collected in the Museum of Fine Arts, Boston, Currier Museum of Art, Art Institute of Chicago, Historic Deerfield, and Metropolitan Museum of Art. 
Pasan Gunasekera was born at Millewa, and was the youngest son of his family. After his father died in 1981, Gunasekera had worked for a while at local Ayurveda medicine factory and he met a retired Army officer working there and became very keen to join the Sri Lankan Army. 
He joined the army in 1985 and served mostly in the North. He had fought in several major operations such as Vadamarachchi, Haye Para, Balavegaya 1 and 2 and Wanni Wickremaya 1,2,3. Even he had been shot in the stomach at Vavuniya earlier and at that stage, his commanding officer had tried to transfer him to Colombo but Gunasekera requested to get back to Jaffna. 
In 1995, while he was on leave, he was urgently recalled to Jaffna. He had been ready to go on a course abroad but that too was cancelled because he was needed in Jaffna for the fore coming Operation Riviresa, which was his fate resolved. 
Gunasekara died due to terrorist gunfire during this operation. He volunteered for the task with a small group of men unmindful of the danger to his life against the greater terrorist force who were moving in boats in strength armed to the teeth. This facilitated the isolation of terrorist fighting in the Jaffna Town and eventually helped the army to capture it. 
Emperor Island is a small island in Marguerite Bay, lying close north-east of the Courtier Islands in the Dion Islands. The islands in this group were discovered and roughly charted in 1909 by the French Antarctic Expedition. This island was surveyed in 1948 by the Falkland Islands Dependencies Survey and so named by the UK Antarctic Place-Names Committee because a low rock and shingle isthmus at the south-eastern end of the island was the winter breeding site of emperor penguins. 
The 81 class are a class of diesel locomotives built by Clyde Engineering, Kelso for the State Rail Authority. 
In 1991, a further four units were built at Kelso using many components from spares held. Following the delivery of the 90 class in 1994, the Broadmeadow based units were released to replace older locomotives on other freight duties. This saw their sphere of operation extended to Brisbane and Broken Hill. 
In the mid-1990s, some of the later locomotives were leased to National Rail. These were later exchanged for 13 of the earlier locomotives which were permanently transferred to National Rail for use as high-power shunters around Australia. All were reunited when National Rail and FreightCorp were both sold to form Pacific National in February 2002. 
In February 1999, 81s began operating in South Australia when FreightCorp won a contract to haul brown coal on the Leigh Creek to Stirling North line from Leigh Creek to the Northern Power Station in Port Augusta. 
As of February 2013, Pacific National operated 83, primarily in New South Wales. 8147 was written off following a derailment near Forbes on 11 March 2007. 
SDS Models in 2015 announced a range of 81 class locomotives, thought to include Candy (8104, 8136), Bicentennial (8120, 8172), Freightrail and Freightcorp variants (8129, 8139, 8167, 8168, 8172, 8175 and 8177), National Rail (8117) and Pacific National (8120, 8150) models, with all four body types. The range will be available both as DC and DCC with sound.  
Austrains in 2014 released models of the 81 class locomotive retailing at about $300 per model. The range included 8134, 8155 and 8169 in Freightrail Blue, and 8125, 8150 and 8178 in Pacific National blue and yellow. An incorrectly-modelled Candy locomotive was also released. A second run was planned for 2015, but will not go ahead after SDS Models announced their range 
Trace gases are those gases in the atmosphere other than nitrogen (78.1%), oxygen (20.9%), and argon (0.934%) which, in combination, make up 99.934% of the gases in the atmosphere (not including water vapor). 
In contrast, the most abundant gases in the atmosphere are not greenhouse gases.  The main reasons is because they cannot absorb infrared radiation as they do not have vibrations with a dipole moment. For instance, the triple bonds of atmospheric dinitrogen make for a highly symmetric molecule that is very inert in the atmosphere. 
The Ka'a'gee Tu First Nation is a Dene First Nations band government in the Northwest Territories. The band is headquartered in the community of Kakisa, the smallest in the territory. 
Coast Gymkhana Club Ground is a cricket ground in Mombasa, Kenya.  The first recorded match held on the ground came in 1999 when a Coast Cricket Association XI played the touring Marylebone Cricket Club.  The ground held its first List A match in 2010 when Kenya played the United Arab Emirates.  Kenya won the match by 24 runs. 
The ground is owned by the Coast Gymkhana Club.  The club is located roughly a hundred metres from the Mombasa Sports Club, which has hosted One Day Internationals. 
Pannonian Croatia is one of the four NUTS-2 Regions of Croatia since 2021. The region is located in the continental part of the country, including eight counties of Croatia. The most populated cities in the region are Osijek, Slavonski Brod, Karlovac and Sisak. 
She was married to Late Kochu Krishna Pillai. The couple had a son, Late Rajashekharan and a daughter, Rajamma. Her granddaughter Radhika Suresh is married to Suresh Gopi. 
She appeared last in the film Gourisankaram (2004). She died on 21 February 2011, aged 96, at a private hospital in Thiruvananthapuram. 
The Tharu people were initially comfortable with the Madheshi identity in the eastern part of the Terai as of 2007, but in the central part, they claim a distinct Tharu identity. In 2009, they disassociated themselves from being identified as Madheshi and demanded their own province. 
Armed groups like Terai Army, Madhesi National Liberation Front, Terai Cobras and Madhesh Mukti Tigers pursued this aim of autonomy using violent means. Some members of these organisations were responsible for acts of terrorism including bombings and murders. The Alliance for Independent Madhesh also demands independence of the Terai. 
In 2013, more than 24 Madheshi political parties were registered for the Constituent Assembly of Nepal election. Madheshi parties gained 50 of 575 seats in the Constituent Assembly. 
After the Nepalese Constituent Assembly election, 2008, Indian politicians kept on trying to secure strategic interests in the Nepal Terai, such as over hydropower energy, development projects, business and trade. It has been alleged that by supporting the 2015 Nepal blockade, India tried to dominate Nepal's internal politics and foment the conflict in the Nepal Terai. 
The culture of Madeshi people is complex and diverse. The Muslim and indigenous peoples speak their own languages and have distinct cultural traditions that differ from the Hindu caste groups. Latter comprise at least 43 distinct groups. Caste groups include Bania, Brahman, Dhobi, Kalawar, Kewat, Kshatriya, Kumhar, Kurmi, Kushwaha and Teli. 
Muslim people in the Terai constitute about 96% of all Muslims in the country. Their cultural traditions are interlinked with those of Muslim people in northern India; popular destinations for their ziyarat pilgrimage are the shrines of Ajmer Sharif Dargah and Ghazi Saiyyad Salar Masud in Rajasthan and Uttar Pradesh, respectively. They are influenced by the hierarchy of the Hindu caste system, with the difference that it is not based on the principle of pollution and purity, but on occupation. 
Both Muslim and Hindu Madheshi parents place more emphasis on the education of boys than of girls. Despite an increase of schools and primary education being compulsory and free of cost, more boys than girls are enrolled. Girls are expected to look after younger siblings and do household chores. Many rural Madheshi girls are married at an age of 14 to 16 years. 
Madheshi people speak Bengali, Maithili, Bhojpuri, Urdu and Hindi languages. The National Population and Housing Census of 2011 knows of 123 languages spoken in all of Nepal and lists: 
Muslim Madheshis speak Urdu primarily, but also Awadhi, Bhojpuri, and Maithili, depending on whether they live in the western, central or eastern Terai. 
The following religions are practised in the Terai according to the National Population and Housing Census of 2011: 
The religious practices of the majority of Madheshi people are a mixture of orthodox Hinduism and animism. 
Muslim Madheshis practise the traditional nikah marriage, which is recognised by law. The largest and oldest madrasa is located in Krishnanagar. Mawlawis teaching Quran and Hadith at madrasas in the Terai are either from India, or were trained in India and Saudi Arabia. Many Muslim Madheshis practise endogamy. 
Lobato is eligible to represent Argentina or Brazil at international level. He has yet to announce his allegiances for either nation, stating he would treat any call-up equally. He previously stated that he feels more Brazilian than Argentine when in Argentina, but more Argentine than Brazilian when in Brazil. In regards to club football, he said that he hopes to play in Brazilian football at some point in his career. 
The mackerel scad's fins are black metallic to blue-green and its belly is white. The edge of the operculum has a small, black spot, with no spots on the lateral line. Mackerel scad's caudal fins have been described as reddish  to yellow-green. 
FAO areas where the mackerel scad is native include the north east and northwest Atlantic, the center east and west Atlantic, the Mediterranean and the Black Sea, the South east and west Atlantic, the eastern and western Indian, and the North west, center west, center east and south west Pacific. 
Mackerel scad usually live in subtropical seas at depths up to 400 m. They prefer clear water, and are frequently found around islands. Although mackerel scad have been found at the surface, they are usually caught at depths between 40 and 200 meters. They feed mainly on zooplankton. 
Mackerel scad are fairly important both to fisheries and to sportfishing. They are a somewhat popular fish for human consumption, normally eaten split and fried, but are more often used as bait, since large gamefish such as the blue-spotted grouper, giant trevally, and the onespot snapper are all known to feed on them. 
This species is also significant for its use in preparing the Japanese snack Kusaya, a traditional product of the Izu Islands. 
Pakistani Lieutenant General Shahid Aziz, and then head of ISI analysis wing, has confirmed there were no mujahideen but only regular Pakistan Army soldiers who took part in the Kargil War. "There were no Mujahideen, only taped wireless messages, which fooled no one. Our soldiers were made to occupy barren ridges, with hand held weapons and ammunition", Lt Gen Aziz wrote in his article in The Nation daily in January 2013. 
Some writers have speculated that the operation's objective may also have been retaliation for India's Operation Meghdoot in 1984 that seized much of Siachen Glacier. 
According to India's then army chief Ved Prakash Malik, and many scholars, much of the background planning, including construction of logistical supply routes, had been undertaken much earlier. On several occasions during the 1980s and 1990s, the army had given Pakistani leaders (Zia ul Haq and Benazir Bhutto) similar proposals for infiltration into the Kargil region, but the plans had been shelved for fear of drawing the nations into all-out war. 
Pakistani intrusions took place in the heights of the lower Mushkoh Valley, along the Marpo La ridgeline in Dras, in Kaksar near Kargil, in the Batalik sector east of the Indus River, on the heights above of the Chorbat La sector where the LOC turns North and in the Turtuk sector south of the Siachen area. 
As the operation was fully underway, about 250 artillery guns were brought in to clear the infiltrators in the posts that were in the line-of-sight. The Bofors FH-77B field howitzer played a vital role, with Indian gunners making maximum use of the terrain. However, its success was limited elsewhere due to the lack of space and depth to deploy it. 
G8 nations supported India and condemned the Pakistani violation of the LOC at the Cologne summit. The European Union also opposed Pakistan's violation of the LOC. China, a long-time ally of Pakistan, insisted on a pullout of forces to the pre-conflict positions along the LOC and settling border issues peacefully. Other organisations like the ASEAN Regional Forum too supported India's stand on the inviolability of the LOC. 
Faced with growing international pressure, Sharif managed to pull back the remaining soldiers from Indian territory. The joint statement issued by Clinton and Sharif conveyed the need to respect the LOC and resume bilateral talks as the best forum to resolve all disputes. 
A number of Indian soldiers earned awards for gallantry. Four Param Vir Chakras and 11 Maha Vir Chakras were awarded. 
The Kargil War was significant for the impact and influence of the mass media on public opinion in both nations. Coming at a time of exploding growth in electronic journalism in India, the Kargil news stories and war footage were often telecast live on TV, and many websites provided in-depth analysis of the war. The conflict became the first "live" war in South Asia and it was given such detailed media coverage that one effect was the drumming up of jingoistic feelings. 
The threat of WMD included chemical and even biological weapons. Pakistan accused India of using chemical weapons and incendiary weapons such as napalm against the Kashmiri fighters. India, on the other hand, showcased a cache of gas masks as proof that Pakistan may have been prepared to use non-conventional weapons. US official and the Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons determined that Pakistani allegations of India using banned chemicals in its bombs were unfounded. 
From the end of the war until February 2000, the Indian stock market rose by more than 30%. The next Indian national budget included major increases in military spending. 
The brief conflict provided considerable dramatic material for filmmakers and authors in India. Some documentaries which were shot on the subject were used by the ruling party coalition, led by Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP), in furthering its election campaign that immediately followed the war. The following is a list of the major films and dramas on the subject. 
The impact of the war in the sporting arena was visible during the India-Pakistan clash in the 1999 Cricket World Cup, which coincided with the Kargil timeline. The game witnessed heightened passions and was one of the most viewed matches in the tournament. 
Caister Academic Press is an independent academic publishing company that produces books and ebooks on microbiology and molecular biology. The address for the editorial offices is in Poole, UK with worldwide sales and distribution through the Ingram Content Group. Published books include review volumes, practical manuals and reference texts aimed at the post-graduate, research and professional market. 
Caister Academic Press aims to provide the scientific community with authoritative texts on topical areas of microbiology and molecular biology. There is a focus on current research and emerging trends. Volumes on related technology and applications are also published. 
The academic publishing company was founded in 1993 as Horizon Scientific Press. Incorporated as a limited company in 2001, the company changed its name to Caister Academic Press in 2008. 
Helen Morse (born 24 January 1947) is an English-born Australian actress who has appeared in films, on television and on stage. She won the AFI (AACTA) Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role for the 1976 film Caddie, and starred in the 1981 miniseries A Town Like Alice. Her other film appearances include Picnic at Hanging Rock (1975), Agatha (1979), Far East (1982) and The Eye of the Storm (2011). 
Morse was born in Harrow on the Hill, Middlesex, England in 1947. She was the oldest of four children; her parents were a doctor and nurse. She moved to Australia in 1950 with her family. She attended school at Presbyterian Ladies' College in Burwood, Victoria, and graduated from at the National Institute of Dramatic Art in 1965, and trained with Brian Syron in Sydney. 
Morse has worked with many companies including Melbourne Theatre Company, The Ensemble, The Independent, Nimrod Theatre Company, Marian Street, Sydney Theatre Company, Hunter Valley Theatre Company, Queensland Theatre Company, Harvest Theatre Company (South Australia) and the State Theatre Company of South Australia. 
Morse was married from 1967 until 1976 to Australian actor and director Sandy Harbutt, with whom she starred in Stone. 
Yves Albarello (born 17 March 1952, in Aulnay-sous-Bois, Seine-et-Oise) was the member of the National Assembly of France for Seine-et-Marne's 7th constituency from 2007 to 2017.  He is of Italian origin  and is a member of the Union for a Popular Movement. His political career began in 1976 with the creation of the Rally for the Republic. 
An entrepreneur in the graphical sector and financial director by profession, Albarello was elected mayor of Claye-Souilly for the first time in 1989 with 49% of votes. He was subsequently re-elected in 1995, and in 2002 with 78% of the vote. 
He was also the departmental treasurer for the UMP in Seine-et-Marne and national secretary in charge of the service industry. 
This article about a Union for a Popular Movement of France politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Rally for the Republic politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The soldier-legislator, known as Jim to family and friends, was born on 31 May 1872, second son of Irish Catholic parents William and Catherine Stubbs of Quarry Hill, Bendigo, Victoria. His father was for many years a mining manager on sites such as Johnson's Reef Extended mine. 
After finishing school, Stubbs served an apprenticeship as a tailor in Victoria and was introduced to the Labor Party in 1890 when he first joined a trade union. In 1894, the 22-year-old moved to Perth, Western Australia. He was joined there later by younger brother Francis Michael Stubbs, an iron moulder who settled in the south-west township of Tambellup. 
A keen sportsman, Stubbs kept himself active by participating in various social events. He represented Perth tailors in several games of Australian Rules football as well as in running events during the annual Eight Hours Day (Labour Day) sports carnivals. 
The focus of the young tailor's endeavours gradually shifted to improving the rights and conditions of workers. In 1896, he became a foundation member of the Perth Tailors Society and later held various offices within the organisation, including treasurer, vice-president and president, as it morphed into the Tailors Union and eventually the Amalgamated Tailors and Tailoresses Union. 
Stubbs's political career got off to a shaky start. His reputation as a leader of the Labour movement earned him preselection for the Subiaco electorate in the 1908 state elections. With 8 votes to 3, he was chosen ahead of Walter Richardson. However, the low voter turnout necessitated a controversial second preselection ballot, which resulted in Stubbs being deselected. In 1910, he sought election as a councillor for the Central Ward of the Subiaco Municipality but was unsuccessful. 
The breakthrough Stubbs was looking for came in the state elections of 1911 when, by a mere 60 votes, he unseated his nemesis Henry Daglish, a former Laborite, former Premier and incumbent Minister of Works, who derogatorily referred to the Labour Party as "Stubbs & Co". 
According to the Speaker of the House, Michael Troy, Stubbs soon proved to be "an able, earnest and conscientious parliamentarian", who among other things had fought to promote humanitarian social measures. He narrowly defeated Daglish again in the elections of 1914, this time by just 46 votes. 
The press dubbed him "Subiaco Stubbs". This was to distinguish him from "Wagin Stubbs", another political opponent by the name of Sydney Stubbs, the member for Wagin, and former mayor of Claremont and Perth. Although they shared the same name and both hailed from Victoria, that's where the similarities ended. Their verbal attacks on each other in parliament left political commentators quite bemused. 
In times of chaos, Stubbs could quieten a larrikin crowd with his eloquence. At a political forum in Subiaco, a hostile and raucous mob kept drowning out the speakers, especially one of Stubbs's rivals. The Subiaco mayor and Henry Daglish had tried in vain to restore calm. But when Stubbs got up to speak an extraordinary thing occurred. One reporter said: 
He was warmly cheered by those who had hooted and hissed before. He absolutely amazed the crowd by telling, and indeed convincing, them that they were on the wrong track. He insisted on fair play, and he was obeyed. Unfortunately Mr. Stubbs was the only man during the whole campaign with sufficient moral courage to command his friends to give his party opponents fair play.
In Parliament House, the oratory of Stubbs was humorously noted in the Daily News by the satirist "Artemus": 
The seasoned legislator began his military training at Blackboy Hill in Western Australia as a private but was soon promoted to the rank of sergeant. He then proceeded to the Royal Military College, Duntroon, where he was commissioned as a second lieutenant. On 23 December 1916, he embarked from Fremantle on HMAT Berrima in charge of the 8th Reinforcements of the 51st Battalion. One of the men under his charge was younger brother Private Francis Michael Stubbs. 
Condolences were also offered in the Western Australian Parliament by the Premier, the Hon. Henry Lefroy: 
We all recognise the zealous manner in which the late Lieut. Stubbs attended to his duties in the House: but he heard a call that was greater than the call of party, he heard the call of King and country, and he left us to take up arms in defence of our hearths and homes. I am sure hon. members honour him for that: honour him for the feeling which prompted him to go forth. He has lost his life in the interests of home and country. For what greater thing could man lay down his life?
Parliamentary historians have concluded that in view of "Stubbs' demonstrated leadership capacities...Western Australian politics in all likelihood lost a man who would have gone on to high office". 
Stubbs is commemorated on the Menin Gate Memorial in Belgium (Panel 29), and in Australia (Australian War Memorial, Panel 154; WA Parliament House, Perth; the Honour Avenues of Kings Park; and the Subiaco Roll of Honour). 
Elphas Ginindza (born 23 August 1967) is a Swazi long-distance runner. He competed in the men's marathon at the 1992 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Swazi athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As a teenager Gaines played in brass bands in Philadelphia. Gaines moved to New York City in 1920, where he joined the orchestra of Wilbur Sweatman. He soon signed on with Clarence Williams's house band, then played with Sam Wooding, Earl Walton, Leroy Smith, Fats Waller,  Charlie Johnson, and the Hot Chocolates. 
In the 1930s Gaines launched his own band in Philadelphia; he recorded occasionally, including once with Williams in 1934. Concomitantly he continued playing with Smith and also played in Louis Armstrong's orchestra. He continued to lead bands in Philadelphia into the 1950s, especially at the jazz venue Carroll's. In the 1960s he played in a trio at the Hangover Club. Gaines went into retirement in the 1970s. 
Irvingia barteri Hook.f. Irvingia caerulea Tiegh. Irvingia duparquetii Tiegh. Irvingia erecta Tiegh. Irvingia fusca Tiegh. Irvingia griffonii Tiegh. Irvingia hookeriana Tiegh. Irvingia laeta Tiegh. Irvingia pauciflora Tiegh. Irvingia platycarpa Tiegh. Irvingia tenuifolia Hook.f. Irvingia velutina Tiegh. 
Irvingia gabonensis is a species of African trees in the genus Irvingia, sometimes known by the common names wild mango, African mango, or bush mango. They bear edible mango-like fruits, and are especially valued for their fat- and protein-rich nuts. 
Irvingia gabonensis is indigenous to the humid forest zone from the northern tip of Angola, including Congo, DR Congo, Nigeria, Ivory Coast and south-western Uganda. Since 2009, the Gabonese government has prohibited logging of the andok tree until 2034. 
Irvingia gabonensis is pollinated by Coleoptera, Diptera, Hymenoptera and Lepidoptera. It flowers from March to June and has two fruiting seasons: from April to July and from September to October. Seeds are dispersed by specialized vertebrates as elephants and gorillas. By reducing the number of those animals, the spread and regeneration of dika decreases and it becomes dependent on human planting. 
The domestication of dika is in its early stages. Around 1990, vegetative propagation allowed mass replication and selection. Grafting, budding, air-layering, marcotting and cuttings are feasible when they are applied to young wood. 
Humans eat the fruits fresh, leading to the misnomer, African mango. The fruits are processed into jelly, jam, juice and sometimes even wine. The pulp has also been used to prepare black dye for cloth coloration. 
The wood is hard and therefore used for heavy construction work as making ships' decks or railway ties. Dead branches are used as firewood. 
The trees are used in agroforestry systems to shade other crops, especially cocoa and coffee. They are also used to reduce erosion. Cities have started using them to shade streets, as shelter belts, or for beautification. 
Unlike the pulp of some other Irvingia spp., the pulp of Irvingia gabonensis tastes juicy and sweet and is eaten fresh.  A 100 gram portion of fruit pulp provides 61 calories and includes: 
Fruit pulp flavor components include zingiberene, cinnamic acid, dodecanal and dodecanol, resulting in spicy, earthy, fruity, and wine-yeast characteristics. 
This article contains lists of men's national water polo team rosters of the United States of America. The lists are updated as of March 30, 2020. 
Men's water polo tournaments have been staged at the Olympic Games since 1900. The United States has participated in 22 of 27 tournaments. 
Men's water polo tournaments have been staged at the World Aquatics Championships since 1973. The United States has participated in 18 of 18 tournaments. 
The FINA Men's Water Polo World Cup was established in 1979. The United States has participated in 15 of 16 tournaments. 
Men's water polo tournaments have been staged at the Pan American Games since 1951. The United States has participated in 18 of 18 tournaments. 
While Huang gained most of reputation, he had a handful of rivals. There was only one other person in China who could match him, and that was Zhou Donghou. Although Huang would beat Zhou many times, Zhou was the one giving Huang advice to become stronger.  
He was also known for his contribution to go theory. He would use a lot of forcing moves to give his opponent inefficient shapes, and would attack while gaining territory. He certainly had a unique style of go. He would play moves that were normal, that looked plain and clear. This left his opponents not knowing what to do, and if they would try to muscle him out, he would catch them with a surprising move or attack a weak point. 
He has been praised many times during his life and after his death. Famous book publisher Deng Yuanhui had this to say about Huang; 
"Longshi used his mind most meticulously. He sought to enter the deepest apertures. When it became a critical matter of life and death, and while the crowd were already helpless and at their wits' end, he was expertly exerting a subtle influence, and seeing more and more skilfull (sic) ideas and magical effects; the air would suddenly change... and from death he would re-enter life." He also said, "Longshi is like a heavenly spirit turned human. He is absolutely not of this world."
Go Seigen, considered to be one of the best go players of the 20th century, and of all time, had also commented on Huang. He had said that if Huang were alive during modern times, he would be a 13 dan. He also went on to say that Huang was at least the level of Honinbo Dosaku. Honinbo Dosaku is considered by many to be the greatest go player of all time. 
Even with all this praise, Huang is barely known anywhere outside of China. Much of this had come from Inoue Inseki's impressions of Chinese go players during the 17th century in his famous book Hatsuyorun. He had said that Chinese players would have to take senaisen (handicap) from the top Japanese players, although there is no mention of Huang. This led many to believe that all Chinese go players were no match to the Japanese go players. 
Hayashi Genbi had also said something along the lines of Chinese players being inferior, although he said this about Huang, "Huang Yuetian and Xu Xingyou are known as recent champions of the Qing era. In my opinion, for Yuetian this must be so, but for Xingyou, judging by the games given in this book (Gokyo Seimyo) he is far behind." 
Lang ran for a seat to the Alberta Legislature in a by-election held in the Medicine Hat electoral district on May 1, 1928. Lang faced three other candidates winning almost 40% to head the polls on the first count. On the second count Lang was just shy of a majority. He won the district on the third count to earn his first term in office and hold the district for the Liberals. 
Two years later Lang would run for a second term in office in the 1930 Alberta general election. Like the by-election in 1928 this election would also go to transfers. On the first count Lang nearly won outright winning almost 46% of the vote. He won on the second count after second place choices gave him nearly 60%. 
Lang would run for a third term in office in the 1935 Alberta general election. He would be defeated in a landslide by Social Credit candidate John Robinson finishing a distant second in the three way race. 
Early mariners noticed that wet sails were more efficient than dry sails, but their added weight slowed the vessels. From the 15th century, mariners applied fish oils and grease to their heavy sailcloth. This resulted in more efficient sails in dry weather and lighter sails in wet weather. Out of the worn remnants they cut waterproof capes to keep themselves dry; these capes were the forerunner of the fisherman's slicker. 
From 1795, Arbroath-based sail maker Francis Webster Ltd had perfected the art of adding linseed oil to flax sails, creating an oiled flax. Lighter than wet sailcloth, the treatment was used by the Royal Navy and the early tea clippers. As the tea race competition increased, the clipper designers and captains looked for more weight reduction. The clippers were often used to ship cotton from Egypt, so they tried this lighter material. 
In the mid-1920s, three companies co-operated to create paraffin-impregnated cotton, which produced a highly water resistant cloth, breathable, but without the stiffness in the cold or yellowing with age. Woven by Webster's, it was taken to Lancashire for dyeing (black or olive green), and then to London for cupro-ammonia treatment. The cloth was then returned to Lancashire for waxing, and then back to Webster's for storage, sales and distribution. 
Webster's were cautious about disrupting their home market, and so sent the new product to another part of the British Empire with similar climatic conditions and a love of sailing for testing: New Zealand. Given the local name Japara, as the material proved a weather and sales success, it was adopted as the trademark by Webster's. 
British Millerain were the first to wax cotton in the UK and export this specialist textile across the globe.  Halley Stevensons began as a manufacturer of textiles for upholstery, curtains and furnishing, and added waxed cotton to their range in the 1990s. More recently, Templemoyle Mills was established and began manufacturing waxed cotton in Ireland; the company registered in 2013. 
Waxed cotton became an instant success with the commercial shipping industry, and Webster's as the primary manufacturer looked for alternative markets. One early adopter was J. Barbour & Sons in the outdoor industry, producing waxed jackets for farmers and gamekeepers. As motorcycling emerged as personal transport, the new company Belstaff also developed clothing. 
Waxed cotton came in either black, or an inconsistent dark olive. Colour was controlled by the amount of copper left from the cupro-ammonia treatment, and because of variability of the olive a complementary dark brown corduroy collar was placed on dark olive jackets. 
Barbour's entered the motorcycling market from the early 1930s, with the Barbour International motorcycle suit, developing their market presence through sponsorship of the British competitions and teams in motorcycle trials. Barbour International suits were worn by virtually every British International team from 1936 to 1977, and in the 1964 International Six Days Trial, actor Steve McQueen and the rest of the American team. 
Adopted as the first choice waterproof clothing for the British armed forces during World War II[citation needed], uses of waxed cotton escalated in the late 1940s and 1950s as spare material and army-surplus was liquidated. 
Although the popularity of waxed cotton has decreased considerably, there remain various forms of waxed cotton with differences in look, touch and performance. Modern uses of waxed cotton have consolidated to a niche where its warmth provides a benefit over its cost, weight and maintenance disadvantages. 
Liu Chengming (born 20 March 1987) is a Paralympian athlete from China competing mainly in T54 classification sprint events. 
The next year Liu appeared at his first Summer Paralympic, the 2012 Games in London. He was again part of the Chinese team that took gold in the men's 400 metre relay, and also won an individual medal; bronze in the 100m sprint. Further success came at the 2015 World Championships in Doha, with a relay gold and two individual medals a gold in the 800m race and a silver in the 400m sprint. 
Liu was born in Chaoyang, China in 1987. When he was six months old Liu contracted polio which resulted in muscle atrophy in his legs. 
The 22nd Emmy Awards, later known as the 22nd Primetime Emmy Awards, were handed out on June 7, 1970.  The ceremony was hosted by David Frost and Danny Thomas.  Winners are listed in bold and series' networks are in parentheses. 
Susan Hampshire from The Forsyte Saga became the first Lead Actress, Drama to win outside the Big Three television networks - from the NET network. 
The non-marine molluscs of Belize are a part of the molluscan fauna of Belize (wildlife of Belize). A number of species of non-marine molluscs are found in the wild in Belize. 
The character has made scattered minor appearances throughout other forms of media, such as animated television series and the film X-Men: The Last Stand, in which she was portrayed by Omahyra Mota. 
Following conflicts with the X-Men in "Mutant Massacre" and the 1989 crossover "Inferno," Arclight was depicted as a member of the Femizons team in the comic book series Captain America (volume 1). She was then seen again as a member of the Marauders in 1996 and was often part of the team in their subsequent stories. 
Before engaging on their mission against the Morlocks, Sinister sends the Marauders to kidnap Nathan Summers, the recently born child of Cyclops. Once Nathan is secured, Sinister then sends the Marauders into the sewers of New York and the team engages in wholesale slaughter. Their attack becomes known as the "Mutant Massacre." Arclight herself kills dozens of Morlocks before the Marauders are attacked by heroes such as the X-Men and X-Factor, forcing them to retreat. 
Months later, the Marauders are involved in the "Inferno" crossover, during which forces of Hell are unleashed on Earth. Arclight and several Marauders are killed during the crossover, but resurrected by Mister Sinister's cloning technology. Mister Sinister combines his mental powers with his genetic manipulation to ensure that all the clones will not betray him. 
The Marauders attack the powerful mutant Nate Grey, who uses his telepathy to cause Arclight to kill her teammate Blockbuster. Nate Grey then causes the Marauder called Riptide to kill Arclight. All are later resurrected by Sinister's clone farm. 
The Marauders later reform with Scalphunter, Arclight, Harpoon, Blockbuster, Vertigo, and Malice. The X-Men confronts this group, accusing them of committing a second Morlock Massacre. The Marauders deny this charge, but the X-Man Chamber burns them alive with his psionic flame. As he burns, Harpoon impales Chamber in the back, killing the young mutant. The Marauders are later seen again without injury, indicating they were once again cloned by Sinister. 
Arclight has died in action but been repeatedly resurrected by Mister Sinister's cloning techniques. This process seems to involve a full transfer of personality and memories, effectively keeping Arclight as the same person, though now with programming that prevents her from betraying Mister Sinister. 
Arclight appeared in the 2006 live-action film X-Men: The Last Stand, portrayed by Dominican fashion model and actress Omahyra Mota.[citation needed] This version is a member of the Omegas, who are recruited by Magneto to join his Brotherhood in stopping a mutant cure. She is later killed by the Phoenix. 
Arclight appears as a boss in Deadpool, voiced by Chani Krich. This version is a member of Mister Sinister's Marauders, who encounter the eponymous character after they unknowingly cost him a bounty. Deadpool kills Arclight in battle and later faces several clones of her while hunting Sinister. 
Sowale was born in 1951 at Isara-Remo and educated at  the University of Ibadan and the University of British Columbia.  He  was ordained a deacon in 1977 and a priest a year later. He became canon in 1987, archdeacon in 1992, provost in 1993 and was elected and consecrated Bishop of Ilesa in 2000. 
Olaberria is a town and municipality located in the Goierri region of the province of Gipuzkoa, in the autonomous community of the Basque Country, northern Spain. 
This article about a location in the Basque Country, Spain, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ecumenical creeds is an umbrella term used in Lutheran tradition to refer to three creeds: the Nicene Creed, the Apostles' Creed and the Athanasian Creed. These creeds are also known as the catholic or universal creeds. 
These creeds are accepted by almost all mainstream Christian denominations in the West, including Lutheran, Reformed, Catholic, and Anglican. Many Methodist churches accept the Nicene Creed and Apostles' Creed. 
The Eastern Orthodox Church accepts the Nicene Creed, but does not use the Apostles' Creed or the Athanasian Creed. 
The term ecumenical can refer to efforts by Christians of different church traditions to develop closer relationships and better understandings. The term is also often used to refer to efforts towards the visible and organic unity of different Christian churches in some form. 
Some speakers are in the Balikesir, Yalova, Izmir, Bursa regions of Turkey especially in Kirne (Ortaca), a village in Balikesir Province which touches the western coast, being south-west of Istanbul. 
Some dialects differ heavily from the standard form, including the Quba and Akhty dialects spoken in Azerbaijan. 
There are 54 consonants in Lezgian. Characters to the right are the letters of the Lezgian Cyrillic Alphabet. Note that aspiration is not normally indicated in the orthography, despite the fact that it is phonemic. 
Lezgian is unusual for a Northeast Caucasian language in not having noun classes (also called "grammatical gender"). Standard Lezgian grammar features 18 grammatical cases, produced by agglutinating suffixes, of which 12 are still used in spoken conversation. 
Wairopi (English: Wire Rope Bridge) is a village along the Kumusi River, in Oro Province, Papua New Guinea. The village lies along the Kokoda Track. 
During the retreat of the ill-fated Imperial Japanese campaign along the Kokoda Track during the Second World War, Japanese Major General Tomitaro Horii drowned while attempting to cross the Kumusi River at Wairopi, after the  battle of Oivi-Gorari. 
Zamzama Park, is a 26 acre park located in the phase 5 area of Defence Housing Authority in Karachi, Sindh, Pakistan. It has jogging tracks, walking paths, roller blading enclosure, refreshment stand, and playground. The display center and head office of Pakistan Bonsai Society is also located inside the park near gate no.2. 
Zamzama is a posh locality situated in the Clifton Town in Karachi the largest city of Pakistan. It is a highly developed commercial area with residential accommodation as well. Famous branded shops are in this area. 
In May 2021, NASA astronomers reported that 5 to 10 years of preparation may be needed to avoid a potential impactor based on a simulated exercise conducted by the 2021 Planetary Defense Conference. 
The two main scales used to categorize the impact hazards of asteroids are the Palermo Technical Impact Hazard Scale and the Torino Scale. 
Several astronomical survey projects such as Lincoln Near-Earth Asteroid Research, Catalina Sky Survey and Pan-STARRS continue to search for more PHOs. Each one found is studied by various means, including optical, radar, and infrared to determine its characteristics, such as size, composition, rotation state, and to more accurately determine its orbit. Both professional and amateur astronomers participate in such observation and tracking. 
Richard Logan Fitts (born December 17, 1999) is an American college baseball pitcher for the New York Yankees. He was selected in the 2021 Major League Baseball draft by the Yankees. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball pitcher born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
For example, a nonprofit organization may be tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) if its primary activities are charitable, religious, educational, scientific, literary, testing for public safety, fostering amateur sports competition, or preventing cruelty to children or animals. 
According to the IRS Publication 557, in the Organization Reference Chart section, the following is an exact list of 501(c) organization types and their corresponding descriptions.[a] 
Under Section 511, a 501(c) organization is subject to tax on its "unrelated business income", whether or not the organization actually makes a profit, but not including selling donated merchandise or other business or trade carried on by volunteers, or certain bingo games. Disposal of donated goods valued over $2,500, or acceptance of goods worth over $5,000 may also trigger special filing and record-keeping requirements. 
Between 2010 and 2017 the IRS revoked the nonprofit status of more than 760,000 nonprofit organizations for failing to file the 990 form. 
The IRS explains that to be tax-exempt, "an organization must be organized and operated exclusively for exempt purposes ... and none of its earnings may inure to any private shareholder or individual." Private inurement means that the organization's assets must not unduly benefit a person. 
A 501(c)(3) organization is allowed to conduct some or all of its charitable activities outside the United States. Donors' contributions to a 501(c)(3) organization are tax-deductible only if the contribution is for the use of the 501(c)(3) organization, and that the 501(c)(3) organization is not merely serving as an agent or conduit of a foreign charitable organization. Additional procedures are required of 501(c)(3) organizations that are private foundations. 
A 501(c)(4) organization is a social welfare organization, such as a civic organization or a neighborhood association. An organization is considered by the IRS to be operated exclusively for the promotion of social welfare if it is primarily engaged in promoting the common good and general welfare of the people of the community. Net earnings must be exclusively used for charitable, educational, or recreational purposes. 
...are allowed to participate in politics, so long as politics do not become their primary focus. What that means in practice is that they must spend less than 50 percent of their money on politics. So long as they don't run afoul of that threshold, the groups can influence elections, which they typically do through advertising.
501(c)4s are similar to 501(c)5s and 501(c)6s in that the organizations may inform the public on controversial subjects and attempt to influence legislation relevant to its program and, unlike 501(c)3 organizations, they may also participate in political campaigns and elections, as long as their primary activity is the promotion of social welfare and related to the organization's purpose. 
A 501(c)4 organization may directly or indirectly support or oppose a candidate for public office as long as such activities are not a substantial amount of its activities. 
A 501(c)4 organization that lobbies must register with the Clerk of the House if it lobbies members of the House or their staff. Likewise, a 501(c)4 organization must register with the Secretary of the Senate if it lobbies members of the Senate or their staff. In addition, the 501(c)4 organization must either inform its members the amount it spends on lobbying or pay a proxy tax to the Internal Revenue Service. Lobbying expenses and political expenses are not deductible as business expenses. 
The use of 501(c)4, 501(c)5, and 501(c)6 organizations has been affected by the 2007 case FEC v. Wisconsin Right to Life, Inc., in which the Supreme Court struck down the part of the McCain-Feingold Act that prohibited 501(c)4s, 501(c)5s, and 501(c)6s from broadcasting electioneering communications. The Act defined an electioneering communication as a communication that mentions a candidate's name 60 days before a primary or 30 days before a general election. 
The organization must provide a notice to its members containing a reasonable estimate of the amount related to lobbying and political campaign expenditures, or else it is subject to a proxy tax on its lobbying and political campaign expenditures. It must also state that contributions to the organization are not deductible as charitable contributions during fundraising. 
Every organization, including a 501(c)4 organization, that expressly advocates for the election or defeat of a particular political candidate and spends more than $250 during a calendar year must disclose the name of each person who contributed more than $200 during the calendar year to the Federal Election Commission. The Federal Election Commission is required to enforce this provision based on a federal court decision in 2018. 
The origins of 501(c)4 organizations date back to the Revenue Act of 1913, which created a new group of tax-exempt organizations dedicated to social welfare in a precursor to what is now Internal Revenue Code Section 501(c)4. 
As of January 2018, the application for recognition of exemption as a 501(c)4 organization is a new form, Form 1024-A, rather than Form 1024. 
Between 2010 and 2017 the number of 501(c)4 organizations dropped from almost 140,000 to less than 82,000. In 2017 revocations of 501(c)4 groups comprised 58% which usually is only 15% of the total nonprofits which have their tax status revoked by the IRS for their failure to file the 990 form. 
A labor organization may pay benefits to its members because paying benefits improves all members' shared working conditions. An agricultural organization can provide financial assistance to its members in order to improve the conditions of those engaged in agricultural pursuits generally. Members can benefit in incidental ways from the organization's exempt activities as long as the benefits are available to all persons. 
The Revenue Act of 1913 excluded "labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations" from income tax liability. 
Much like 501(c)(4) and 501(c)(6) organizations, 501(c)(5) organizations may also perform some political activities. 501(c)(5) organizations are allowed to attempt to influence legislation that is related to the common union interests of its members. 
501(c)(5) organizations can receive unlimited contributions from corporations, individuals, and labor unions. The names and addresses of contributors are not required to be made available for public inspection. All other information, including the amount of contributions, the description of noncash contributions, and any other information, is required to be made available for public inspection unless it clearly identifies the contributor. 
A union membership dues paid to a 501(c)(5) organization are generally an ordinary and necessary business expense. The membership dues are tax-deductible in full unless a substantial part of the 501(c)(5) organization's activities consists of political activity, in which case a tax deduction is allowed only for the portion of membership dues that are for other activities. 
Because associations involved in fishing and seafood harvesting were having difficulties qualifying for reduced postal rates, in 1976 Congress established Internal Revenue Code Section 501(5) to define "agriculture" as the art or science of cultivating land, harvesting crops or aquatic resources, or raising livestock. 
Every organization, including a 501(c)(5) organization, that expressly advocates for the election or defeat of a particular political candidate and spends more than $250 during a calendar year must disclose the name of each person who contributed more than $200 during the calendar year to the Federal Election Commission. The Federal Election Commission is required to enforce this provision based on a federal court decision in 2018. 
A 501(c)(6) organization is a business league, a chamber of commerce like the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, a real estate board, a board of trade, a professional football league or an organization like the Edison Electric Institute and the Security Industry Association, that are not organized for profit and no part of the net earnings goes to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 
An association would not qualify if its principal activities consist of securing benefits and performing particular services for members. 
An association that promotes the common interests of certain hobbyists would not qualify because the Internal Revenue Service does not consider hobbies to be activities conducted as businesses. 
An organization whose primary activity is advertising the products or services of its members does not qualify because the organization is performing a service for its members rather than promoting common interests. If an organization's primary activity is advertising the products or services of its members' industry as a whole, however, the organization will generally qualify if it also performs other services for its members. 
Much like 501(c)(4) and 501(c)(5) organizations, 501(c)(6) organizations may also perform some political activities. 501(c)(6) organizations are allowed to attempt to influence legislation that is related to the common business interests of its members. 
A business' membership dues paid to a 501(c)(6) organization are generally an ordinary and necessary business expense. The membership dues are tax-deductible in full unless a substantial part of the 501(c)(6) organization's activities consists of political activity, in which case a tax deduction is allowed only for the portion of membership dues that are for other activities. 
Every organization, including a 501(c)(6) organization, that expressly advocates for the election or defeat of a particular political candidate and spends more than $250 during a calendar year must disclose the name of each person who contributed more than $200 during the calendar year to the Federal Election Commission. The Federal Election Commission is required to enforce this provision based on a federal court decision in 2018. 
The predecessor of IRC 501(c)(6) was enacted as part of the Revenue Act of 1913 likely due to a U.S. Chamber of Commerce request for an exemption for nonprofit "civic" and "commercial" organizations, which resulted in IRC 501(c)(4) for nonprofit "civic" organizations and IRC 501(c)(6) for nonprofit "commercially-oriented" organizations. The Revenue Act of 1928 amended the statute to include real estate boards. In 1966, professional football leagues were added to the described organizations. 
In 2013, Senator Tom Coburn introduced legislation to disallow a tax exemption for the National Football League, the Professional Golfers' Association, and other professional sports organizations. Coburn estimated the tax exemption cost $100 million, but he said he could not get other members of Congress to support the legislation. 
A substantial amount of the 501(c)(7) organization's activities must be related to social and recreational activities for its members. No more than 35 percent of its gross receipts may derive from non-members, and no more than 15 percent of its gross receipts is permitted to come from use of its facilities or services by the general public. An organization that exceeds these limits may lose its 501(c)(7) status. 
The organization is subject to unrelated business income tax for the revenue derived from nonmember use of its facilities and services, less allowable deductions. If the organization sells assets that were previously used for recreational or social purposes, the proceeds are considered related business income as long as the proceeds are reinvested in the organization. 
In 1969, Congress passed a law stating that social and recreational clubs were permitted to engage in some unrelated business income, subject to income tax. 
The society must have members of a similar calling, recreation, or profession, or members who work together to accomplish a worthy goal. The members have associated themselves in order to help each other and to promote the common cause. The society must have written documentation of its eligibility standards for membership, classes of membership, a process of admission, and rights and privileges of members. 
The members must have a common bond, which may be based on religious beliefs, gender, occupation, ethnicity, or shared values. 
The society must have a supreme governing body and subordinate lodges into which members are elected, initiated, or admitted in accordance with its laws. The supreme governing body should be composed of delegates elected directly by members or intermediate assemblies. 
The society must offer benefits to members, which may include life insurance, medical insurance, scholarships, educational programs, travel opportunities, and discount programs. Revenue generated from providing benefits to non-members must be insubstantial to the society and may be taxable as unrelated business income. 
An individual's donation to a fraternity is only a tax-deductible charitable contribution if the contribution "is to be used exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals." 
Fraternal benefit societies trace their lineage back through mutual benefit societies, friendly societies and eventually to medieval guilds. Many fraternal benefit societies were founded to serve the needs of immigrants and other under-served groups who shared common bonds of religion, ethnicity, gender, occupation or shared values. 
The cemetery may restrict burials and cremations to a certain group of people, such as impoverished people, people adherent to a certain religion, or people who lived in a certain community, as long as it still serves a broad class of people and operates for public purposes, but a 501(c)(13) organization may not enforce overly restrictive restrictions. 
A perpetual care fund that is used by a profit-making cemetery to maintain cemetery properties and burial lots is not eligible under 501(c)(13). On the other hand, a nonprofit organization may have a perpetual care fund without jeopardizing its exemption under Section 501(c)(13). 
A cemetery that owns or operates a morgue, whether on its own grounds or elsewhere, is not eligible under 501(c)(13) because the Internal Revenue Service does not consider mortuary services necessarily incident to burial purposes. The provision of traditional burial services that directly support and maintain basic tenets and beliefs of a religion regarding burial of its members" may still be eligible under 501(c)(13). 
A cemetery company wishing to be recognized under Section 501(c)(13) needs to prepare and file Form 1024 with the Internal Revenue Service. 
Historically, cemeteries were exempt from local property taxes and excise taxes in most states because states generally considered cemeteries to be performing a recognized civic service. 
The Tariff Act of 1913 provided an exemption from federal income taxes for mutual cemetery companies that were organized and operated exclusively "for the benefit of their members". In 1921, Congress extended the tax-exemption to cemetery companies that are not mutual and to cemetery companies that are not operated for profit as well as any corporation solely incorporated to operate a cemetery and whose net gains do not inure to any person. 
In 1970, Congress included crematorium in the definition of cemetery for the purposes of Section 501(c)(13). 
This biographical article related to association football in Hungary, about a forward, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Swedish swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hamish Henry Cordy Keith CNZM OBE (born 15 August 1936) is a New Zealand writer, art curator, arts consultant and social commentator. 
Keith has been a consistent critic of the Museum of New Zealand Te Papa Tongarewa, referring to it as a "theme park", the "cultural equivalent to a fast-food outlet" and "not even a de facto national gallery" but seems to have moderated his opinion more recently when making a case for exhibition space on the Auckland waterfront. 
Keith has been a regular radio and television broadcaster and worked on the pioneer arts program Review as reporter and director. He made the first television program on New Zealand art, Waterfall to Waterfall in 1962 and in the late 1960s he made a six-part series on New Zealand art for Radio New Zealand. In 1965 he toured the first ever exhibition of contemporary New Zealand art in Australia. 
From 1970 to 1976 he hosted the Radio New Zealand weekly interview programme Guest of Honour. In 1982, with Bruce Morrison, he made Profiles, a series of six half-hour documentaries on contemporary New Zealand artists Tony Fomison, Richard Killeen, Neil Dawson, Greer Twiss, Philip Clairmont and Jeffrey Harris. 
He wrote four scripts for the pioneering television drama series Pukemanu and was principal writer for Section Seven. In 1984 he wrote and presented the two-hour series Housing New Zealand in the Twentieth Century, and presented two series of Kiwi Shorts. 
His most recent project was the arts documentary The Big Picture, directed by Paul Swadel and produced by Fiona Copland of Filmworks, which garnered three nominations at the 2008 New Zealand Screen Awards, and won Best Series and Best Music Awards. 
Keith completed his Diploma in Fine Arts at the Canterbury School of Fine Art in 1956 and worked briefly at the Christchurch Press before gaining employment at the Auckland City Art Gallery. In 1960 he completed a studentship at the National Gallery of Victoria in Melbourne, followed by a Museums Diploma from the Museums Association of Great Britain in 1964.[citation needed] 
In 1967 he toured the United States on a six-month Carnegie Corporation Fellowship. In 1970 he was one of a group who set up the Regional Arts Federations in opposition to the original Arts Council. He served as national president Actors Equity and founding president of the Writers Guild.[citation needed] 
He was part of a small group that persuaded Len Lye to donate his works to the Govett-Brewster Art Gallery in New Plymouth and was an original trustee of the Len Lye Foundation. He was the original negotiator for the Te Maori exhibition. In 1999 he convened the government review into New Zealand's cultural infrastructure Heart of the Nation. In 2006 Keith curated Towards Auckland: Colin McCahon, the gallery years at the Auckland Art Gallery.[citation needed] 
In 1969 he stood as a Labour candidate for the Parliamentary seat of Remuera. In 1990 he stood in a by-election unsuccessfully for Mayor of Auckland City as the Green Party candidate. 
Keith was appointed an Officer of the Order of the British Empire, for services to the arts, in the 1981 New Year Honours. In October 2009, the University of Waikato conferred an honorary doctorate on Keith. In the 2013 Queen's Birthday Honours, he was appointed a Companion of the New Zealand Order of Merit, for services to the arts. 
The former Swedish agency Televerket, now a private company TeliaSonera is suspected of involvement in a corruption scandal in Azerbaijan, the Swedish newspaper Svenska Dagbladet reports.  Corruption by proxy is the term used in these instances. 
The head of facilities management at The Swedish Prison and Probation Service was sentenced to 3.5 years in prison in what in 2016 was the largest corruption case involving a civil servant in Sweden. 
The song was released as the third single from Tiago PZK's upcoming debut album. The song reached Spotify's Global Top 50 placing it on Spotify's most-played songs list. Although the song was released on July 8, 2021, it took weeks for the song to hit the charts thanks to the song trending on the short video platform TikTok. 
Julian Ringhof (born February 21, 1989) is a German footballer who most recently played as a centre-back for FSV Optik Rathenow. 
Ringhof played five years of college soccer split between time at California State University, Los Angeles and the University of San Diego. 
Ringhof signed with United Soccer League club Rochester Rhinos on March 25, 2015. The next season, he was signed by Arizona United SC on February 18, 2016. 
Dr. Mario Express,[a] known in PAL regions as A Little Bit of... Dr. Mario, is a Mario action puzzle video game published by Nintendo. The game was released as a DSiWare title for the Nintendo DSi platform. Dr. Mario Express was released as a launch title for the DSiWare service in Japan on December 24, 2008, and was released in both North America and PAL regions in 2009. The game was developed by Arika, which had also created Dr. Mario Online Rx for WiiWare. 
Dr. Mario Express features the general gameplay of earlier Dr. Mario puzzle games, which focus on eliminating colored viruses from the playing field by matching them with colored capsules. Dr. Mario Express received generally positive reviews, but was criticized for offering fewer playable game modes than earlier Dr. Mario titles. 
While the game lacks multiplayer support, Dr. Mario Express offers a "VS CPU" mode in which the player plays against a computer-controlled player, which has its own playing field visible in the DSi top screen. The player's goal is to clear his playing field of all the viruses before the computer player does. The player will win the game upon eliminating all the viruses or if the other playing field fills up with capsules. 
Five Billion Pinheads Can't Be Wrong is the fourteenth studio album by experimental rock composer Zoogz Rift, released in 1996 by AVT Records. 
This article compares the economies of Canada and the United States based on GDP, debt-to-GDP ratio, inflation, unemployment, public debt, taxation, and purchasing power parity. In 2016, Canada's tax revenue to GDP ratio was 31.7% ranking 24th out of 35 OECD countries, compared to the US at 26% ranking at 30th, according to the OECD. 
The GDP of the United States increased by 2.3% to US$19,390.6 billion compared to Canada with a GDP of US$48,265 billion and growth of 3% according to the January 2018 International Monetary Fund's (IMF) annual World Economic Outlook (WEO). 
According to the IMF's 2018 annual Article IV Mission to Canada, compared to all the G7 countries, including the United States, Canada's "total government net debt-to-GDP ratio", is the lowest. Canada has been the G7 leader in economic growth since 2016. The unemployment rate in Canada is at its lowest level since c.1978. Over 600,000 full-time jobs have been created in Canada since early 2016. 
The IMF's 2018 annual Article IV Mission to the United States reported that, "Unemployment is low, inflation is well contained, and growth is set to accelerate. During the course of this administration, the economy is expected to enter the longest expansion in recorded U.S. history." Topics covered include competition, debt, sustainability analysis, economic indicators, fiscal policy, fiscal sustainability, monetary policy, tax policy and trade policy. 
The International Monetary Fund's annual World Economic Outlook provides the main economic indicators in Canada in selected years between 1980 and 2017. Inflation under 2% is in green.[Notes 1] 
This table show the same economic indicators in the United States in selected years between 1980 and 2017. Inflation under 2% is in green.[Notes 2] 
Although wealth is more highly concentrated in the US, the median (50th percentile) worker has about 23% more purchasing power as well.  In terms of purchasing power parity, the most recent statistics from the IMF has Canada (US$35,494) lower than that in the United States (US$43,444). 
The OECD tracks member countries debt-to-GDP ratio, the "amount of a country's total gross government debt as a percentage of its GDP", as an "indicator of an economy's health and a key factor for the sustainability of government finance." 
This compares United States public debt and Canadian public debt based on data from the CIA's World Factbook and the IMF.[Notes 3] 
According to the Fraser Institute, government spending at all levels (federal, state/provincial and local) has traditionally been higher in Canada than the United States. 
According to the OECD's report entitled "Taxing Wages 2018" in 2017, the "employee net average tax rate for a single person in Canada with no children was 22.8%, compared to 26.1% in the United States. Canada placed "11th lowest among 35 OECD countries". The OECD "estimates take into account federal and provincial or state taxes, as well as social security contributions and money returned in the form of family benefits". 
In 2016, Canada's tax revenue to GDP ratio was 31.7% ranking 24th out of 35 OECD countries, compared to the US at 26% ranking at 30th, according to the OECD. 
According to a table updated to January 2018, produced by the Netherlands-based KPMG, one of the world's Big Four auditors, the corporate tax rate in Canada was 26.50% compared to 27% in the United States. 
KPMG calculated the Canadian corporate tax by adding the federal and provincial tax components. The federal component is 15%. Each of the ten provinces and three territories have 2 different tax rates, one which is lower for small businesses which ranges from 0 to 4.5%, and higher for all other corporations, which ranges from 11.5 to 16%. Combined with the federal tax component the total can vary from 26.5% to 31%. 
In 2017, the unemployment rate in Canada was 6.3%, compared to 4.4% unemployment rate in the United States. From November 2017 through October 2018, Canada's unemployment ranged from 5.8% to 6.0%. 
The  United Nations Human Development Index (HDI) is one of several annual composite indices published by the UNDP Human Development Report (HDR) office. The HDI ranks countries based on life expectancy, education, per capita income. Canada and the United States were placed in the very high human development category in 2017 with Canada ranking 12th, with an HDI of 0.926, and the United States ranking 13th, with an HDI of 0.924, out of 189 countries 
Other HDR annual composite indices include the Inequality-Adjusted Human Development Index (IHDI) with Canada ranking 12th with an index of 0.852 compared to the US ranking 25th with an index of 0.797; the Gender Development Index (GDI), the Gender Inequality Index (GII), and the Multidimensional Poverty Index (MPI). 
In Canada life expectancy at birth is 82.5 and 79.5 in the US; expected years of schooling is 16.4 years in Canada and 16.5 in the US; mean years of schooling is 13.3 years in Canada and 13.4 in the US; GNI per capita (2011 PPP$) is $43,433 in Canada and $54,941 in the United States. 
According to a 2004 article, Canadian workers were estimated to be 82% as productive per hour as their American counterparts. The industries with the largest productivity advantages for the US are the manufacturing (particularly electronics and computer), finance, and service sectors. Industries where Canada is more productive than the US are the construction and natural resources sectors with Canadian workers achieving 129% relative productivity. 
The productivity gap was even larger in the 1950s but the difference narrowed, aided by the elimination of the smaller market problem through free trade. The gap closed somewhat in the 1980s but at a much slower pace than in the 1960s. From 1961 to 1973 labour productivity rose annually by 3.3 percent in Canada and 1.7 percent in the United States. According to a 1997 IMF report, from 1973 to 1995 productivity growth was 1.1% in Canada and 0.8% in the United States. 
The productivity gap began to widen again in the 1990s, particularly in the manufacturing sector. According to a 2005 article, by 2000, this was called Canada's "Excellence Gap" by the Chief Economist of Canadian Manufacturers & Exporters.  The United States has the second-highest productivity of the G8 countries, while Canada's is 5th based on the 1997 estimate. 
Five main reasons for the productivity gap: the lower capital intensity of economic activity in Canada; an innovation gap in Canada relative to the United States; Canada's relatively underdeveloped high-tech sector; and more limited economies of scale and scope in Canada.[citation needed] 
Like other small traditional communities in the territories, hunting, trapping, and fishing are major sources of income, but printmaking has taken over as the primary source of income in recent years. The two principal languages in Ulukhaktok are the Kangiryuarmiutun dialect of Inuinnaqtun, which is part of the Inuvialuktun group, and English. 
The community was covered in the Inuvialuit Final Agreement as part of their land claims and is in the Inuvialuit Settlement Region. 
The first people to settle in the area were Natkusiak and his family in 1937. Two years later, the Hudson's Bay Company relocated from Walker Bay and a Roman Catholic mission was opened the same year. 
The English name, Holman, was in honour of J.R. Holman, a member of Sir Edward Augustus Inglefield's 1853 expedition in search for the Arctic explorer, John Franklin. The community was sometimes known as Holman Island. This, however, is the name of the small island outcrop to the east-southeast in the Amundsen Gulf. 
The 2016 Census indicated a population of 396, a decrease of 1.5% from the 2011 Census and of these 370 (96.4%) were Inuvialuit or Inuit and the rest (6.6%) were non-Indigenous. The main languages in the community are Inuinnaqtun (Inuvialuktun) and English 
In the 1960s and 1970s Holman Eskimo Co-operative also created a number of sealskin products for southern markets, including parkas, tapestries and stuffed animals. The sealskin parkas were made to last and still show up on the market. The Prince of Wales Northern Heritage Centre in Yellowknife also has a parka in their collection. 
In 2001 the Winnipeg Art Gallery curated an exhibition "Holman: Forty Years of Graphic Art/Quarante Ans D'Art Graphique " which produced a exhibition catalogue authored by Winnipeg Art Gallery Curator Darlene Coward Wight. 
The Holman Eskimo Co-op is now involved in arts and crafts, retailing, the hotel business, and cable television. It operates both a Canada Post outlet, and the fuel delivery contract, and is the local Aklak Air agent. 
Carnival House is a landmark office building in the city of Southampton, Hampshire, England.  It is a purpose-built headquarters for Carnival UK, the United Kingdom operating company of Carnival Corporation & plc, the world's largest cruise shipping company.  The building was officially opened on Sunday 19 July 2009. 
Carnival House contains the head offices of P&O Cruises and Cunard Line. It also houses the UK offices of Princess Cruises, (headquartered in Santa Clarita, California) and Seabourn / Holland America Line (headquartered in Seattle, Washington). In addition Carnival Corporation's new build division is based in the building. 
Prior to the construction of Carnival House the company's five brands, Cunard, P&O Cruises, Ocean Village, Princess and Yachts of Seabourn, each had separate headquarters buildings. The senior architect aimed to create "a collective identity for the new headquarters whilst also allowing each of the five brands to maintain their own distinct identity." 
The distinctive wave patterns on the two panels of the building facade represent propagation of oceanic Rossby waves and were created by using real satellite data (sea surface height anomaly data from satellite altimetry) provided by Paolo Cipollini and Peter Challenor of the National Oceanography Centre, Southampton. 
Although much of the storm's damage was caused by straight-line winds (see downburst), several tornadoes were reported. 
One hard-hit area of Eau Claire was the Mill Run subdivision, at the time a part of the Town of Union, now a neighborhood on the city's north side. Many homes in the neighborhood were destroyed. Across US-12 from Mill Run are the headquarters of the home improvement retailer Menards, which also sustained major damage. Six residents of the Stardust Estates mobile home court were injured in the storm. 
A 25-year-old Dunn County woman was killed when a refrigerator in her mobile home fell on her during the storm. 
Farm property was hit very hard, with Dunn County receiving the worst damage. It was estimated that more than $27M of damage was done just to farm buildings in that county, and $8M in crops. More than 10,000 farms were initially without power after the storm.  Wisconsin National Guard and the DNR delivered water to farms. There were reports of cattle that had gone without water for 36 hours. 
Numerous concrete stave silos on the small Wisconsin dairy farms were blown in half with only the bottom half showing. 
It also caused the bankruptcy of the Martel Mutual Fire Insurance Company, which inexplicably did not have re-insurance coverage. Thus, many farmers had to pay hundreds or thousands of dollars in assessments to cover the final losses of the insurance company. 
Theories for the change in coverage include the massive influx of Cubans into the country; the Mount St. Helens eruption of 18 May; the severe tornadoes in Grand Island, Nebraska in June; and flooding in western Pennsylvania during August. The federal government's budget was badly impacted by these and other disasters. In all, there were 22 major disaster declarations in 1980. 
Compounding problems for the state was that the storm occurred in an election year. Frustrated Wisconsin officials, including Governor Lee Dreyfus, were not prepared for the difficulty in dealing with the federal government during such a time. 
Naanayam is a 1983 Indian Malayalam film, directed by I. V. Sasi. The film stars Madhu, Mammootty, Mohanlal and Srividya in the lead roles. The film super-duper hit at box office. The film has musical score by Shyam. 
The music was composed by Shyam and the lyrics were written by Yusufali Kechery and Poovachal Khader. 
The GPZ1000RX was to be the replacement for the original Ninja, the GPZ900R, but as it turned out the GPZ900R not only lived on alongside the GPZ1000RX, but outlived it. Just as the GPZ900R two years before, the 1000RX was the fastest production bike at the time.[citation needed] Until in 1988 the GPZ 1000RX was superseded by the ZX-10 "Tomcat". Yet still the GPZ900R remained, even beyond the 1990 release of Kawasaki's new flagship, the ZZ-R1100, until 2003. 
Latvia (Latvian: Latvija), officially the Republic of Latvia (Latvijas Republika), is a country in the Baltic region of Northern Europe. It is bordered to the north by Estonia, to the south by Lithuania, to the east by the Russian Federation, and to the southeast by Belarus. Across the Baltic Sea to the west lies Sweden. The capital of Latvia is Riga. The local time is GMT+2 (GMT+3 DST). 
Riga International Airport is the only major airport in Latvia, carrying around 5 million passengers annually. It is the largest airport in the Baltic states and has direct flights to over 80 destinations in 30 countries. It is also the main hub of airBaltic. 
The 2017 Rally Poland was the eighth round of the 2017 World Rally Championship and was the 74th running of the Rally Poland. Thierry Neuville and Nicolas Gilsoul won the rally. 
Ole Christian Veiby won the WRC-2 category for the first time, with WRC-2 championship leader Pontus Tidemand finishing second. 
Hawthorne was born on March 12, 1819, in Mercer County, Pennsylvania, to James and Mary (Donald) Hawthorne, who were of English descent. His father was a farmer and a graduate of Washington College, Pennsylvania.  J.C. commenced the study of medicine under Dr. Bascom of Mercer, Pennsylvania, and later earned a degree from the Medical University at Louisville, Kentucky. 
Hawthorne took an active interest in public affairs. Politically, he was originally a Whig, but after the overthrow of that party he became a Democrat. He commanded respect from members of both parties, and he was retained in office for many years when the state was under Republican rule. He declined to become a candidate for high public stations. 
He was a Christian, and for many years was a consistent member of the Episcopal Church. He was a productive and highly regarded man at the time of his death. 
A memorial for the patients of the Oregon Hospital for the Insane is being planned by Metro at the Lone Fir Cemetery, where it was recently uncovered that several hundred asylum patients are buried in unmarked graves.  Local historians are joining with mental health advocates to shape the memorial area. The gravesite and memorial area adjoins another segregated area for Chinese workers where a separate memorial is planned. 
On December 8, 1845, the Iowa State Register and Waterloo Herald was the first newspaper published in Waterloo. 
On June 7, 1934, bank robber Tommy Carroll had a shootout with the FBI when he and his wife stopped to pick up gas. Accidentally parking next to a police car and wasting time dropping his gun and picking it back up, Carroll was forced to flee into an alley, where he was shot. He was taken to Allen Memorial Hospital in Waterloo, where he soon died. 
In 1910, a significant number of black railroad workers were brought in as strikebreakers to the Waterloo area. Black workers were relegated to 20 square blocks in Waterloo, an area that remains the east side to this day. In 1940, more black strikebreakers were brought in to work in the Rath meat plant. In 1948, a black strikebreaker killed a white union member. Instead of a race riot, a strike ensued against the Rath Company. The National Guard was called in to end the 73-day strike. 
United Packinghouse Workers of America became the main union of the Rath Company, welcoming black workers, but United Auto Workers Local 838 continued to refuse black members. With the power of the union, Anna Mae Weems, Ada Treadwell, Charles Pearson and Jimmy Porter formed an anti-discrimination department at Rath by the 1950s. This department helped organize protests against local places that discriminated against blacks. 
Porter would go on to organize the first black radio station in Waterloo, KBBG, in 1978. Weems became the head of the anti-discrimination department and local NAACP chapter. 
On May 31, 1966, Eddie Wallace Sallis was found dead in the local jail. The black community felt the death was suspicious, and protests were held. On June 4, Weems led a march on city hall to encourage investigation into his death. The march led to the creation of the Waterloo Human Rights Commission, which lasted only a year due to lack of funding. 
The Iowa Supreme Court outlawed school segregation in 1868. A 1967 commission found most schools were still segregated and recommended immediate desegregation, which Mayor Lloyd Turner opposed. In 1969, the Waterloo school board voted to allow open enrollment in all their schools to encourage integration. Many parents felt it was not enough. Despite the efforts between 1967 and 1970, already-black schools in the area increased in their segregation. 
In August 1968, East High students Terri and Kathy Pearson gave the principal a list of grievances detailing how they felt the discrimination could be lessened. The principal refused to implement any of the requested changes. Student protests and walkouts continued through September. Students were angry that no African American history course was being taught, and that interracial dating was discouraged by teachers and administrators. 
In 2003, Governor Tom Vilsack created a task force to close the racial achievement gap in Waterloo. In 2009, a fair housing report, "Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing Choice", compiled by Mullin & Lonergan Associates Inc., found Waterloo to be Iowa's most segregated city.  "Historical patterns of racial segregation persist in Waterloo. Of the 20 cities in Iowa with populations exceeding 25,000, Waterloo ranks as the most segregated." 
Many activists who participated in the original protests feel that Waterloo has remained the same. In 2015, Huffpost listed Waterloo as the 10th worst city for black Americans. The site noted that the city's black residents have a 24% unemployment rate compared to 3.9% for whites, giving Waterloo one of the highest black unemployment rates among Midwest cities. Waterloo still has a higher percentage of blacks than most Iowa cities. 
In December 2012, Derrick Ambrose Jr. was shot by a police officer. Ambrose's family maintains he was unarmed, while the officer stated that he felt his life was in danger. A grand jury acquitted the officer. The shooting sparked outrage in the community. 
In areas not protected by the system, the Cedar River poured out of its banks and into parking lots, backyards and across the farmland surrounding the city. Although much damage was done, the larger downstream city of Cedar Rapids was much harder hit. 
According to the National Weather Service, the ten highest crests of the Cedar River recorded at East 7th Street in downtown Waterloo: 
Crests reported in the 1960s and earlier were before completion of major flood control projects and therefore may not be directly comparable. 
In September 2016, flood watches and warnings were put into effect for Waterloo and its surrounding cities. The crest was expected to just barely hit the height of the 2008 flood. 
The average elevation of Waterloo is 846 feet above sea level. The population density is 1101 people per square mile, considered low for an urban area. 
There were 28,607 households, of which 29.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 40.3% were married couples living together, 14.9% had a female householder with no husband present, 5.1% had a male householder with no wife present, and 39.8% were non-families. 31.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.35 and the average family size was 2.95. 
The median age in the city was 35.9 years. 23.7% of residents were under the age of 18; 10.4% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 26.4% were from 25 to 44; 25.5% were from 45 to 64; and 14% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 48.4% male and 51.6% female. 
As of the 2000 census, there were 68,747 people, 28,169 households, and 17,746 families residing in the city. The population density was 1,131.9 inhabitants per square mile (437.0/km2). There were 29,499 housing units at an average density of 485.7 per square mile (187.5/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 79.2% White, 14.5% African American, 1.1% Asian, 1.9% from other races, and 2.0% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino people of any race were 3.2% of the population. 
There were 28,169 households, out of which 29.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 46.0% were married couples living together, 13.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 37.0% were non-families. 30.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 12.1% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.39 and the average family size was 2.97. 
Age spread: 24.7% under the age of 18, 10.6% from 18 to 24, 27.5% from 25 to 44, 22.0% from 45 to 64, and 15.3% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 92.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 88.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $34,092, and the median income for a family was $42,731. Males had a median income of $31,491 versus $22,569 for females. The per capita income for the city was $18,558. About 10.0% of families and 13.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 18.6% of those under age 18 and 10.5% of those age 65 or over. 
The Waterloo-Cedar Falls Metropolitan Statistical Area consists of Black Hawk, Bremer, and Grundy counties. The area had a 2000 census population of 163,706 and a 2008 estimated population of 164,220. 
Waterloo is next to Cedar Falls, home to the University of Northern Iowa. Small suburbs include Evansdale, Hudson, Raymond, Elk Run Heights, Gilbertville, and Washburn. 
The largest employers in the Waterloo/Cedar Falls MSA, according to the Greater Cedar Valley Alliance, as of June 2016 include (in order): John Deere, Tyson Fresh Meats, Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare, UnityPoint Health, the University of Northern Iowa, HyVee Food Stores, Waterloo Community Schools, Target Regional Distribution Center, CBE Companies, Inc., City of Waterloo, and Bertch Cabinet Manufacturing. 
The Cedar Valley Arboretum & Botanic Gardens is a 40-acre public garden oasis located directly east of Hawkeye Community College.  Admission is $5/adult and $2/child, under five and members are free. 
The Waterloo Center for the Arts (WCA) is a regional center for visual and performance arts. It is owned and operated by the City of Waterloo with oversight by the advisory Waterloo Cultural and Arts Commission.  The Center is located at 225 Commercial Street. It is also an anchor for the Waterloo Cultural and Arts District (a State of Iowa designation). 
The permanent collection at the WCA includes the largest collection of Haitian art in the country, Midwest Regionalist art (including works by Grant Wood and Thomas Hart Benton), Mexican folk art, international folk art, American decorative arts, and public art. 
Included in the WCA is the Phelps Youth Pavilion (PYP), which opened in 2009. The PYP is an interactive children's museum. PYP provides additional gallery and studio space. 
The Riverloop Amphitheater, completed in 2011, is an outdoor plaza and amphitheater available to rent for events and weddings. The Riverloop Amphitheater also is home to Mark's Park, a water park playground open to the public. 
The WCA also houses the Waterloo Community Playhouse, the oldest community theatre in Iowa (operating since 1916), and the Black Hawk Children's Theatre, that started in 1964, then, merged with the Waterloo Community Playhouse in 1982. Both perform in the Hope Martin Theatre, which opened in 1965. The theatre's administrative offices are located across the street in the historic Walker Building. 
Established in 1932, the district started with an endowment set up in the will of Henry W. Grout. The district is a nonprofit educational entity that is active in engaging the students and all people from the surrounding communities. It is accredited by the American Alliance of Museums. 
The Grout Museum of History and Science, the first museum which would grow into the museum district, was displayed for many years in the building that was the local YMCA. The current building was completed and opened to the public as a not-for-profit museum in 1956. 
The Rensselaer Russell House is at 520 W. 3rd Street. Built in 1858, it is listed on the National Register of Historic Places. Rensselaer and Caroline Russell built the house utilizing Italianate architecture in 1861 for $5,878.83. 
The Carl A. and Peggy J. Bluedorn Science Imaginarium opened in 1993 and provides both interactive exhibits and formal demonstrations in various fields of science. 
The Snowden House is a two-story brick Victorian era house listed on the National Register of Historic Places was built in 1875. The house was once used as the Waterloo Woman's Club. 
Waterloo has one central public library. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, there were 92,342 patron visits resulting in a circulation of 199,249 items. The total collection consisted of 607,583 items. The library's reference services, supported by 4.75 FTE librarians, answered 28,970 questions. Its 99 public access computers provided over 30,047 sessions for patrons and the library's wireless network hosted 30,692 sessions. (Waterloo Public Library Annual Report).. 
The library is governed by a board of trustees, nominated by the city mayor and confirmed by the city council: John Berry, Larry Bjortomt, Ivy Hagedorn, Kathleen Wernimont and Cindy Wells. The library is directed by Nick Rossman, MLS.<> 
The Waterloo Public Library is in a renovated Great Depression era building that served as a post office and federal building (Waterloo Public Library history). The building was renovated in the late 1970s for use as a library. In 2011, the Waterloo Public Library celebrated 30 years at its Commercial Street location. 
Two New Deal-funded murals by artist Edgar Britton are on display at the library. Exposition is an image of the National Cattle Congress, and Holiday is of a picnic. 
Waterloo is administered by the mayor and council system of government. One council member is elected from each of Waterloo's five wards, and two are elected at-large. The current mayor is Quentin Hart. He is the City's first Black mayor. 
Hawkeye Community College is located in Waterloo. Neighboring Cedar Falls is home to the University of Northern Iowa. 
Almost all of the city is within the Waterloo Community School District. The three public high schools in the city are Waterloo West High School, Waterloo East High School, and Expo High School. Additionally a portion of the city is within the Cedar Falls Community School District. 
There is also a wide array of elementary and junior high schools in the area, with open enrollment available. 
Waterloo is located at the north end of Interstate 380. U.S. Highways 20, 63, and 218 and Iowa Highway 21, also run through the metropolitan area. The Avenue of the Saints runs through Waterloo. 
American Airlines provides non-stop air service to and from Chicago from the Waterloo Regional Airport as of April 3, 2012. As of October 27, 2014, American Airlines runs two flights to/from Chicago O'Hare (ORD). Departures to Chicago are early morning and mid/late afternoon. Arrivals are early/mid-afternoon and evening. 
Waterloo is served by one daily intercity bus arrival and departure to Chicago and Des Moines, provided by Burlington Trailways. New service to and from Mason City and Minneapolis/St. Paul provided by Jefferson Lines started in the fall of 2009. 
There are currently five taxi operators in Waterloo and Cedar Falls: First Call, Yellow, City Cab, Cedar Valley Cab, and Dolly's Taxi. 
Waterloo is home to two hospitals, Mercy One Waterloo Medical Center, which has 366 beds, and Unity Point Health  Allen Memorial Hospital,  with 234 beds. Neighboring Cedar Falls is home to Sartori Memorial Hospital, with 83 beds. The Waterloo-Cedar Falls metropolitan area has 295 physicians, 69 dentists, 52 chiropractors, 24 vision specialists and 21 nursing/retirement homes. 
The Beverly Hills Police Department (BHPD) is the police department of the City of Beverly Hills, California. 
The first law enforcement agency was formed shortly after the City of Beverly Hills was incorporated in 1914. The first city marshal was Augustus Niestrum with a deputy named Jack Munson whose home also served as the headquarters for both the city's Fire and Police Departments. A year later the department was expanded with addition of another officer. 
Two further officers joined in 1916. When Deputy Munson retired in 1919, the new City Marshal served as both Fire and Police Chief. After eight years in combined quarters, the Fire and Police Departments were separated in 1925. 
On August 1, 1927, the Beverly Hills Police Department became a municipal organization. Blair was reelected becoming its first Chief of Police. Blair was in charge of one captain, three lieutenants, four sergeants, four motor officers, twenty-three patrolmen and three clerks. 
The Beverly Hills Police Department moved to the city Hall in 1932. This remained its headquarters until 1990 when it moved to a new purpose-built police facility on Rexford Drive, Beverly Hills. 
The Beverly Hills Police Department has been featured in several films including the Beverly Hills Cop series and the 1986 comedy movie Down and Out in Beverly Hills. 
The rufous-headed woodpecker (Celeus spectabilis) is a species of bird in the family Picidae. It formerly included Kaempfer's woodpecker as a subspecies. 
It is found in the western Amazon basin in northern Bolivia, far southwestern Brazil (Acre only), eastern Ecuador, and eastern Peru. Its natural habitats are tropical humid forests and woodland. It is often associated with bamboo. 
The rufous-headed woodpecker has a large range and a presumed large total population. It is generally considered to be uncommon, and the total number of birds is likely to be in slow decline, but the International Union for Conservation of Nature has assessed its conservation status as being of least concern. 
Artillery in the Middle Ages primarily consisted of the introduction of the cannon, large tubular firearms designed to fire a heavy projectile over a long distance. Guns, bombs, rockets and cannons were first invented in China during the Han Chinese Song Dynasty and then later spread to Europe and the Middle East during the period. 
The Middle English word Canon was derived from the Tuscan word cannone, meaning large tube, which came from Latin canna, meaning cane or reed. The Latinised word canon has been used for a gun since 1326 in Italy, and since 1418 in English. The word Bombardum, or "bombard", was the earliest term used for "cannon", but from 1430 it came to refer only to the largest weapons. 
The Arabs acquired knowledge of gunpowder between 1240 and 1280, by which time there were written Arabic recipes for gunpowder, instructions for the purification of saltpeter, and descriptions of gunpowder incendiaries. 
In Europe, one of the earliest mentions of gunpowder appeared in Roger Bacon's Opus Majus in 1267. It describes a recipe for gunpowder and recognized its military use: 
In reference to the siege to Alicante in 1331, the Spanish historian Zurita recorded a "new machine that caused great terror. It threw iron balls with fire." The Spanish historian Juan de Mariana recalled further use of cannons during the Siege of Algeciras (1342-1344): 
The besieged did great harm among the Christians with iron bullets they shot. This is the first time we find any mention of gunpowder and ball in our histories.
Juan de Mariana also relates that the English Earl of Derby and Earl of Salisbury had both participated in the siege of Algeciras, and they could have conceivably transferred the knowledge about the effectiveness of cannon to England. 
The first artillery-masters on the Peninsula probably were Moors in Christian service. The king of Navarre had a Moor in his service in 1367 as maestro de las guarniciones de artilleria. The Morisques of Tudela at that time had fame for their capacity in reparaciones de artilleria.
Another small-bore cannon of the 14th century was the culverin, whose name derives from the snake-like handles attached to it. It was transitional between the handgun and the full cannon, and was used as an anti-personnel weapon. The culverin was forged of iron and fixed to a wooden stock, and usually placed on a rest for firing. 
The culverin was also common in 15th century battles, particularly among Burgundian armies. As the smallest of medieval gunpowder weapons, it was relatively light and portable. It fired lead shot, which was inexpensive relative to other available materials. 
The 55-day bombardment of Constantinople left massive destruction, as recounted by the Greek chronicler Kritovoulos: 
And the stone, borne with enormous force and velocity, hit the wall, which it immediately shook and knocked down and was itself broken into many fragments and scattered, hurling the pieces everywhere and killing those who happened to be nearby.
To guard against artillery and gunfire, increasing use was made of earthen, brick and stone breastworks and redoubts, such as the geometric fortresses of the 17th century French Marquis de Vauban.  Although the obsolescence of castles as fortifications was hastened by the developments of cannon from the 14th century on, many medieval castles still managed to "put up a prolonged resistance" against artillery during the English Civil War of 17th century. 
Candida keroseneae is a species of yeast in the genus Candida, family Saccharomycetaceae. Described as new to science in 2011, it was isolated from aviation fuel. 
The 2010 FC Krasnodar season was the club's 3rd season and their 2nd season in the Russian First Division. They finished the season in 5th place, and earnt promotion to the Russian Premier League, the highest tier of association football in Russia, after FC Saturn withdrew from the Premier League. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Adolf Fehr (born 23 October 1940) is a Liechtenstein former alpine skier who competed in the 1960 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to alpine skiing in Liechtenstein is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A delicacy is usually a rare or expensive food item that is considered highly desirable, sophisticated or peculiarly distinctive, within a given culture. Irrespective of local preferences, such a label is typically pervasive throughout a region. Often this is because of unusual flavors or characteristics or because it is rare or expensive compared to standard staple foods. 
This article about the Municipality of Slovenska Bistrica in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In July 2014 the International Astronomical Union launched NameExoWorlds, a process for giving proper names to certain exoplanets and their host stars. The process involved public nomination and voting for the new names. In December 2015, the IAU announced the winning name was Samh for this planet. The winning name was submitted by the Vega Astronomy Club of Morocco and honours the 11th Century astronomer Ibn al-Samh of Muslim Spain. 
Upsilon Andromedae c was detected by measuring variations in its star's radial velocity as a result of the planet's gravity. This was done by making precise measurements of the Doppler shift of the spectrum of Upsilon Andromedae A. At the time of discovery, Upsilon Andromedae A was already known to host one extrasolar planet, the hot Jupiter Upsilon Andromedae b, however by 1999 it was clear that the inner planet could not explain the velocity curve. 
In 1999, astronomers at both San Francisco State University and the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics independently concluded that a three-planet model best fit the data. The two new planets were designated Upsilon Andromedae c and Upsilon Andromedae d. 
Like the majority of long-period extrasolar planets, the orbit of Upsilon Andromedae c is eccentric, more so than any of the major planets in the Solar System (including Pluto). If placed in the Solar System, Upsilon Andromedae c would lie between the orbits of Earth and Venus. 
The high orbital eccentricity may be the result of gravitational perturbations from the planet Upsilon Andromedae d. Simulations suggest that the orbit of Upsilon Andromedae c returns to its original circular state roughly once every 9,000 years. 
One proposal is that interactions between Upsilon Andromedae d and a (now lost) outer planet moved Upsilon Andromedae d into an orbit closer to the star, where it gradually caused the orbit of Upsilon Andromedae c to become eccentric. If so, the rogue planet would have had to eject immediately. 
Given the planet's high mass, it is likely that Upsilon Andromedae c is a gas giant with no solid surface. Since the planet has only been detected indirectly through observations of its star, properties such as its radius, composition, and temperature are unknown. 
Since its actual mass is approximately 14 times that of Jupiter, and its star's metallicity is similar to that of the Sun, Upsilon Andromedae c may actually be a small brown dwarf, but this may not be the case. 
This article article about the history of Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ellen D. Ketterson is an American evolutionary biologist, behavioral ecologist, neuroendocrinologist and ornithologist best known for her experimental approach to the study of life-history trade-offs in a songbird, the Dark-eyed Junco. She is currently a Distinguished Professor of Biology, Director of the Environmental Resilience Institute, and affiliate professor in Congnitive Science, Gender Studies, Integrative Study of Animal Behavior, and Neuroscience at Indiana University. 
Ketterson obtained all of her degrees from Indiana University. She received A.B. in 1966 and M.A. in 1968, both in Botany. She received her Ph.D. in 1974 in Zoology. 
Ketterson and her trainees, with her longtime collaborator and partner Val Nolan, Jr., have conducted long-term field studies combined with experimental manipulation of free-living dark-eyed juncos at the Mountain Lake Biological Station in Virginia since the 1970s. Early in her career, Ketterson focused on differential migration, a pattern of movement in which females migrate farther than males. 
The Ketterson research group currently conducts field research at a number of sites throughout the range of junco species, including in Indiana at Kent Farm on the Indiana University Research and Teaching Preserve, in the Appalachian Mountains in Virginia at the Mountain Lakes Biological Station, in California on the University of California, San Diego campus and at Laguna Mountain, in northwest Wyoming at Grand Teton National Park, Idaho, South Dakota, Mexico, and Guatemala. 
The 2013 documentary film project, 'Ordinary Extraordinary Junco: Remarkable Biology from a Backyard Bird' highlights years of research conducted by Ketterson and her colleagues. 
Ketterson was married for 28 years to the ornithologist Val Nolan, Jr., her Ph.D. mentor and long-time collaborator, until his death in 2008. 
Laurel Bay is a census-designated place and military housing complex in Beaufort County, South Carolina, United States. The population was 5,891 at the 2010 census. As defined by the U.S. Census Bureau, Laurel Bay is included within the Hilton Head Island-Bluffton-Beaufort, SC Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
The base primarily houses military personnel with families that are stationed at the nearby military bases: MCAS Beaufort, MCRD Parris Island, and USNH Beaufort. The housing area first opened in the mid-1950s. 
Chester Field, located within the housing area, was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1970. 
There were 1,888 households, out of which 72.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 79.7% were married couples living together, 8.2% had a female householder with no husband present, and 9.3% were non-families. 6.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 0.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 3.51 and the average family size was 3.63. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 42.8% under the age of 18, 11.4% from 18 to 24, 39.1% from 25 to 44, 5.5% from 45 to 64, and 1.2% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 23 years. For every 100 females, there were 101.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 100.2 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $40,777, and the median income for a family was $39,236. Males had a median income of $28,512 versus $21,452 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $12,686. About 4.6% of families and 4.6% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.8% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
Simion Filip is a Romanian-Moldovan mathematician and an associate professor of mathematics at the University of Chicago who works in dynamical systems and algebraic geometry. 
Filip graduated with an A.B. in mathematics from Princeton University in 2009. He attended Part III of the Mathematical Tripos at the University of Cambridge where he received a master's degree with distinction in 2010. He received his Ph.D. under the supervision of Alex Eskin at the University of Chicago in 2016. 
Filip spent two postdoctoral years as a Junior Fellow at Harvard University from 2016 to 2018, and another year at the Institute for Advanced Study. Since 2019, he has been an associate professor at the University of Chicago. 
Filip received a five-year Clay Research Fellowship lasting from 2016 to 2021. In 2020, Filip was one of the recipients of the EMS Prize. 
 Michael Francis Ward (1845-17 June 1881) was an Irish doctor, surgeon, politician  and nationalist MP in the House of Commons of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland and as member of the Home Rule League represented Galway Borough from 1874 until 1880. 
Ward accepted an offer of a position on the Government Medical Service in Demerara in 1881. He died shortly after arriving in the colony, on 17 June 1881. 
In December 2018, after residing in Hong Kong for more than 7 years, Ekwegwo was granted the HKSAR passport, making him eligible to be registered as a local player in Hong Kong. 
The Body Said No! is a 1950 British crime comedy film directed by Val Guest and starring Michael Rennie, Yolande Donlan, and Hy Hazell. 
In a British TV studio, Michael Rennie (as himself) is performing live in a dramatic broadcast. On a neighbouring set, cabaret singer Mikki Brent thinks she sees a coded plot being discussed to murder Rennie. Her friends are sceptical, but she warns Rennie, and various adventures and investigations ensue. 
This article related to a British film of the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
WVTV-DT2's parent station maintains studio facilities on Calumet Road in the Park Place office park near the I-41/US 45 interchange on Milwaukee's northwest side; its transmitter is located on North Humboldt Boulevard in Milwaukee's Estabrook Park neighborhood as part of the Milwaukee PBS tower. 
By 1988, the station scored a major coup by acquiring the broadcast rights to the Milwaukee Brewers and the Milwaukee Bucks, both previously seen on WVTV. In the late 1980s, Arlington Broadcasting was sold and became known as HR Broadcasting (as in Hal Roach Studios, of Little Rascals/Our Gang fame). By the end of the 1980s, WCGV had pulled almost even with WVTV in the ratings. 
WCGV and Birmingham's WTTO were purchased by Abry Communications in 1990. The station continued with its general entertainment format, along with Fox programs. WCGV entered into a local marketing agreement with WVTV (then owned by Gaylord Broadcasting) in 1994. Although WCGV was the senior partner, the combined operation was based at WVTV's original studio facility near North 35th Street and Capitol Drive. 
WCGV-TV carried the 2017 Monster Energy NASCAR Cup Series Bass Pro Shops NRA Night Race at Bristol Motor Speedway from NBC on August 19, 2017 for WTMJ, which was committed to a preseason Green Bay Packers football game. 
From June 2012 until the end of December 2013, the engineering and master control of WVTV/WCGV transmitted 16:9 syndicated programming in full screen, but in standard definition as a stopgap solution until the move to the new studios. Upon the opening of the new master control, all syndicated programming available in the format now is aired in high definition. 
Ultimately, the merger with Tribune (and with it, Sinclair's acquisition of WITI) was called off due to a number of issues on August 8, 2018, leaving WVTV as Sinclair's only Milwaukee over-the-air asset. In another deal, Sinclair would acquire a majority stake in the Fox Sports Networks in the fall of 2019, and with it, Fox Sports Wisconsin. 
As mentioned above, the station shares WVTV's bandwidth and is officially recognized as a WVTV subchannel (including within station identifications, where it simply identifies as "WVTV Milwaukee" like 18.1; if going by actual physical channel without PSIP intervention, channel 24's three channels are 27.4, 27.5 and 27.6), but retains its own multiplexed channel map as channel 24: 
On January 1, 2015, WCGV launched Grit on their third subchannel, which was added to Charter systems on channel 178 on March 10, 2015. It was discontinued on January 8, 2018 upon the channel sharing with WVTV taking effect; WTMJ-TV took it for their fourth subchannel nearly immediately as described above. 
As part of the SAFER Act, WCGV kept its analog signal on the air until March 4 to inform viewers of the digital television transition through a loop of public service announcements from the National Association of Broadcasters. 
The only surviving son of Prince Alfonso Doria Pamphili, a Senator of Italy, and Lady Emily Pelham-Clinton, his grandfather also married an English aristocrat, Lady Mary Talbot, whom he met at Queen Victoria's coronation. 
Prince Filippo was the first Mayor of Rome elected after World War II, and its last mayor under the Kingdom of Italy. 
In 1921 he married Gesine Mary Dykes, OStJ, a Scottish nurse who had brought him back to health after he had been injured in a sculling accident while at Cambridge. 
She predeceased him in 1955 and Prince Filippo died in Rome, Italy. Their only child, Princess Orietta, succeeded him as the 14th and last holder of the family's princely title. 
Richard Herbert (1557-buried 15 October 1596), Lord of Cherbury (or Chirbury) in Shropshire, and of Montgomery Castle, was an English Justice of the Peace and Parliamentarian. 
Richard was the eldest son of Edward Herbert through whom he was a member of a collateral branch of the family of the Earls of Pembroke. He was a law student at the Middle Temple in 1576. 
After his death in 1596 while his wife was pregnant with their tenth child, Richard Herbert was buried on 15 October under a canopied tomb in the parish church of Saint Nicholas, Montgomery. His family moved to Oxford and then to London. 
Vesperus sanzi is a species of beetle in the Vesperidae family that can be found in Portugal and western Spain. 
At the dawn of cable television, Zehner, a Milwaukee train enthusiast, began producing and hosting the interview format show Just Trains on Milwaukee's local access channel on Viacom Cable. Eventually the show was picked up on the cable network around Milwaukee, After 72 shows Milwaukee's WMVS Channel 10 (PBS) agreed to air a new magazine format show On Track in the Milwaukee market. For the second season it was renamed Tracks Ahead and expanded to the PBS network. 
Lucy Mason is a politician from Arizona. Mason served for 8 years in the Arizona State House of Representatives. 
Mason was educated at Arizona State University, the University of Houston, Northern Arizona University and the University of Arizona. 
Mason began her political career as a member of the Prescott City Council. She served for eight years in the Arizona State legislature, four of them as chair of the State House energy committee. She ran for the Arizona Corporation Commission in 2014. The Arizona Solar Energy Industries Association (AriSEIA) Board of Directors is pleased to announce it has hired former Republican State Representative Lucy Mason as its Executive Director November 2014. 
The legislative districts of Agusan del Sur are the representations of the province of Agusan del Sur in the various national legislatures of the Philippines. The province is currently represented in the lower house of the Congress of the Philippines through its first and second congressional districts. 
Republic Act No. 4979, approved in a plebiscite held simultaneously with the 1967 elections, split the old Agusan Province into Agusan del Norte and Agusan del Sur and provided them each with a congressional representative. In accordance with Section 7 of R.A. 4979, Agusan del Sur first elected its separate representative starting in the 1969 elections. 
Agusan del Sur was represented in the Interim Batasang Pambansa as part of Region X from 1978 to 1984, and returned one representative, elected at large, to the Regular Batasang Pambansa in 1984. 
Under the new Constitution which was proclaimed on February 11, 1987, the province constituted a lone congressional district, and it elected its member to the restored House of Representatives starting that same year. 
The approval of Republic Act No. 9508 on October 20, 2008 divided the province into two congressional districts, which elected their separate representatives starting in the 2010 elections. 
Agusan del Sur has been represented in the lower house of various Philippine national legislatures since 1987 through its first and second congressional districts. 
The municipalities of Agusan del Sur are represented in the Agusan del Sur Provincial Board, the Sangguniang Panlalawigan (provincial legislature) of the province, through Agusan del Sur's first and second provincial board districts. 
Off the field, Sharp plays in the State Basketball League, having played for the East Perth Eagles in 2016 and 2017 before joining the Kalamunda Eastern Suns in 2018. 
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Zachariassen is best known for her work as a painter in the Faroe Islands. The height of her creative output was in the 1950s and '60s. 
Her early work in the '30s and '40s is more romantic in style, but her midcentury work takes on more abstract, cubist elements. Zachariassen's paintings were always figurative, however. Her painting style was "characterized by geometric figures in compositions portraying landscapes, towns, villages, and people." Critics also note her innovative use of color. 
Despite her stylistic innovations, Zachariassen's work, which frequently depicts the relationship between humans and nature, is firmly grounded in the Faroese landscape painting tradition. 
Sinhasani is a town and Village Development Committee  in Bara District in the Narayani Zone of south-eastern Nepal. At the time of the 1991 Nepal census it had a population of 3,520 persons living in 589 individual households. 
This article about a location in Bara District, Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Twenty-three teams were invited to take part in the race. These included four UCI WorldTeams, eleven UCI Professional Continental teams and eight UCI Continental teams. 
Dillon Falls was named for Moses Dillon, who settled here at the falls of the Licking River. A variant name was Dillon. A post office called Dillon was established in 1887, and remained in operation until 1908. Besides the post office, Dillon Falls had a station on the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad. 
This Muskingum County, Ohio state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bodrhyddan Hall is a country house in Rhuddlan, Denbighshire, Wales. It is a Grade I listed building. 
The present building is a 1690s remodelling of an earlier building dating from the 16th century. It was later upgraded by the architect William Eden Nesfield, who in 1875 added a new west facing entrance front and a service wing and refaced the east front. 
The hall is built in brick in 3 storeys with some terracotta detail and slate roofs. The west entrance frontage has 5 bays with a 4-storey projecting porch. The side elevations have 9 bays (arranged 2-1-3-1-2), the south front looking over a parterre. 
Some of the garden features and outbuildings are also listed. The house and gardens may be visited by the public. 
Bodrhyddan traditionally belonged to the Conway family, descending in the male line until the death of the last male heir, Sir John Conway, 2nd Baronet, in 1721. Bodrhyddan then passed via his daughter Penelope to the Stapletons and eventually by marriage to Rev. William Davies Shipley, Dean of St Asaph. The dean's eldest son was killed in a shooting accident and so the Hall passed to his grandson William, who adopted the surname Shipley-Conwy. 
Portrait of the Marquise de la Solana is a 1795 full length portrait by Francisco Goya of his friend the Marquise de la Solana. It now hangs in the Louvre in Paris, to which it was given in 1953 by Carlos de Beistegui. 
This biographical article related to a Scottish midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thalassoplanes modesta is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Buccinidae, the true whelks. 
In computer graphics, non-uniform rational mesh smooth (NURMS) or subdivision surface technique is typically applied to a low-polygonal mesh to create a high-polygonal smoothed mesh.  
NURMS are used in commercial 3D packages such as Autodesk 3ds Max to perform mesh smoothing operations. The mesh smooth modifier in 3ds Max operates by applying this algorithm to a low-polygon mesh and creates a high-polygon smoothed mesh. The new mesh can be dynamically manipulated by the low-polygon mesh to achieve the desired results.  There is also an Adobe Illustrator filter that uses the same algorithm of smoothing for 2d curves. 
This article about the Municipality of Kostanjevica na Krki in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Classic World Productions-, based in Naperville, Illinois,  was a significant issuer of back music catalogues and television programs. 
In the early days of the last siege of Constantinople in 1453, Ottoman forces captured Therapia - then a minor Byzantine fortification. Some 40 surrendered soldiers were  impaled. 
Tarabya was where the foreign embassies had their summer houses during the Ottoman period, and today the area has several European consulates. 
Sultan Selim II used to enjoy eating fish in this area and asked his grand vizier, Sokollu Mehmed Pasha, to build a palace for him where he can spend the summers. It is believed that Sultan Selim II called his palace Tarabiye which means "pleasure", and the name of the neighbourhood (Tarabya) has derived from the name of this palace. 
Besides its historical monuments, Tarabya is famous for its seafood restaurants, bistros and nightclubs. 
This geographical article about a location in Istanbul Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Wat Lamai is a Buddhist temple in the old part of Ban Lamai (usually known as Lamai Beach) on the resort island of Ko Samui, Thailand. Located adjacent to a main bend in Thai Route 4161, the island's ring road, it has a museum of Buddhist artifacts and the history of Ko Samui and also has a cultural hall for public cultural events and other gatherings such as weddings and funerals. 
John Krokidas  is an American film director, screenwriter, and producer, best known for his directorial debut film, the 2013 biographical drama Kill Your Darlings. 
Krokidas attended Yale University, where he originally enrolled into acting. Krokidas graduated with a B.A. in theater and American studies, as well as a Distinction in the Major. He later attended New York University, where he studied the Graduate Film program. Krokidas has Greek, Italian, and Jewish ancestry. His maternal grandmother was Jewish. 
During his time at New York University, Krokidas began directing short films such as Shame No More (1999) and Slo-Mo (2001). After graduation, he signed a three-year contract with film company Miramax Films, having earlier done script coverage for the studio. In 2013, Krokidas directed, co-wrote and produced his first feature film, Kill Your Darlings, starring Daniel Radcliffe. 
This article about a United States film director born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Yadarnarbon came in as the champions of the 2014 Myanmar National League. Hanthawaddy United and Rakhine United entered as the two promoted teams from the 2014 Myanmar National League 2. 
This season will be the first Myanmar National League season to have Ooredoo as the title sponsor, after penning a deal worth US $1.5 million per year on 20 March 2015. 
A total of 12 teams will compete in the league: 10 sides from the 2014 season and two promoted teams from the 2014 Myanmar National League 2. The two promoted clubs replace Southern Myanmar United and Gospel For Asia. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as has been defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The number of foreign players is restricted to four per club, including a slot for a player from AFC countries. 
Together with Saint Domnin, he decided to go preach in the Alps, converting the most people into Christianity in Digne-les-Bains. In the early days of Christianity, the missionaries became the first bishops in the main regions they evangelized in. He was part of the first teams of missionaries sent to evangelise Provence. 
This article about a French Catholic bishop or archbishop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Water heat recycling (also known as drain water heat recovery, waste water heat recovery, greywater heat recovery,[citation needed] or sometimes shower water heat recovery[citation needed]) is the use of a heat exchanger to recover energy and reuse heat from drain water from various activities such as dish-washing, clothes washing and especially showers.  The technology is used to reduce primary energy consumption for water heating. 
Heating water accounts for 18% of the average household utility bill. Standard units save up to 60% of the heat energy that is otherwise lost down the drain when using the shower.[citation needed] 
Installing a water heat recycler reduces energy consumption and thus greenhouse gas emissions and the overall energy dependency of the household. 
A 2-year independent study of waste water heat recovery systems installed into residential houses in the UK found savings of 380kWh and 500kWh per person per year. 
A heat pump can be combined with municipal sewage lines to allow a large building's HVAC system recycle the winter heat or summer cool (compared to the outside air) of water flowing out of many homes and businesses. 
Mid Glamorgan (Welsh: Morgannwg Ganol) is a preserved county of Wales.  From 1974 until 1996 it was also an administrative county with a county council. 
Mid Glamorgan was formed in 1974 under the Local Government Act 1972.  It consisted of part of the former administrative county of Glamorgan and the county borough of Merthyr Tydfil, along with the parishes of Penderyn and Vaynor from Brecknockshire and the urban districts of Bedwas and Machen, Rhymney and part of Bedwellty, from Monmouthshire. 
Mid Glamorgan and its component districts were abolished in 1996 and the area split into the unitary authorities of Bridgend, Merthyr Tydfil, Rhondda Cynon Taf and part of Caerphilly as a result of the Local Government (Wales) Act 1994. 
The communities of Wick, St Brides Major, Ewenny (from the Ogwr district) became part of the Vale of Glamorgan county borough, while Pentyrch (from the Taff-Ely district) was added to the Cardiff unitary authority area.  Because of this, they became part of the preserved county of South Glamorgan.  In 2003 the ceremonial borders were further adjusted, placing the entire Caerphilly county borough in the ceremonial county of Gwent. 
The Mid Glamorgan County Council's offices were located in the Glamorgan Building (the former headquarters of Glamorgan County Council) in Cathays Park, Cardiff outside the Mid Glamorgan boundaries. 
This journal is indexed in Current Contents/Physical, Chemical & Earth Sciences, the Science Citation Index Expanded, and Scopus. According to the Journal Citation Reports, the journal has a 2019 impact factor of 2.063. 
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Healthcare in Northamptonshire is now the responsibility of Northamptonshire Clinical Commissioning Group, with some involvement of Cambridgeshire and Peterborough CCG. 
Two practices in the county are in Cambridgeshire and Peterborough Clinical Commissioning Group. The remaining 74 are in Northamptonshire CCG, including Lakeside Surgery, the biggest general practice in the National Health Service with 62 partners. 
Kettering General Hospital NHS Foundation Trust and Northampton General Hospital NHS Trust are the main acute providers in the county. 
Northamptonshire Healthcare NHS Foundation Trust provide the majority of the community services in the county including community nursing and therapy services.  
Northamptonshire Healthcare NHS Foundation Trust in conjunction with the county council set up a new organisation,  First for Wellbeing, in November 2015 to provide public health services including debt advice, smoking cessation and weight management. Badby Park is a specialist provider of care for people with long term conditions. 
The 8 national teams involved in the tournament were required to register a squad of 21 players, including three goalkeepers. Only players in these squads were eligible to take part in the tournament. Players born on or after 1 January 1997 were eligible to compete in the tournament. On 5 November 2019, CAF published the final lists with squad numbers on their website. 
The full squad listings are below. The position listed for each player is per the official squad list published by CAF. The age listed for each player is on 8 November 2019, the first day of the tournament. The nationality for each club reflects the national association (not the league) to which the club is affiliated. A flag is included for coaches who are of a different nationality than their own national team. 
The preliminary squad was announced on 23 October 2019. The final squad was announced on 29 October 2019. 
The preliminary squad was announced on 2 October 2019. The final squad was announced on 29 October 2019. 
The preliminary squad was announced on 9 October 2019. The final squad was announced on 1 November 2019. 
The preliminary squad was announced on 5 October 2019. The squad was then trimmed-down on 21 October 2019. The final squad was announced on 29 October 2019. 
This article about a location in Benton County, Arkansas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Multai railway station is a railway station in Multai town of Madhya Pradesh. Its code is MTY. It serves Multai town. The station consists of three platforms. Passenger, Express and Superfast trains halt here. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Madhya Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
OC Parks closed many of their parks to vehicular traffic in March 2020 due to COVID-19 safety concerns. Pedestrians and horseback riders were still permitted to enter the parks. In December 2020, OC Parks was permitted to use sand cubes and boulders to temporarily prevent erosion in Capistrano Beach while looking for a permanent solution. 
OC Parks hosted a virtual Halloween event as well as a series of drive-in movie nights amidst the COVID-19 pandemic in 2020. 
Dhanushka Jayakody (born July 18, 1981 in Colombo, Sri Lanka) is a business consultant from Sri Lanka. He served as the Country Representative of MTI Consulting in Sri Lanka, Bangladesh and Pakistan. and a project manager of MTI operation in India. He was also a board of advisors for AIESEC in Sri Lanka and Pakistan. He was the CEO of Colombo Institute of Social Sciences (CISS) and currently involved with Symbiosis Business Partners based in Australia. 
Jayakody was born and raised in Colombo, Sri Lanka. He studied at Royal College. He then went to Chartered Institute of Marketing and graduated in 2001. He holds an MBA from University of Wales. He is a fellow member of the Chartered Institute of Marketing of the United Kingdom and Institute of Certified Management Accountants of Australia. 
In 2005, Jayakody was promoted to Country representative of MTI Consulting in Bangladesh. He was also the project manager of MTI operation in Bengaluru area of India. In 2006, Jayakody became the Country manager of MTI operation in Pakistan and served until July 2009.  In August 2009, he became the head of Corporate Solutions of MTI Consulting in Sri Lanka and served until the end of 2010. He has handled a number of Strategic Planning, Re-Structuring and Marketing projects. 
In 2011, he joined as a senior consultant of Symbiosis Business Partners and currently involved with its operation in Australia. 
In 2007, Jayakody was appointed to the local Board of Directors for AIESEC Karachi. Having served as a board advisor to the AIESEC movement in Pakistan, Jayakody has given thought leadership on several contemporary matters from a South Asian perspective and has been a speaker at various conferences. He has been also involved with the Institute of Personnel. He was a member of the Panel of Judges at the Great HR Debate of the IPM Sri Lanka in 2009, 2011, 2012 and 2014.[citation needed] 
The 1960 Wisconsin Badgers football team represented the University of Wisconsin in the 1960 Big Ten Conference football season. 
Matthias Hummel (born 3 November 1984) is a German former footballer who played as a centre-back, and current assistant manager of TSV Bordesholm. 
After retiring from playing football in 2016, Hummel became the technical director of ETSV Weiche Flensburg. In 2017, he was appointed as the assistant manager of TSV Bordesholm. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Explorers" is the 68th episode of the television series Star Trek: Deep Space Nine, the 22nd episode of the third season. It premiered May 8, 1995. 
Set in the 24th century, the series follows the adventures of the crew of the space station Deep Space Nine near the planet Bajor, as the Bajorans recover from a decades-long, brutal occupation by the imperialistic Cardassians. In this episode, the human station commander Benjamin Sisko, having taken an interest in Bajoran culture, builds a replica of an ancient Bajoran spacecraft. 
Sisko has obtained diagrams of a lightship and decides to build the vessel and retrace the route of the ancient Bajorans. A brief conversation with the Cardassian officer Dukat reveals political undertones to the adventure: a success would mean accepting accomplishments of the ancient Bajorans that the Cardassians have dismissed as "fairy tales". Despite initial reluctance, Sisko's son Jake agrees to accompany him on the voyage. 
The trip proves an opportunity for the Siskos to talk. Jake reveals that he has been accepted to the Pennington Institute, a prestigious school in Wellington, New Zealand; but he plans to defer his admission so as not to leave his father alone on Deep Space Nine. He also recommends that his father start dating again. 
The Bajoran lightship was designed by Jim Martin working under production designer Herman Zimmerman. The special effect shots were done using computer generated imagery (CGI) produced by Industrial Light & Magic. 
The episode has been noted for being optimistic, featuring what one review called "an enthusiasm for space exploration". Screen Rant rated it the 13th most hopeful episode of Star Trek television. 
In 2020, Io9 said this was one of the "must watch" episodes from the series remarking that it has "emotional, important father-son time between Sisko and his son". 
This episode was released on October 2, 1998 in Japan as part of the half-season LaserDisc box set 3rd Season vol.2. 
The episode was released on June 3, 2003 in North America as part of the season 3 DVD box set. The DVD includes the featurette "Sailing Through the Stars: A Special Look at 'Explorers'", which featured discussion with the production designer Herman Zimmerman on the design of the lightship, as well as concept art from the episode. The episode was released again in 2017 with the complete series DVD box set, which again included the "Sailing Through the Stars" featurette. 
It was released as on VHS tape by Paramount Home Video (catalog number VHR4145), paired with "The Die is Cast" on the same videocassette. 
The name Rising Dream has in a short time become a brand in the European metal community when the Croatian scene is talked about. Five years since it was founded, the band deservingly became the leader of the scene.[citation needed] 
Beginning the April 23rd, Rising Dream, together with German thrash metal band Destruction began a special leg of the Destruction world tour D.E.V.O.L.U.T.I.O.N., which is also first leg of their Failed Tour 2009, showcasing their album Failed Apocalypse all around Europe. This leg will occupy 12 shows in 8 countries (Switzerland, Italy, Austria, Slovakia, Romania, Bulgaria, Greece and Serbia). 
Vacusus is a genus of antlike flower beetles in the family Anthicidae. There are about six described species in Vacusus. 
As a child, Bell appeared as a model in many young teen girl magazines, as well as regular TV appearances. At the age of 16, she entered a modelling competition organised by the Daily Sport, winning out of several thousand entrants. 
Bell recorded a single titled Down 'n Dirty in 2003 and performed a concert in Colchester in aid of the Army Benevolent Fund.  
Bell is a vegan, and supports the British animal rights group Vegetarians' International Voice for Animals (Viva). 
Heisenberg worked on the article while recovering from hay fever on the island of Heligoland, corresponding with Wolfgang Pauli on the subject.  When asked for his opinion of the manuscript, Pauli responded favorably, but Heisenberg said that he was still "very uncertain about it".  In July 1925, he sent the manuscript to Max Born to review and decide whether to submit it for publication. 
In the article, Heisenberg tried to explain the energy levels of a one-dimensional anharmonic oscillator, avoiding the concrete but unobservable representations of electron orbits by using observable parameters such as transition probabilities for quantum jumps, which necessitated using two indexes corresponding to the initial and final states. 
Yuki took up fencing in his elementary school years at the instigation of his father, a Zorro fan and keen amateur fencer. He won the national junior high school championships. In Heian High School, he got third consecutive championship victories in national high school championships. 
In 2006, Ota resumed training with Japan's national coach, Ukrainian Oleg Matseichuk, from whom he had always kept his distances before. He won a gold medal at the 2006 Asian Games in Doha and at the 2008 Asian Fencing Championships held in Bangkok. 
At the 2012 Summer Olympics, he lost in the third round of the individual foil competition, but won a silver medal in the team foil event. At the 2015 World Fencing Championships, he won gold in the Men's foil event, becoming the first Japanese to win a world championship in any event in fencing. 
Ota graduated from Doshisha University. He is a member of the athletes commission of the International Fencing Federation. 
The MNL Myanmar 2013 is the Myanmar National League's fourth full regular season. The fixture schedule was released on third weeks of December 2012. The season is scheduled to begin on 5 January 2013 and end on 25 August 2013. At the end of the 2013 season, the top two teams from the MNL-2 New Holland League will be promoted to the MNL while the two bottom teams from the MNL will be relegated to the MNL-2. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as has been defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
This biographical article about a football forward from Uruguay born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Shrewsbury rail accident occurred on 15 October 1907. An overnight sleeping-car and mail train from Manchester to the West of England derailed on the sharply curved approach to Shrewsbury station, killing 18 people and wounding 33. The accident was concluded to be due to excessive speed on a dangerous curve. 
Those killed were the engine driver and fireman, two guards, eleven passengers, and three Post Office sorters working in the Mail train.  Thirty-three other people were reported injured. 
The accident was the last in a series of three derailments due to excessive speed at night in a 16-month period. The others were at Salisbury and Grantham (both in 1906).  All three resulted in deaths, including the footplate crews; the cause in each case was recorded as 'driver error', but there has been much speculation since. 
The report concluded the most likely explanation of the Shrewsbury crash was that the driver had dozed off briefly, missing the signal, and therefore had not braked in time on the downhill entry to Shrewsbury. The fireman was believed to have failed to recognize the driver's excessive speed until too late.  
An anonymous poem about the disaster was printed in the Shrewsbury Chronicle newspaper.  It had been written by a young Meole Brace woman, Mary Meredith, after she read an account of the accident. (She was better known after her marriage as novelist Mary Webb). Her brother had submitted her poem to the newspaper without her knowledge.  It drew appreciative letters to the paper and it is now believed to be Webb's first published writing. 
The Danish Chamber of Commerce was founded on 1 January 2007 as a result of a merger between Dansk Handel & Service and the Chamber of Commerce (previously Handelskammeret, HTSI). 
The Danish Chamber of Commerce owns and resides in King Christian IV's Old Stock Exchange building on Slotsholmen in Copenhagen. Furthermore the organisation has offices in the neighbouring complex, Tietgens Hus, as well as an office in Aarhus and an EU-office in Bruxelles. 
This article about a location in the province of Burgos, Spain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Emilio Enrique Frey was born in Baradero, Argentina, as the oldest of nine children. His father was a Swiss immigrant and farmer of the Swiss colony at Baradero, Buenos Aires Province, his mother was Argentine. 
During intense discussions the British government acted as arbiter between Chilean and Argentine interests resulting in a new treaty in 1902 Treaty of Arbitration between Chile and Argentina of 1902. 
The Argentine minister for agriculture Ramos Mejia established another commission to study the hydrology of Northern Patagonia in 1910, which was led by professor Bailey Willis, a US geologist. Frey was his Argentine deputy. When they reached one of the lakes discovered by Frey earlier, which was not yet officially named, Willis proposed to call it Lago Frey in 1913 es:Lago Frey. 
For the services Francisco Moreno provided as commissioner during the border disputes, the Argentine state granted him extensive land titles in Patagonia. Moreno in turn gave back to Argentina a large area close to the Nahuel Huapi Lake under the condition, that this land should be protected as a national park. When this national park was established, Frey became its first superintendent. He kept this role after the park was renamed Nahuel Huapi National Park es:Parque Nacional Nahuel Huapi. 
Frey was cofounder of the Club Andino Bariloche, the first mountaineering club in Argentina, in 1931. He became its first president and continued in this role for 30 years. 
The personal flag of Queen Elizabeth II in her role as Queen of New Zealand was approved for use in 1962. It is used by the Queen when she is in New Zealand. The Queen's Representative, the Governor-General of New Zealand has their own flag. 
The flag follows the same basic pattern used by queen across several other realms since the 1960s: it is the escutcheon of a country's coat of arms (e.g. the arms of New Zealand) in banner form defaced with a device taken from her personal flag (a blue roundel surrounded by a garland of roses encircling a crowned letter 'E', all in gold). 
The flag is divided into four quadrants: The first quadrant includes depicts four stars as representative of the Southern Cross constellation, as depicted on the national flag. The second quadrant consists of a golden fleece on a red field. The third quadrant contains a golden wheat sheaf on a red field. The final quadrant includes two crossed gold hammers on a blue field. 
The central stripe consists of three ships. Superimposed in the centre is a dark blue roundel bearing a Roman E surmounted by a Royal Crown within a chaplet of roses, all gold-coloured, obscuring the centre ship. 
The central blue disc is taken from the Queen's Personal Flag, which is used by the Queen in relation to her role as Head of the Commonwealth. 
The flag is flown continuously on any building in which the Queen is in residence and by a ship transporting the Queen in New Zealand waters. It is also flown whilst the Queen is attending a state or public function, and it is to be seen above the saluting base at military parades and open air gatherings when she is present. It is also broken when the Queen sets foot on board one of Her Majesty's New Zealand Ships. 
When flown with the New Zealand Flag, the Queen's Personal Flag for New Zealand takes the position of honour. 
The only occasions on which the Queen's Personal Flag for New Zealand are flown in her absence are at parades in honour of Her Majesty's Official Birthday. 
The flag is protected under the Flags, Emblems, and Names Protection Act 1981, Section 12(1) states: 
Every person commits an offence against this Act who, without the authority of Her Majesty or (as the case may require) the Governor-General, displays or exhibits or otherwise uses any representation to which this subsection applies in such a manner as to be likely to cause any person to believe that he does so under the authority, sanction, approval, appointment, or patronage of Her Majesty or the Governor-General.
During the coronation ceremony of the monarch at Westminster Abbey, the "standards" of various countries are carried by various officials in the procession inside the abbey. These flags are the country's coat of arms as a banner of arms. For New Zealand, unlike Canada and Australia, the banner remained the same for the King George V, King George VI and Queen Elizabeth II in 1911, 1937, and 1953, respectively.[citation needed]. The banner was in a 3:4 ratio and without defacement. 
The Gloucester Centurions  were an American football team based in Gloucester. They competed in the National South League of the BAFA National Leagues. 
Going on the strength of superb facilities that included a full-sized 100-yard playing field, the British American Football League promoted the Banshees to full league membership in November 2008. The Banshees drafted players from the now-defunct Hereford Chargers in preparation for their first season as full members of the British American Football League. 
Shortly after the end of the season, head coach Branagh tendered his resignation and subsequently took up the general manager's role at Leicester Falcons. As part of an entire club restructure a submission for renaming the team was made to and accepted by BAFANL, and from 2012 onwards the team has been called Gloucester Centurions. 
The 2012 season saw the Centurions scheduled against Oxford Saints, Bournemouth Bobcats, Cornish Sharks and Bristol Apache. They ended the season with two wins, six losses and two draws. 
The Gloucester Centurions play in a purple home kit with silver trim and their alternative is the old Banshees second strip (white with red trims). 
The Pitons are two large lava domes that formed 200 to 300,000 years ago, some time before the formation of the caldera; ever since then, other domes have filled the caldera floor. More recently, there was a phreatic eruption in 1766 that deposited ash over a wide area. 
In October of 2021, Australian mining junior India Bore Diamond Holdings announced the discovery of a second Matryoshka diamond (0.844 carats) extracted from its Ellendale alluvial deposit in Western Australia. 
In five-dimensional Euclidean geometry, the omnitruncated 5-simplex honeycomb or omnitruncated hexateric honeycomb is a space-filling tessellation (or honeycomb). It is composed entirely of omnitruncated 5-simplex facets. 
The facets of all  omnitruncated simplectic honeycombs are called permutahedra and can be positioned in n+1 space with integral coordinates, permutations of the whole numbers (0,1,..,n). 
The A*5 lattice (also called A65) is the union of six A5 lattices, and is the dual vertex arrangement to the omnitruncated 5-simplex honeycomb, and therefore the Voronoi cell of this lattice is an omnitruncated 5-simplex. 
The omnitruncated 5-simplex honeycomb can be projected into the 3-dimensional omnitruncated cubic honeycomb by a geometric folding operation that maps two pairs of mirrors into each other, sharing the same 3-space vertex arrangement: 
German Creek is a rural locality in south-eastern South Australia, situated in the District Council of Grant. The boundaries were formalised in October 1995 for the long established name. The postcode was originally 5280, but was altered to 5291 in 2004. It was reportedly named for a German who was shepherding in the area. 
The German Creek area was offered to the government for closer settlement purposes in 1911; however, while the government purchased the nearby Moorak estate, it declined to purchase land at German Creek, and the area was privately subdivided. 
German Creek is located within the federal division of Barker, the state electoral district of Mount Gambier and the local government area of the District Council of Grant. The principal land use at German Creek is primary production. 
The Coola Shearing Shed has been listed as a state heritage place on the South Australian Heritage Register. 
The 2016 Australian census which was conducted in August 2016 reports that German Creek had a population of 44 people. 
While Anakin and Mace Windu recover from their injuries, Plo Koon and Ahsoka tracks down Boba Fett from the underworld of Coruscant to the planet Florrum. Boba's revenge scheme finally leads to a climactic battle, and the life of a Republic admiral hangs in the balance. 
Exhibition of water color paintings selected from The Exhibition of The Philadelphia Water Color Club. February 1 to 23, 1914. 
Under the name of "Lucille Howard", Edith Lucille Howard authored an article about the work of young fashion students inspired by artifacts in the University of Pennsylvania Museum of Archeology and Anthropology (September 1920) 
This article about a painter from the United States born in the 1880s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Following the Italian advance, Wavell ordered the commander of British Troops Egypt, Lieutenant-General Sir Henry Maitland Wilson, to plan a limited operation to push the Italians back. Operation Compass, for administrative reasons, was originally planned as a five-day raid but consideration was given to continuing the operation to exploit success. On 28 November, Wavell wrote to Wilson that, 
I do not entertain extravagant hopes of this operation but I do wish to make certain that if a big opportunity occurs we are prepared morally, mentally and administratively to use it to the fullest.
These reinforcements reached the 10th Army after the start of Operation Compass (data taken from Montanari, 1990). 
Western Desert Force, 9 December 1940 Details taken from Christie (1999) and Montanari (1990) unless specified. 
The Western Desert Force consisted of about 31,000 soldiers, 120 guns, 275 tanks and sixty armoured cars. The 4th Indian Division was exchanged with the 6th Australian Division for the pursuit after the first part of Operation Compass. 
Athletic facilities at the park include several fields and courts. Courts include one full-sized basketball court, a half-sized basketball court, two tennis courts, and a beach volleyball court. The fields include one baseball field, four softball fields, and three soccer fields that overlay the softball diamonds' outfields. Memorial Park also includes the only skatepark in the city. 
Natural areas include forested portions, wetlands, and a community garden. A portion of the park on the northern edge is forested and nicknamed as Owl Woods due to the presence of a great horned owl. Other birds that inhabit the park include wrens, pileated woodpeckers, grosbeaks, red-tailed hawks, and bald eagles on occasion. The park includes the Ernest Kolbe Giant Sequoia, selected as one of the city's heritage trees. 
During the summers the park is home to the city's Art in the Park program for children. The crafts program is held once a week and started in 2004. In July and August each year, the park is the host of Movies in the Park. The program shows free movies on select Fridays during those months. An annual Easter Egg hunt is held at the park as well. Wilsonville Celebration Days used to be held at the park, but is now staged at Town Center Park. 
HMS Pargust was a Royal Navy warship that was active during World War I. She was a Special Service Vessel (also known as Q-ships) used by the RN in anti-submarine warfare.  Pargust was active in this role during the last two years of the war, and was successful on one occasion, destroying the U-boat UC-29. 
Pargust was assigned to special service duty and based at Queenstown, in Ireland and was active on anti-submarine duties in the Southwest Approaches.  
Pargust remained afloat, and was joined by the sloops HMS Crocus and Zinnia, and the American destroyer USS Cushing. Pargust's crew were transferred to Zinnia, and she was taken under tow; she was brought safely to Queenstown the following day. 
Pargust was moved to Devonport, for extensive repairs; she was still under repair in October 1917 when she was transferred to the US Navy. The USN was keen to take part in the anti-submarine special service operations, and had requested two Q-ships to be manned by US personnel. However Pargust's damage was more extensive than had been expected, and she not ready in time for operations with the Americans, so was returned to RN control.  
In May 1918, and now renamed Pangloss, she was transferred to Gibraltar. She joined a special service force based there for patrol work in the mid-Atlantic, where German "U-cruisers" were operating, and in the western Mediterranean. However she saw no further action before the war ended in November 1918.  
After this she was de-commissioned and returned to civilian service. As SS Johann Faulbaum she was sunk by RAF aircraft near Kirkenes on 13 May 1944. 
Hurricane Smith is a 1952 American Technicolor adventure film directed by Jerry Hopper and starring Yvonne de Carlo, John Ireland, James Craig, Forrest Tucker, Lyle Bettger and Richard Arlen. 
The film is set at an undetermined date but presumably is intended to be in the later 19th century. Costumes vary from 18th century to 1950s. The ship is typical of the early 18th century but with a typical late 19th century name. The frequent discussion of "blackbirding" would place the timeframe in the second half of the 19th century. 
Captain Raikes of the ship "The Southern Cross" arrives on an island in the South Pacific Ocean to capture slaves. He rows ashore with his first mate Brown and other crew members, unaware the island is inhabited by three white adventurers who have been stranded there: Hurricane Smith, Dan O'Hara and Brundage. 
Smith, O'Hara and Brundage sneak on board "The Southern Cross", overwhelm the remaining crew, and takes over the boat. He sails it to Australia. On the way Smith explains he has buried half a million dollars in Dakaru before being unfairly arrested for piracy. He persuades O'Hara and Brundage to become his partners in retrieving it. 
In Australia, the three men rename their ship "The Lady Betty" try to raise money to track down the treasure. They are approached by Eric Gorvahlsen, a scientist who wants to hire a ship. Raikes and Brown arrive in Australia so Hurricane, Dan and Brundage take them prisoner on "The Lady Betty". 
Gorvahlsen goes on board the ship with his companions, Dr. Whitmore and Whitmore's half-Polynesian daughter Luana, who is also Gorvahlsen's lover. Gorvahlsen is actually planning to capture Hurricane's treasure on Dakaru. He has never seen Hurricane Smith and suspects that Dan O'Hara is he (the real Hurricane pretends to be "Jim Tyler"). 
Gorvahlsen tells Luana to find out information about Dan/O'Hara from Hurricane/Tyler. Luana and the real Hurricane fall in love with each other and she admits to having doubts about the scheme. 
Raikes and Brown have been released from the brig. They start a knife fight with Brundage and another sailor Clobb, which results in Raikes being sent back to the brig. 
Luana falls in the water and Hurricane rescues her from a shark. During this, Brundage accidentally calls Hurricane by his real name and Gorvahlsen notices. He orders Luana to drug Hurricane with gin but she warns him instead. Hurricane swims to the island of Dakaru to prepare the natives for the attack. 
Gorvahlsen orders Dan to anchor the ship off Dakaru. Brown then persuades Gorvahlsen to join forces with him and order Dan to release Raikes. Dan then leaves for the island to warn Hurricane. 
Hurricane sneaks back on board the boat by which time Brown has caused the crew to be unsettled. Hurricane is thrown in the brig and Clobb kills a sailor. Gorvahlsen takes over the ship, and Clobb encourages the rest of the crew to arm themselves. Gorvahlsen tells the crew about the gold and convinces them to help him claim it. 
In Dakaru, Hurricane is forced to lead Gorvahlsen, Brown and Raikes to where the gold has been buried. They dig up the treasure but then Dan leads the natives to attack. Dr. Whitmore spears Gorvahlsen to death and Brundage kills Clobb in a knife fight. Hurricane and Luana are united. 
The film was based on a 1922 novel Hurricane Williams by Gordon Ray Young. The character had appeared in a number of stories by Young including Wild Blood (1921) and The Vengeance of Hurricane Williams (1926). 
In 1951 producer Nat Holt announced he had bought screen rights to the novel and had hired Frank Gruber, one of his regular screenwriters, to adapt it. Edmond O'Brien had just starred in Silver City for Holt (also written by Gruber) and he was mentioned as a possible star. 
In August 1951 Holt announced Paulette Goddard would star with Sterling Hayden as a possible co star. However Paramount had a backlog of films at the time and filming was pushed back to the following year. 
Eventually the leads were played by Yvonne de Carlo, who had just made Silver City with Holt, and John Ireland. Forrest Tucker and Richard Arlen also played lead roles. James Craig was borrowed from MGM to play the villain. Australian actor Murray Matheson, who had been in Botany Bay, had a small role. 
Filming began 11 February 1952. The film featured Kanaka Islanders as extras who had to be "blackened up" by the make up man because the filmmakers felt they were not dark enough. 
Rajender Singh Sangwan (born 24 August 1958) is an Indian biochemist, professor and agriculture biotechnologist. He is the Director and Vice-Chancellor of Academy of Scientific and Innovative Research (AcSIR), India. He is also a former director of National Agri-Food Biotechnology Institute (NABI). 
Sangwan was born on 24 August 1958 at Badal village in Haryana, India. He graduated in B.Sc. (Chemistry, Botany and Zoology) at Kurukshetra University in 1979. He has done Masters in Biochemistry from Haryana Agricultural University 1981. He completed his Ph.D. in Biochemistry from Haryana Agricultural University in 1987. He went to Queens University at Kingston, Ontario, Canada for his Post-Doctoral research. 
He the founder of Center of Innovative and Applied Bioprocessing (CIAB) and was the CEO from May 2012 to August 2017. 
Rajender Singh Sangwan joined as the first regular director of Academy of Scientific and Innovative Research (AcSIR) on 17 August 2017. 
Costa Rica participated at the 2017 Summer Universiade, in Taipei, Taiwan with 8 competitors in 4 sports. 
This profile of a European comics creator, writer, or artist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alive in Oslo is a live album by Australian unblack metal band Horde, released in April 2007 by Veridon Music. The album features the live concert by the band, recorded at Nordic Fest in Oslo, Norway on 3 November 2006. It also features a bonus DVD containing footage of the show. 
Frederick (died October 954) was the Archbishop of Mainz from 937, following the late Hildebert, until his death. He was a son of Reginar, Duke of Lorraine.[citation needed] 
Immediately, Frederick acted as an opponent of Otto the Great, one of the most consistent opponents he faced. In 939, he joined the rebellion of Eberhard III of Franconia, Gilbert of Lorraine, and Henry I of Bavaria. He was imprisoned in Hammelburg for a while. He plotted with Henry to assassinate Otto in Easter 941 in Quedlinburg, but they were discovered and put in captivity in Ingelheim, being released and pardoned only after doing penance at Christmas of that year. 
Frederick refused to accompany Otto to Italy in 951. He participated in another rebellion with Liudolf, Duke of Swabia, and Conrad, Duke of Lorraine, luring the king to Mainz in 953. Abandoned by the Lorrainers and without Henry's support this time, the rebels were easily crushed and punished. Frederick tried to distance himself from the fighting, but died before anything could come to him. 
He was turbaned as the Etsu Patigi since 1999 spending twenty years on the throne. He succeeded Etsu Idirisu Gana, who had ruled from 1966 to 1996.  Chatta was succeeded by his son Eu Umaru Bologi II. 
After he was turbaned as the Etsu Patigi in 1999, he became the vice-chairman of the Kwara State Traditional Council. 
He has exhibited his work around the globe from invitational exhibitions of posters to solo shows in China, Taiwan, South Korea, Japan, Russia, Poland, Czech Republic, Slovakia, Bulgaria, France, Ukraine, Argentina, Mexico, Brazil, England, and the Netherlands among other countries. 
Andrew Foster (born 4 October 1980) is a musician active from 2007 living on the South Coast of England. He is a sponsored artist by Adam Black Guitars and has been mentioned in Acoustic Magazine and interviewed on BBC Radio Solent. 
By the summer of 2006, Foster had finished working at Gold Crest Audio in Soho, and moved back to Portsmouth. 
Foster formed his own record label, Green Fish Records. The name originates from watching goldfish in a bowl and using it as an analogy for channeling frustration and limitation. 
The first release on the new label was on 1 March 2007 and EP entitled Watching Clocks.  This featured The Stranglers' drum technician Ian Barnard on drums and 300 copies were sold in limited edition CD format. Watching Clocks EP was the precursor to Foster's debut album, Media Ghost, which was released on 8 September 2008 in CD and digital download. Foster toured the UK promoting his album selling over 1000 CDs. The release did not chart as sales were not counted for that period. 
On 21 January 2010 The News Portsmouth published an article about Foster and a gig he was due to play at The Square Brewery, Petersfield. The article quoted Foster's review from Acoustic Magazine and outlined his plans for his second studio album. 
Foster's second album, The Garden, was released on 11 May 2010. In early 2013, the title track was remixed by Kassassin Street's Rowan Bastable, featuring Nathan Hill on percussion. This remix was mastered by Pete Maher, a producer for Beady Eye and U2. Foster was supported by Seahorses' Chris Helme at the launch of The Garden at the Half Moon, Putney. The art work for the album was created by American artist Helen Janow. 
On 6 March 2011, the album Panic Moon was released; along with an unofficial video for track 7 "Dark Astronaut". This homemade video was made by Foster himself and was based on the adventures of Morph and Doctor Who. 
On 8 March 2011, Foster featured in a studio session live on Pure FM playing tracks "Zombie Dance" and "Amy Watches the Stars" from Panic Moon. 
Foster and the Watchman played songs from Media Ghost, Panic Moon, The Garden and EP Watching Clocks in a show at The New Theatre Royal in Portsmouth on 4 December 2011. The show started with Neil Armstrong's Apollo 11 transmission playing and finished with a cover of the song "The Great Pretender" by The Platters. This was reviewed in the Portsmouth News. The show was recorded and sold on digital download format. To date this remains the only live album in Foster's catalogue. 
The EP New Criterion was released in September 2012. The cover art for this photograph, also entitled New Criterion, was taken by Aaron Bennett Photography and won an award from the National Photographic Society in 2013. 
In an article published by The News Portsmouth entitled "A Weekend with: Andrew Foster", Foster revealed a friendship with comedian Shappi Khorsandi and his love of Karl Pilkington, Downton Abbey, Doctor Who and Sherlock. The article also outlined Foster's favourite food to be Spaghetti Bolognese and favourite local day out to be at Kingley Vale in West Stoke Hampshire. 
Foster spent 2013 working with Beady Eye mastering engineer Pete Maher on his album Science and Magic, which is due for release in 2014.[needs update] 
Foster has played in various venues across the country and has toured a number of times across the UK. Additionally he has played at the Eastney Cellars supporting Mumford & Sons and the Blue Tones' Mark Morriss, at The Wedgewood Rooms supporting Charlene Soraia and at The Brook supporting Passenger. 
On 31 August 2007, Foster supported Hard-Fi as they were Number One in the UK Albums Chart. The gig promoted the release of their second studio album Once Upon a Time in the West and was played at South Parade Pier in Portsmouth. 
In 2010, 2011, and 2012, Foster toured the UK supporting English Rock vocalist and guitarist Terry Reid. Foster toured with Reid in early 2013, playing various venues across the South of England including The Komedia in Brighton and The Borderline in London. 
Foster has played the Annual Nick Drake Gathering in Tanworth-in-Arden in 2009, 2010,2011, 2012 and 2013 playing covers of Nick Drake songs "Northern Sky",  "Hanging on a Star", "Day is Done", and "Been Smoking Too Long". 
In the summer of 2013, Foster was mentioned in The Isle of Wight County Press as having played the Kashmir Tent at The Isle of Wight Festival. Foster is also noted to have played the Big Top Stage at Wickham Festival 2013. 
Electroharmonix Superego, Ibanez DE7, Danelectro Cool Cat, Boss SD1, Artec Fuzz Town, Digitech Clapton Crossroads 
On 16 April 2020, the FFF announced the termination of the competition, with promotion and relegation decided by points earned per game played, subject to the normal verification process by the financial authority, the DNCG. 
On 16 July, the FFF ratified the constitution of the competition, and published the groups as follows: 
On 16 June 2020 Mulhouse were administrative relegated by the DNCG committee of the FFF. The relegation was confirmed on appeal. 
Any reprieves required due to administrative relegations, mergers or clubs folding are usually decided by taking, in order, the 14th placed clubs ranked by order of their record against clubs finishing 9th to 13th position in their group, followed by the 15th placed clubs ranked by order of their record against clubs finishing in 10th to 14th position in their group. Due to the season not being completed, this ranking used points per game rather than points earned. 
Saint-Priest were reprieved due to the administrative relegation of Mulhouse, subject to that club appealing the decision. 
Motion Graphics was released by the Domino Recording Company on August 26, 2016. Three singles and music videos were released from Motion Graphics: "Lenses", "Anyware", and "Houzzfunction". Culture Sport, a digital visual artist, was responsible for creating the album artwork and videos. Motion Graphics garnered generally favorable reviews from music journalists, with common praises including the album's unique sound design. 
One way of inputting MIDI data into the Max for Live plug-in was through actual recorded audio. For example, the closing track of Motion Graphics, "SoftBank Arcade (Swiftcode Version)", plays MIDI notes that are inputted by hits from a free jazz drum recording. 
PFHS competes in IHSAA Class 5A with the largest schools in the state in the Inland Empire League (5A) with nearby and Coeur d'Alene and Lake City, and also Lewiston, about two hours south. Post Falls moved  up to 5A from 4A in the fall of 2006; it had moved from A-2 to A-1 (Division II) in the fall of 1985. 
Nick Paton Walsh (born 1977) is a British journalist who is a Senior International correspondent with CNN. He has been CNN's Kabul Correspondent, an Asia and foreign affairs correspondent for the UK's Channel 4 News, and Moscow correspondent for The Guardian newspaper. 
Paton Walsh was born in Guildford, Surrey. and educated at Epsom College, a boarding independent school in the town of Epsom, also in Surrey, followed by University College London. 
Paton Walsh began working for CNN in March 2011 in Pakistan. He covered the death of Osama bin Laden as their first reporter in country to the story, entering the fugitive's former compound and breaking the news that cellphone signals had led the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) to the al-Qaeda leader. 
Paton Walsh covered American President Barack Obama's speech about the withdrawal of America's troops from Afghanistan, detailing a Taliban resurgence in Nuristan Province, a booming opium culture in Badakhshan Province, together with insurgent violence and a resurgent al-Qaeda in Kunar. He also reported from Benghazi on Libya's declaration of liberty after Gaddafi was deposed. In September he became CNN's full-time correspondent in Kabul. 
While based in London, Paton Walsh uncovered a series of exclusives for the programme, including the British use of incendiary bombs in Afghanistan; a covert British programme to train the special forces of regimes considered to have questionable human rights records; and Sebastian Coe's controversial description of the Chinese policemen who guided the Olympic torch through London as "thugs". 
Paton Walsh was the programme's undercover correspondent in Zimbabwe, during the 2008 elections. He was one of a handful of western reporters inside the country during the violent crackdown on the MDC. He also reported the war between Georgia and Russia in July 2008 from both sides of the front line. 
In September 2008, Paton Walsh moved to Bangkok, to become the programme's Asia correspondent. During the Mumbai hotel sieges that November, he got the first interview with the Australian barman held in the Taj Hotel. 
Paton Walsh spent many months in Pakistan, where he reported on the Taliban's infiltration of Karachi, and on the military's campaign to take Bajaur. His team broadcast the first mobile phone footage of a woman being flogged publicly by the Taliban in the Swat Valley, which caused popular outcry in Pakistan. 
Paton Walsh has also organised and reported interviews with Taliban leaders Mansoor Dadullah and Mullah Nasir. 
Paton Walsh has also worked on vigilante murders and economic booms in China; on mud volcanoes in Indonesia; migrant workers in Dubai; food exportation from Cambodia; Naxalite rebels in Chhattisgarh, India; and he watched and reported as his office and flat were surrounded by the protests that shook Bangkok in May 2010. 
Paton Walsh joined The Observer newspaper in 1999, after studying English at University College London, where he has run the Guardian's "Me and My Motor" column, in which celebrities spoke each week about their car. 
Paton Walsh covered the popular revolutions in Georgia, Ukraine, and Kyrgyzstan, and their failure in Azerbaijan and Belarus. He was also the Guardian's only correspondent in Beslan for the brutal hostage crisis at Middle School Number One there. He worked repeatedly inside the North Caucasus, travelling to Chechnya over twenty times and winning various awards for his reporting there. 
Paton Walsh helped break this story of the disciplining of Craig Murray, the then British Ambassador to Uzbekistan, who spoke out against the British invasion of Iraq. He also secured the ambassador's first interview for the Guardian and Channel Four News. 
Paton Walsh has won a series of awards since joining the staff of The Observer newspaper, aged 21. In 2000 he was the British Press Gazette's Young Journalist of the Year, and four years later was nominated for their Foreign Correspondent award for the Guardian's coverage of the Beslan school hostage crisis. 
Paton Walsh won Amnesty International's Gaby Rado Award for a reporter at the start of their career in 2006 for his work in the former Soviet Union, and their television award for his work in Sri Lanka in 2010. He won the Lorenzo Natali Prize for human rights reporting in 2006. 
In February 2011, Paton Walsh's work in Kandahar, Afghanistan was part of a body of reports that won Channel Four News the prestigious Broadcast television award for news and current affairs coverage. 
The Irish Socialist was a monthly newspaper produced by the Communist Party of Ireland, originally published starting in December 1965 by the Irish Workers' Party prior to its merger with the Communist Party of Northern Ireland and relaunch as the Communist Party of Ireland. 
Mark McCormick (born April 13, 1933) is a former Justice of the Iowa Supreme Court who served from 1972 to 1986. 
After graduating from Villanova University, McCormick served for three years as an officer in the United States Navy. He graduated from Georgetown University Law Center in 1960, then clerked on the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit for Judge Harvey M. Johnsen. McCormick then returned to Fort Dodge and practiced law from 1961 to 1968, during which he was also an Assistant Webster County attorney. 
From 1968 to 1972, McCormick served as a judge of the Iowa District Court. In 1972, Robert D. Ray appointed McCormick to the Iowa Supreme Court. 
In 1986, McCormick retired from the Iowa Supreme Court to join the Des Moines firm Belin, Harris, Helmick & Tesdell as a partner. In 1997, the firm was renamed Belin Lamson McCormick Zumbach Flynn, before being renamed once more to Belin McCormick. In private practice, McCormick was rated in Band 1 for commercial litigation by Chambers & Partners. 
He published a treatise on jury selection and articles in the Iowa Law Review and the Drake Law Review. He also argued before the Supreme Court of the United States in Fitzgerald v. Racing Association of Central Iowa in 2002. 
In 1998, McCormick ran in the Democratic primary to be Governor of Iowa and narrowly lost to Tom Vilsack. In 2003, he ran for Mayor of Des Moines and narrowly lost again to Frank Cownie. In 2010, McCormick advocated for the retention of the justices of the Iowa Supreme Court in response to the backlash over Varnum v. Brien. 
Yahoo! Movies devotes special coverage to the Academy Awards with a special Oscars site. The Oscars site includes articles, show coverage, a list of the night's big winners, photos, videos, and polls. 
From 2002 to 2007, Yahoo! Movies was the home of Greg's Previews of Upcoming Movies, an enhanced version of Upcomingmovies.com, written by its creator, Greg Dean Schmitz. 
Yahoo! Movies also releases special guides, such as the Summer Movie Guide, which contains information on the major releases of the summer with exclusive trailers and clips, photos, box office information, polls, and unique editorial content. 
Additionally, Yahoo! Movies teamed up with MTV to host a special site for the MTV Movie Awards, which will feature show information and a section where users can submit original movie shorts parodying last year's movies for the chance to win the new award, Best Movie Spoof. 
In 1953, Le Guennant was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of the Pontifical Institute of Sacred Music in Rome. 
Scutelnic (also scutnic, from Romanian verb scuti, "to exempt", "to absolve"; plural: scitelnici, scutnici) were peasant servants in Wallachia and Moldova who were exempt from state taxes. They were charged with various duties and were attached to boiers (land owners with military or administrative functions) and to monasteries. 
The category of scutelnici was introduced by the reforms of Constantine Mavrocordatos. It was abolished in Bessarabia after the region was annexed by the Russian Empire on April 29, 1818 by the Statute on the Establishment of the Bessarabian Oblast. 
The term is preserved in various names, such as the family names Skutnik, Skutelnik (alternative transliterations of the word from Cyrillic) and the settlement Scutelnici. 
The Monday River is a river of Paraguay. It flows and empties into the Parana River, just south of the tri-border mark point of the Triple Frontier. Its primary course lies almost entirely within the Alto Parana Department. 
A windsport is any type of sport which involves wind-power, often involving a non-rigid airfoil such as a sail or a power kite. The activities can be land-based, on snow, on ice or on water. Windsport activity may be regulated in some countries by aviation/maritime authorities if they are likely to interfere with other activities. Local authorities may also regulate activity in certain areas, especially on crowded beaches and parks. 
The following air sports are not classed as windsports because in these the participants actually leave the ground for long periods and many do not use the wind: 
Haloxylon persicum, the white saxaul, is a small tree belonging to the family Amaranthaceae. Its range is Western Asia, including the Palestine region, Egypt, Sinai, South Iraq, Saudi Arabia, Iran, Oman, UAE, Afghanistan, and Pakistan, to Central Asia (Kyrgyzstan, Turkmenistan, etc.), and  China (Xinjiang etc.). 
The plant's extensive root system is useful for stabilising sandy soils. The wood is durable and heavy and is used in general carpentry. As it burns well and gives a good heat it is used as a fuel. It is called "ghada" in Arabic and was frequently mentioned in classical Arabic poetry. 
Turcmenigena varentzovi (saxaul longhorn beetle, Varentsov's longhorn beetle) is a pest of the white saxaul tree in Kazakhstan, Turkmenistan, and Uzbekistan. 
Eli Babalj (born 21 February 1992) is an Australian footballer who plays as a forward for Newcastle Jets. Alongside Robert Cornthwaite and Sasa Ognenovski, Babalj, at 1.95 m is the joint third tallest player to have represented the Australia national association football team, behind Zeljko Kalac (2.02 m) and Harry Souttar (1.98 m). 
Eli Babalj made his return appearance to the A-League for the Melbourne Heart away to the Western Sydney Wanderers on Australia Day, 26 January 2013 as a 2nd half substitution. 
On 19 April 2013, Dutch club AZ Alkmaar completed the signing of Eli for a fee believed to be in the region of $200,000. 
On 2 February 2015, Babalj was sent on loan at PEC Zwolle for the rest of the season. Eli Babalj made his Eredivisie debut for PEC Zwolle at home to the Go Ahead Eagles on 15 February 2015 as a 70th-minute substitute for Maikel van der Werff. 
On 22 January 2016, Babalj ruptured his anterior cruciate ligament against Brisbane Roar, ruling him out for the remainder of the A-League season. 
On 7 February 2017, after training with Adelaide United since late January, Babalj joined Adelaide United once more until the end of the season. 
On 12 October 2021, after stint's with Brisbane Roar and Chainat Hornbill Babalj returned to Australia and signed with Newcastle Jets for the 2021-22 A-League Men season after a successful trial at the club.  
Clay Mathematics Monographs is a series of expositions in mathematics co-published by AMS and Clay Mathematics Institute. Each volume in the series offers an exposition of an active area of current research, provided by a group of mathematicians. 
British magazine Music Week wrote, "A Euro-pop/techno tune boasting the same furious breakbeats as predecessor Son Of A Gun but without the force to propel it quite as high in the charts." 
During the Middle Ages, the descendants of the Carolingian dynasty came to dominate the area and then extended their rule to a large part of Western Europe. The region nowadays corresponding to the Netherlands therefore became part of Lower Lotharingia within the Frankish Holy Roman Empire. For several centuries, lordships such as Brabant, Holland, Zeeland, Friesland, Guelders and others held a changing patchwork of territories. There was no unified equivalent of the modern Netherlands. 
By 1433, the Duke of Burgundy had assumed control over most of the lowlands territories in Lower Lotharingia; he created the Burgundian Netherlands which included modern Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg, and a part of France. 
In the Dutch Golden Age, which had its zenith around 1667, there was a flowering of trade, industry, and the sciences. A rich worldwide Dutch empire developed and the Dutch East India Company became one of the earliest and most important of national mercantile companies based on war, entrepreneurship and trade. 
The prehistory of the area that is now the Netherlands was largely shaped by its constantly shifting, low-lying geography. 
The area that is now the Netherlands was inhabited by early humans at least 37,000 years ago, as attested by flint tools discovered in Woerden in 2010. In 2009 a fragment of a 40,000-year-old Neanderthal skull was found in sand dredged from the North Sea floor off the coast of Zeeland. 
Agriculture arrived in the Netherlands somewhere around 5000 BC with the Linear Pottery culture, who were probably central European farmers. Agriculture was practiced only on the loess plateau in the very south (southern Limburg), but even there it was not established permanently. Farms did not develop in the rest of the Netherlands. 
The Funnelbeaker culture was a farming culture extending from Denmark through northern Germany into the northern Netherlands. In this period of Dutch prehistory, the first notable remains were erected: the dolmens, large stone grave monuments. They are found in Drenthe, and were probably built between 4100 BC and 3200 BC. 
To the west, the Vlaardingen culture (around 2600 BC), an apparently more primitive culture of hunter-gatherers survived well into the Neolithic period. 
Around 2950 BCE there was a transition from the Funnelbeaker farming culture to the Corded Ware pastoralist culture, a large archeological horizon appearing in western and central Europe, that is associated with the advance of Indo-European languages. This transition was probably caused by developments[clarification needed] in eastern Germany, and it occurred within two generations. 
The Corded Ware and Bell Beaker cultures were not indigenous to the Netherlands but were pan-European in nature, extending across much of northern and central Europe. 
The first evidence of the use of the wheel dates from this period, about 2400 BC. This culture also experimented with working with copper. Evidence of this, including stone anvils, copper knives, and a copper spearhead, was found on the Veluwe. Copper finds show that there was trade with other areas in Europe, as natural copper is not found in Dutch soil. 
In Oss, a grave dating from around 500 BC was found in a burial mound 52 metres wide (and thus the largest of its kind in western Europe). Dubbed the "king's grave" (Vorstengraf (Oss)), it contained extraordinary objects, including an iron sword with an inlay of gold and coral. 
By the time this migration was complete, around 250 BC, a few general cultural and linguistic groupings had emerged. 
A second grouping, which scholars subsequently dubbed the "Weser-Rhine Germanic" (or "Rhine-Weser Germanic"), extended along the middle Rhine and Weser and inhabited the southern part of the Netherlands (south of the great rivers). This group, also sometimes referred to as the "Istvaeones", consisted of tribes that would eventually develop into the Salian Franks. 
In March 2005 17 Celtic coins were found in Echt (Limburg). The silver coins, mixed with copper and gold, date from around 50 BC to 20 AD. In October 2008 a hoard of 39 gold coins and 70 silver Celtic coins was found in the Amby area of Maastricht. The gold coins were attributed to the Eburones people. Celtic objects have also been found in the area of Zutphen. 
Some scholars (De Laet, Gysseling, Hachmann, Kossack & Kuhn) have speculated that a separate ethnic identity, neither Germanic nor Celtic, survived in the Netherlands until the Roman period. They see the Netherlands as having been part of an Iron Age "Nordwestblock" stretching from the Somme to the Weser. Their view is that this culture, which had its own language, was being absorbed by the Celts to the south and the Germanic peoples from the east as late as the immediate pre-Roman period. 
The Menapii stretched from the south of Zeeland, through North Brabant (and possibly South Holland), into the southeast of Gelderland. In later Roman times their territory seems to have been divided or reduced, so that it became mainly contained in what is now western Belgium. 
The Eburones, the largest of the Germani Cisrhenani group, covered a large area including at least part of modern Dutch Limburg, stretching east to the Rhine in Germany, and also northwest to the delta, giving them a border with the Menapii. Their territory may have stretched into Gelderland. 
The approximately 450 years of Roman rule that followed would profoundly change the area that would become the Netherlands. Very often this involved large-scale conflict with the free Germanic tribes over the Rhine. 
Other tribes who eventually inhabited the islands in the delta during Roman times are mentioned by Pliny the Elder are the Cananefates in South Holland; the Frisii, covering most of the modern Netherlands north of the Oude Rijn; the Frisiabones, who apparently stretched from the delta into the North of North Brabant; the Marsacii, who stretched from the Flemish coast, into the delta; and the Sturii. 
Caesar reported that he eliminated the name of the Eburones but in their place the Texuandri inhabited most of North Brabant, and the modern province of Limburg, with the Maas running through it, appears to have been inhabited in imperial times by (from north to south) the Baetasii, the Catualini, the Sunuci and the Tungri. (Tacitus reported that the Tungri was a new name for the earlier Germani cisrhenani.) 
Romans built military forts along the Limes Germanicus and a number of towns and smaller settlements in the Netherlands. The more notable Roman towns were at Nijmegen (Ulpia Noviomagus Batavorum) and at Voorburg (Forum Hadriani). 
Perhaps the most evocative Roman ruin is the mysterious Brittenburg, which emerged from the sand at the beach in Katwijk several centuries ago, only to be buried again. These ruins were part of Lugdunum Batavorum. 
The Batavians, Cananefates, and the other border tribes were held in high regard as soldiers throughout the empire, and traditionally served in the Roman cavalry. The frontier culture was influenced by the Romans, Germanic people, and Gauls. In the first centuries after Rome's conquest of Gaul, trade flourished. And Roman, Gaulish and Germanic material culture are found combined in the region. 
The Franks eventually were divided into two groups: the Ripuarian Franks (Latin: Ripuari), who were the Franks that lived along the middle-Rhine River during the Roman Era, and the Salian Franks, who were the Franks that originated in the area of the Netherlands. 
After Roman government in the area collapsed, the Franks expanded their territories until there were numerous small Frankish kingdoms, especially at Cologne, Tournai, Le Mans and Cambrai. The kings of Tournai eventually came to subdue the other Frankish kings. By the 490s, Clovis I had conquered and united all the Frankish territories to the west of the Meuse, including those in the southern Netherlands. He continued his conquests into Gaul. 
The Christianity that arrived in the Netherlands with the Romans appears not to have died out completely (in Maastricht, at least) after the withdrawal of the Romans in about 411. 
The Franks became Christians after their king Clovis I converted to Catholicism, an event which is traditionally set in 496. Christianity was introduced in the north after the conquest of Friesland by the Franks. The Saxons in the east were converted before the conquest of Saxony, and became Frankish allies. 
Hiberno-Scottish and Anglo-Saxon missionaries, particularly Willibrord, Wulfram and Boniface, played an important role in converting the Frankish and Frisian peoples to Christianity by the 8th century. Boniface was martyred by the Frisians in Dokkum (754). 
In the early 8th century the Frisians came increasingly into conflict with the Franks to the south, resulting in a series of wars in which the Frankish Empire eventually subjugated Frisia. In 734, at the Battle of the Boarn, the Frisians in the Netherlands were defeated by the Franks, who thereby conquered the area west of the Lauwers. The Franks then conquered the area east of the Lauwers in 785 when Charlemagne defeated Widukind. 
The Carolingian empire would eventually include France, Germany, northern Italy and much of Western Europe. In 843, the Frankish empire was divided into three parts, giving rise to West Francia in the west, East Francia in the east, and Middle Francia in the centre. Most of what is today the Netherlands became part of Middle Francia; Flanders became part of West Francia. This division was an important factor in the historical distinction between Flanders and the other Dutch-speaking areas. 
Buried Viking treasures consisting mainly of silver have been found in the Low Countries. Two such treasures have been found in Wieringen. A large treasure found in Wieringen in 1996 dates from around 850 and is thought perhaps to have been connected to Rorik. The burial of such a valuable treasure is seen as an indication that there was a permanent settlement in Wieringen. 
Viking raids of the Low Countries continued for over a century. Remains of Viking attacks dating from 880 to 890 have been found in Zutphen and Deventer. In 920, King Henry of Germany liberated Utrecht. According to a number of chronicles, the last attacks took place in the first decade of the 11th century and were directed at Tiel and/or Utrecht. 
These Viking raids occurred about the same time that French and German lords were fighting for supremacy over the middle empire that included the Netherlands, so their sway over this area was weak. Resistance to the Vikings, if any, came from local nobles, who gained in stature as a result. 
The language and culture of most of the people who lived in the area that is now Holland were originally Frisian. The sparsely populated area was known as "West Friesland" (Westfriesland). As Frankish settlement progressed, the Frisians migrated away or were absorbed and the area quickly became Dutch.  (The part of North Holland situated north of Alkmaar is still colloquially known as West Friesland). 
In 1083, the name "Holland" first appears in a deed referring to a region corresponding more or less to the current province of South Holland and the southern half of what is now North Holland. Holland's influence continued to grow over the next two centuries. The counts of Holland conquered most of Zeeland but it was not until 1289 that Count Floris V was able to subjugate the Frisians in West Friesland (that is, the northern half of North Holland). 
Around 1000 AD there were several agricultural developments (described sometimes as an agricultural revolution) that resulted in an increase in production, especially food production. The economy started to develop at a fast pace, and the higher productivity allowed workers to farm more land or to become tradesmen.[citation needed] 
Much of the western Netherlands was barely inhabited between the end of the Roman period until around 1100 AD, when farmers from Flanders and Utrecht began purchasing the swampy land, draining it and cultivating it. This process happened quickly and the uninhabited territory was settled in a few generations. They built independent farms that were not part of villages, something unique in Europe at the time.[citation needed] 
Guilds were established and markets developed as production exceeded local needs. Also, the introduction of currency made trading a much easier affair than it had been before. Existing towns grew and new towns sprang into existence around monasteries and castles, and a mercantile middle class began to develop in these urban areas. Commerce and town development increased as the population grew. 
The Crusades were popular in the Low Countries and drew many to fight in the Holy Land. At home, there was relative peace. Viking pillaging had stopped. Both the Crusades and the relative peace at home contributed to trade and the growth in commerce. 
The Hook and Cod Wars (Dutch: Hoekse en Kabeljauwse twisten) were a series of wars and battles in the County of Holland between 1350 and 1490. Most of these wars were fought over the title of count of Holland, but some have argued that the underlying reason was because of the power struggle of the traders in the cities against the ruling nobility. 
The Cod faction generally consisted of the more progressive cities of Holland.  The Hook faction consisted for a large part of the conservative noblemen. Some of the main figures in this multi-generational conflict were William IV, Margaret, William V, William VI, Count of Holland and Hainaut, John and Philip the Good, Duke of Burgundy. But perhaps the most well known is Jacqueline, Countess of Hainaut. 
The conquest of the county of Holland by the Duke Philip the Good of Burgundy was an odd affair. Leading noblemen in Holland invited the duke to conquer Holland, even though he had no historical claim to it. Some historians[who?] say that the ruling class in Holland wanted Holland to integrate with the Flemish economic system and adopt Flemish legal institutions. Europe had been wracked by many civil wars in the 14th and 15th centuries, while Flanders had grown rich and enjoyed peace. 
Most of what is now the Netherlands and Belgium was eventually united by the Duke of Burgundy in 1433. Before the Burgundian union, the Dutch identified themselves by the town they lived in, their local duchy or county or as subjects of the Holy Roman Empire. The Burgundian period is when the Dutch began the road to nationhood. 
From 1515 to 1523, Charles's government in the Netherlands had to contend with the rebellion of Frisian peasants (led by Pier Gerlofs Donia and Wijard Jelckama). Gelre attempted to build up its own state in northeast Netherlands and northwest Germany. Lacking funds in the 16th century, Gelre had its soldiers provide for themselves by pillaging enemy terrain. These soldiers were a great menace to the Burgundian Netherlands, as when they pillaged The Hague. 
In the first wave of the Reformation, Lutheranism won over the elites in Antwerp and the South.  The Spanish successfully suppressed it there, and Lutheranism only flourished in east Friesland. 
The second wave of the Reformation, came in the form of Anabaptism, that was popular among ordinary farmers in Holland and Friesland. Anabaptists were socially very radical and equalitarian; they believed that the apocalypse was very near. They refused to live the old way, and began new communities, creating considerable chaos. A prominent Dutch Anabaptist was Menno Simons, who initiated the Mennonite church. The movement was allowed in the north, but never grew to a large scale. 
A devout Catholic, Philip was appalled by the success of the Reformation in the Low Countries, which had led to an increasing number of Calvinists. His attempts to enforce religious persecution of the Protestants, and his centralization of government, law enforcement, and taxes, made him unpopular and led to a revolt. Fernando Alvarez de Toledo, Duke of Alba, was sent with a Spanish Army to punish the unruly Dutch in 1567. 
The invention of the sawmill enabled the construction of a massive fleet of ships for worldwide trading and for defence of the republic's economic interests by military means. National industries such as shipyards and sugar refineries expanded as well. 
Dutch ships hunted whales off Svalbard, traded spices in India and Indonesia (via the Dutch East India Company) and founded colonies in New Amsterdam (now New York), South Africa and the West Indies.  In addition some Portuguese colonies were conquered, namely in Northeastern Brazil, Angola, Indonesia and Ceylon. In 1640 by the Dutch East India Company began a trade monopoly with Japan through the trading post on Dejima. 
The Golden Age was also an important time for developments in literature. Some of the major figures of this period were Gerbrand Adriaenszoon Bredero, Jacob Cats, Pieter Corneliszoon Hooft and Joost van den Vondel. Since Latin was the lingua franca of education, relatively few men could speak, write, and read Dutch all at the same time. 
Music did not develop very much in the Netherlands since the Calvinists considered it an unnecessary extravagance, and organ music was forbidden in Reformed Church services, although it remained common at secular functions. 
Descendants of the original settlers played a prominent role in the History of the United States, as typified by the Roosevelt and Vanderbilt families. The Hudson Valley still boasts a Dutch heritage. The concepts of civil liberties and pluralism introduced in the province became mainstays of American political and social life. 
During the period of Proto-industrialization, the empire received 50% of textiles and 80% of silks import from the India's Mughal Empire, chiefly from its most developed region known as Bengal Subah. 
By the 17th century, the Dutch East India Company established their base in parts of Ceylon (modern-day Sri Lanka). Afterward, they established ports in Dutch occupied Malabar, leading to Dutch settlements and trading posts in India. However, their expansion into India was halted, after their defeat in the Battle of Colachel by the Kingdom of Travancore, during the Travancore-Dutch War. The Dutch never recovered from the defeat and no longer posed a large colonial threat to India. 
Eventually, the Dutch East India Company was weighted down by corruption, the VOC went bankrupt in 1800. Its possessions were taken over by the government and turned into the Dutch East Indies. 
The majority of burghers had Dutch ancestry and belonged to the Calvinist Reformed Church of the Netherlands, but there were also numerous Germans as well as some Scandinavians. In 1688 the Dutch and the Germans were joined by French Huguenots, also Calvinists, who were fleeing religious persecution in France under King Louis XIV. The Huguenots in South Africa were absorbed into the Dutch population but they played a prominent role in South Africa's history. 
From the beginning, the VOC used the cape as a place to supply ships travelling between the Netherlands and the Dutch East Indies. There was a close association between the cape and these Dutch possessions in the far east. Van Riebeeck and the VOC began to import large numbers of slaves, primarily from Madagascar and Indonesia. These slaves often married Dutch settlers, and their descendants became known as the Cape Coloureds and the Cape Malays. 
Dutch was the official language, but a dialect had formed that was quite distinct from Dutch. The Afrikaans language originated mainly from 17th-century Dutch dialects. 
This Dutch dialect sometimes referred to as the "kitchen language" (kombuistaal), would eventually in the late 19th century be recognised as a distinct language called Afrikaans and replace Dutch as the official language of the Afrikaners. 
Dutch interest in South Africa was mainly as a strategically located VOC port. Yet in the 17th and 18th centuries the Dutch created the foundation of the modern state of South Africa. The Dutch legacy in South Africa is evident everywhere, but particularly in the Afrikaner people and the Afrikaans language. 
After having gained its independence in 1648, the Netherlands tried in various coalitions to help to contain France, which had replaced Spain as the strongest nation of Europe. The end of the War of the Spanish Succession (1713) marked the end of the Dutch Republic as a major player. In the 18th century, it just tried to maintain its independence and stuck to a policy of neutrality. 
The era of explosive economic growth is roughly coterminous with the period of social and cultural bloom that has been called the Dutch Golden Age, and that actually formed the material basis for that cultural era.  Amsterdam became the hub of world trade, the center into which staples and luxuries flowed for sorting, processing, and distribution, and then reexported around Europe and the world. 
By the mid-1660s Amsterdam had reached the optimum population (about 200,000) for the level of trade, commerce and agriculture then available to support it. The city contributed the largest quota in taxes to the States of Holland which in turn contributed over half the quota to the States General. Amsterdam was also one of the most reliable in settling tax demands and therefore was able to use the threat to withhold such payments to good effect. 
In Amsterdam the network was so large that members of the same family could be related to opposing factions and pursue widely separated interests.  The young men who had risen to positions of authority in the 1670s and 1680s consolidated their hold on office well into the 1690s and even the new century. 
Amsterdam's regents provided good services to residents. They spent heavily on the water-ways and other essential infrastructure, as well as municipal almshouses for the elderly, hospitals and churches. 
In 1651, England imposed its first Navigation Act, which severely hurt Dutch trade interests. An incident at sea concerning the Act resulted in the First Anglo-Dutch War, which lasted from 1652 to 1654, ending in the Treaty of Westminster (1654), which left the Navigation Act in effect. 
After the Dutch fleet declined, merchant interests became dependent on the goodwill of Britain. The main focus of Dutch leaders was reducing the country's considerable budget deficits. Dutch trade and shipping remained at a fairly steady level through the 18th century, but no longer had a near monopoly and also could not match growing English and French competition. The Netherlands lost its position as the trading centre of Northern Europe to London. 
Although the Netherlands remained wealthy, investors for the nation's money became more difficult to find. Some investment went into purchases of land for estates, but most went to foreign bonds and Amsterdam remained one of Europe's banking capitals. 
Life for the average Dutchman became slower and more relaxed than in the 18th century. The upper and middle classes continued to enjoy prosperity and high living standards. The drive to succeed seemed less urgent. Unskilled laborers remained locked in poverty and hardship. The large underclass of unemployed beggars and riffraff required government and private charity to survive. 
In 1744 and 1745 the French attacked Dutch fortresses at Menen and Tournai. This prompted the Dutch Republic in 1745 to join the Quadruple Alliance, but this alliance was severely defeated at the Battle of Fontenoy in May 1745. In 1746 the French occupied most of the large cities in the Austrian Netherlands. Then, in April 1747, apparently as an exercise in armed diplomacy, a relatively small French military force occupied Zeelandic Flanders, part of the Dutch Republic. 
The war against the French was itself brought to a not-too-devastating end for the Dutch Republic with the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle (1748). The French retreated of their own accord from the Dutch frontier. William IV died unexpectedly, at the age of 40, on 22 October 1751. 
An English historian summed him up uncharitably as "a Prince of the profoundest lethargy and most abysmal stupidity." And yet he would guide his family through the difficult French-Batavian period and his son would be crowned king. 
Although the Dutch Republic did not enter into a formal alliance with the United States and their allies, U.S. ambassador (and future President) John Adams managed to establish diplomatic relations with the Dutch Republic, making it the second European country to diplomatically recognize the Continental Congress in April 1782. In October 1782, a treaty of amity and commerce was concluded as well. 
Most of the war consisted of a series of largely successful British operations against Dutch colonial economic interests, although British and Dutch naval forces also met once off the Dutch coast.  The war ended disastrously for the Dutch and exposed the weakness of the political and economic foundations of the country. The Treaty of Paris (1784), according to Fernand Braudel, "sounded the knell of Dutch greatness." 
Influenced by the American Revolution, the Patriots sought a more democratic form of government. The opening shot of this revolution is often considered to be the 1781 publication of a manifesto called Aan het Volk van Nederland ("To the People of the Netherlands") by Joan van der Capellen tot den Pol, who would become an influential leader of the Patriot movement. Their aim was to reduce corruption and the power held by the stadtholder, William V, Prince of Orange. 
In 1785 the stadholder left The Hague and moved his court to Nijmegen in Guelders, a city remote from the heart of Dutch political life. In June 1787, his energetic wife Wilhelmina (the sister of Frederick William II of Prussia) tried to travel to The Hague. Outside Schoonhoven, she was stopped by Patriot militiamen and taken to a farm near Goejanverwellesluis. Within two days she was forced to return to Nijmegen, an insult not unnoticed in Prussia. 
The House of Orange reacted with severity, relying on Prussian troops led by Charles William Ferdinand, Duke of Brunswick and a small contingent of British troops to suppress the rebellion. Dutch banks at this time still held much of the world's capital. Government-sponsored banks owned up to 40% of Great Britain's national debt and there were close connections to the House of Stuart. The stadholder had supported British policies after the American Revolution. 
On 15 March 1815; with the encouragement of the powers gathered at the Congress of Vienna, William Frederick raised the Netherlands to the status of a kingdom and proclaimed himself King William I.  This was made official later in 1815, when the Low Countries were formally recognized as the United Kingdom of the Netherlands. The crown was made a hereditary office of the House of Orange-Nassau. 
The outbreak of revolution in France in 1830 was a signal for action, at first on behalf of autonomy for Belgium, as the southern provinces were now called, and later on behalf of total independence. William dithered and his half-hearted efforts to reconquer Belgium were thwarted both by the efforts of the Belgians themselves and by the diplomatic opposition of the great powers. 
This was a time of further growth and colonial development, but it was marked by the difficulties of World War I (in which the Netherlands was neutral) and the Great Depression. The Dutch population grew rapidly in the 20th century, as death rates fell, more lands were opened up, and industrialisation created urban jobs. Between 1900 and 1950 the population doubled from 5.1 to 10 million people. 
The military forces in the Dutch East Indies were controlled by the governor and were not part of the regular Dutch army. As the map shows, the Dutch slowly expanded their holdings from their base in Java to include all of modern Indonesia by 1920. Most islands were not a problem but there was a long, costly campaign against the Achin (Aceh) state in northern Sumatra. 
The Netherlands had not fought a major military campaign since the 1760s, and the strength of its armed forces had gradually dwindled. The Dutch decided not to ally themselves with anyone, and kept out of all European wars, especially the First World War that swirled about it. 
Although both houses of the Dutch Parliament were elected by the people, only men with high incomes were eligible to vote until 1917, when pressure from socialist movements resulted in elections in which all men regardless of income, were entitled to vote. In 1919, women also obtained the right to vote for the first time in history. 
The rise of Nazism in Germany did not go unnoticed in the Netherlands, and there was growing concern at the possibility of armed conflict, but most Dutch people expected that Germany would again respect Dutch neutrality. 
There were separate fascist and Nazi movements in the 1930s. Dutch Fascists admired Mussolini's Italy and called for a traditional corporate ideology. The membership was small, elitist and ineffective. The pro-Nazi movement, however, won support from Berlin and attempted to build a mass base by 1935. It failed because most Dutch rejected its racial ideology and calls for violence. 
Resentment of the Germans grew as the occupation became harsher, prompting many Dutch in the latter years of the war to join the resistance. But collaboration was not uncommon either; many thousands of young Dutch males volunteered for combat service on the Russian Front with the Waffen-SS and many companies worked for the German occupiers. 
About 140,000 Jews lived in the Netherlands at the beginning of the war. Persecution of Dutch Jews started shortly after the occupation. At the end of the war, 40,000 Jews were still alive. Of the 100,000 Jews who did not go into hiding, about 1,000 survived the war. 
One famous victim of the Holocaust was Anne Frank, who gained worldwide fame when her diary, written in the achterhuis ('backhouse') while hiding from the Nazis, was found and published posthumously by her father, Otto Frank; who was the only member of the family to survive the Holocaust. 
The First Canadian Army launched Operation Veritable in early-February, cracking the Siegfried Line and reaching the banks of the Rhine in early-March. In the final weeks of the war in Europe, the First Canadian Army was charged with clearing the Netherlands of German forces. 
The Liberation of Arnhem began on 12 April 1945 and proceeded to plan, as the three infantry brigades of the 49th Division leapfrogged each other through the city. Within four days Arnhem, now a ruined city, was totally under Allied control. 
After the euphoria and settling of scores had ended, the Dutch were a traumatised people with a ruined economy, a shattered infrastructure and several destroyed cities including Rotterdam, Nijmegen, Arnhem and part of The Hague. 
In the early post-war years, the Netherlands made continued attempts to expand its territory by annexing neighbouring German territory. The larger annexation plans were continuously rejected by the United States, but the London conference of 1949 permitted the Netherlands to perform a smaller scale annexation. Most of the annexed territory was returned to Germany on 1 August 1963 after Germany paid the Netherlands 280 million German marks. 
The post-war years were a time of hardship, shortages and natural disaster. This was followed by large-scale public works programmes, economic recovery, European integration and the gradual introduction of a welfare state. 
Post-war politics saw shifting coalition governments. The 1946 Parliamentary elections saw the Catholic People's Party (KVP) emerge as the largest party, just ahead of the socialist Labour party (PvdA). Louis J. M. Beel formed a new coalition cabinet. The United States began providing economic assistance as part of the Marshall Plan in 1948 that injected valuable funds into the economy, fostered modernisation of business, and encouraged economic cooperation. 
The 1948 elections led to a new coalition led by Labor's Willem Drees. He led four successive cabinets Drees I, Drees II, Drees III and Drees IV until 1958. His tenure in office saw four major political developments: the traumas of decolonisation, economic reconstruction, the establishment of the Dutch welfare state, and international integration and co-operation, including the formation of Benelux, the OEEC, NATO, the ECSC, and the EEC. 
Wages were kept low and the recovery of consumption to pre-war levels was delayed to permit rapid rebuilding of the infrastructure. In the years after the war, unemployment fell and the economy grew at an astonishing pace, despite the high birth rate. The shattered infrastructure and destroyed cities were rebuilt. A key contribution to the recovery in the post-war Netherlands came from the Marshall Plan, which provided the country with funds, goods, raw materials and produce. 
The last major flood in the Netherlands took place in early-February 1953, when a huge storm caused the collapse of several dikes in the southwest of the Netherlands. More than 1,800 people drowned in the ensuing inundation. 
The Dutch government subsequently decided on a large-scale programme of public works (the "Delta Works") to protect the country against future floods. The project took more than thirty years to complete. The Oosterscheldedam, an advanced sea storm barrier, became operational in 1986. The national Delta programme continues to manage these works for the government under an independent Commissioner, with the aim of making the Netherlands climate-proof and water-resilient by 2050.  
The Indos of Indonesian descent (now numbering around 680,000) is the largest ethnic minority group in the Netherlands. They are integrated into Dutch society, but they have also retained many aspects of their culture and have added a distinct Indonesian flavour to the Netherlands. 
Although it was originally feared that the loss of the Dutch East Indies would contribute to an economic decline, the Dutch economy experienced exceptional growth (partly because a disproportionate amount of Marshall Plan aid was received) in the 1950s and 1960s. In fact, the demand for labour was so strong that immigration was actively encouraged, first from Italy and Spain then later on, in larger numbers, from Turkey and Morocco. 
Suriname became independent on 25 November 1975. The Dutch government supported independence because it wanted to stem the flow of immigrants from Suriname and also to end its colonial status. However, about one-third of the entire population of Suriname, fearing political unrest and economic decline, relocated to the Netherlands, creating a Surinamese community in the Netherlands that is now roughly as large as the population of Suriname itself. 
After 1982, there was a retrenchment of the welfare system, especially regarding old-age pensions, unemployment benefits, and disability pensions/early retirement benefits. 
By 2000, the population had increased to 15,900,000 people, making the Netherlands one of the most densely-populated countries in the world. Urban development has led to the development of a conurbation called the Randstad (Dutch: Randstad), which includes the four largest cities (Amsterdam, Rotterdam, The Hague and Utrecht), and the surrounding areas. With a population of 7,100,000; it is one of the largest conurbations in Europe. 
On 26 December 2004 during the Christmas holiday and Boxing Day celebration, several Dutch people in Thailand and the other part across of South and Southeast Asia were among thousands of people killed by the magnitude 9.0 earthquake and tsunami off Indonesian island's west coast of Sumatra, which suffered from the significant loss of Dutch lives. A memorial service held at Basilica of St. Nicholas Cathedral in Amsterdam in January 2005 was held on behalf of the Queen of the Netherlands. 
This small nation has successfully developed into one of the most open, dynamic and prosperous countries in the world. It had the tenth-highest per capita income in the world in 2011. It has an open, market-based mixed economy, ranking thirteenth out of 157 countries according to the Index of Economic Freedom. In May 2011, the OECD ranked the Netherlands as the "happiest" country in the world. 
On Koningsdag (King's Day), 30 April 2013, Prince Willem Alexander appointed as the King, having ascended the throne following his mother's abdication, Queen Beatrix. At the time of her abdication at age 75, Beatrix was the oldest reigning monarch in the country's history. 
On 17 July 2014, 193 Dutch people are among 300 people on aboard killed in the Malaysia Airlines Flight MH17 plane shot down by the air-surface missile in Eastern Ukraine near Russian border. A referendum on the approval of the Association Agreement between the European Union and Ukraine was held in The Hague on 6 April 2016. 
VVD Prime Minister Mark Rutte won the 2017 general election and formed a third government and was in first few months challenged after the People's Party for Freedom and Democracy voted since 2006. 
In March 2021, centre-right VVD of Prime Minister Mark Rutte was the winner of the elections, securing 35 out of 150 seats. The second biggest party was the centre-left D66 with 24 seats. Geert Wilders' far-right party lost its support. Prime Minister Mark Rutte, in power since 2010, formed his fourth coalition government. 
Teen Beach Movie is a Disney Channel Original Movie that premiered on July 19, 2013, on Disney Channel, starring Ross Lynch and Maia Mitchell. Directed by Jeffrey Hornaday, Teen Beach Movie was filmed in Puerto Rico. It was the only Disney Channel Original Movie to premiere in 2013. 
Lela and Tanner express their love for Brady and Mack, who subtly suggest to them that there may be someone else they are really meant to be with. That night Mack joins Lela and the other biker girls for a sleepover, while Brady hangs out with Tanner and the surfer boys at Big Momma's. While talking about love, their modern relationship views conflict with the 1960s views. Mack and Brady do not make any progress with Lela and Tanner. The next night, Lela tells Mack that she would like to surf. 
Mack and Brady realize that they are morphing into the film when Mack falls into water and her hair does not get wet. They then begin singing and are unable to stop. After the song Mack and Brady are captured by Les Camembert and Dr. Fusion and taken to the villains' lighthouse lair. 
Lela and Tanner fall in love with each other and soon realize that their friends have been kidnapped. They convince the bikers and surfers to team up and save Mack and Brady. Meanwhile, Mack admits that she is glad that she ended up in the film and does not have to attend private school. When Mack says she thinks Lela is braver than her, Brady denies that, saying that Mack is the bravest girl he knows. 
The surfers and bikers free Mack and Brady, and destroy the villains' machine. The film's plot returns to normal, and Mack and Brady realize they are able to return home. After saying goodbye to everyone, Mack and Brady get on the surfboard and ride a wave, which sends them back to the real world, where no time has passed since they left. The 40-foot wave is still approaching. 
Mack finally surfs the giant wave successfully. Mack's aunt is upset about her delaying their flight but accepts her decision to spend the rest of the year with Brady. Mack and Brady celebrate by singing a song on the beach. 
In a post-credits scene, Lela, Tanner, Butchy, Seacat, Cheechee and Giggles wash up into the real world. A modern-day surfer thinks they are lost and allows them to use his cell phone, which they marvel at as they attempt to use it. 
Teen Beach Movie was the only Disney Channel Original Movie that was released in 2013.[citation needed] 
Before the opening credits, the premiere of the film contained a memorial to beach party film star Annette Funicello (who died on April 8, 2013), which read, "In memory of Disney Legend Annette Funicello, the world's most beloved beach movie star."[citation needed] 
The premiere in the United Kingdom had 597,000 viewers. The United States premiere just hours later received 8.4 million viewers during its first airing and 13.5 million viewers in L+7, becoming the second-highest rated Disney Channel Original Movie. The Dance Along version on July 27, 2013, garnered 3.7 million viewers. In Canada, the movie delivered 818,000 viewers. The Australian premiere had 113,000 viewers. 
The film originally premiered on July 19, 2013, in the United States, Canada, the UK, and Ireland on Disney Channel. It premiered on August 4, 2013, in Southeast Asia and on August 9, 2013, in Australia and New Zealand, both on Disney Channel. 
The film was released on DVD on July 30, 2013, in North America, on August 19, 2013, in the UK and Ireland, and on August 21, 2013, in Australia and New Zealand.[citation needed] 
Teen Beach Movie was released on July 15, 2013, by Walt Disney Records. The album was the fourth best-selling soundtrack of 2013 in the United States with 407,000 copies sold for the year. The album peaked at number three on the Billboard 200 chart. As of July 2015, it has sold 462,000 copies in the United States. 
Giovanna Galletti (27 June 1916 - 21 April 1992) was an Italian actress. She appeared in more than forty films from 1938 to 1986. 
Galletti began her career on stage at a young age, in the early 1930s, and later attended the Centro Sperimentale di Cinematografia in Rome. In the late 1930s, she started appearing in films, mostly in supporting roles, and in 1945, she appeared in Roberto Rossellini's Rome, Open City portraying the treacherous Ingrid, which is her best known role. 
After the war, she focused her activities on theatre, notably working intensively at the Piccolo Teatro of Milan under the direction of Giorgio Strehler and in the stage companies led by Luigi Cimara, Annibale Ninchi, Laura Adani, and Renzo Ricci. Her later film roles mainly consisted of villains and wicked women. She was also active on radio and television. 
Vladimir Eminger (born 3 April 1992) is a Czech professional ice hockey defenceman. He is currently playing with HC Sparta Praha of the Czech Extraliga. 
This biographical article relating to a Czech ice hockey defenceman is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hannah Little (born 21 July 2001) is an Irish cricketer who plays for Scorchers and Ireland. In August 2019, she was named in the Irish Women's Twenty20 International (WT20I) squad for the 2019 Netherlands Women's Quadrangular Series. She made her WT20I debut for Ireland, against the Netherlands, on 8 August 2019. In July 2020, she was awarded a non-retainer contract by Cricket Ireland for the following year. 
This biographical article related to Irish cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bart Deurloo (born February 23, 1991) is a Dutch male artistic gymnast and a member of the national team. He participated in four editions of the World Championships (2009, 2013, 2015), and 2017 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships, where he won the bronze on high bar in Montreal. and qualified for the 2016 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Dutch artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
There are controversies over whether or not self-enhancement is beneficial to the individual, and over whether self-enhancement is culturally universal or specific to Western individualism. 
Self-enhancement can occur in many different situations and under many different guises. The general motive of self-enhancement can have many differing underlying explanations, each of which becomes more or less dominant depending on the situation. 
The explanations of the self-enhancement motive can occur in different combinations. Self-enhancement can occur as an underlying motive or personality trait without occurring as an observed effect. 
Self-enhancement can occur in private or in public. Public self-enhancement is obvious positive self-presentation, whereas private self enhancement is unnoticeable except to the individual. The presence of other people i.e. in public self-enhancement, can either augment or inhibit self-enhancement. Whilst self-enhancement may not always take place in public it is nevertheless still influenced by the social world, for example via social comparisons. 
Potential areas of self-enhancement differ in terms how important, or central, they are to a person. Self-enhancement tends to occur more in the domains that are the most important to a person, and less in more peripheral, less important domains. 
Self-enhancement can occur either candidly or tactically. Candid self-enhancement serves the purpose of immediate gratification whereas tactical self-enhancement can result in potentially larger benefits from delayed gratification. 
Tactical self-enhancement is often preferred over candid self-enhancement as overt self-enhancement is socially displeasing for those around it. Narcissism is an exemplification of extreme candid self-enhancement. 
Self-enhancement does not just occur at random. Its incidence is often highly systematic and can occur in any number of ways in order to achieve its goal of inflating perceptions of the self. Importantly, we are typically unaware that we are self-enhancing. Awareness of self-enhancing processes would highlight the facade we are trying to create, revealing that the self we perceive is in fact an enhanced version of our actual self. 
Explanations for moral transgressions follow similar self-serving patterns, as do explanations for group behaviour. The ultimate attribution error is the tendency to regard negative acts by one's out-group and positive acts by one's in-group as essential to their nature i.e. attributable to their internal disposition and not a product of external factors. This may reflect the operation of the self-serving bias refracted through social identification. 
People sometimes self-enhance by selectively remembering their strengths rather than weaknesses. This pattern of selective forgetting has been described as mnemic neglect. Mnemic neglect may reflect biases in the processing of information at either encoding, retrieval or retention. 
Concordant with selective acceptance and refutation is the observation that people hold a more critical attitude towards blame placed upon them, but a more lenient attitude to praise that they receive. People will strongly contest uncongenial information but readily accept at without question congenial information 
Self-esteem moderates the beneficial, evaluative consequences of comparisons to both inferior and superior others. People with higher self-esteem are more optimistic about both evading the failures and misfortunes of their inferiors and about securing the successes and good fortunes of their superiors. 
An upwards social comparison involves comparing oneself to an individual perceived to be superior to or better than oneself. Upwards social comparison towards someone felt to be similar to oneself can induce self-enhancement through assimilation of the self and other's characteristics, however this only occurs when: 
Where assimilation does not occur as a result of a social comparison, contrast can instead occur which can lead to upwards social comparisons providing inspiration. 
Even though upwards social comparisons are the most common social comparisons, people do sometimes make downwards social comparisons. Downwards social comparisons involve comparing oneself to an individual perceived to be inferior to or less skilled than the self. Downwards social comparisons serve as a form of ego-defence whereby the ego is inflated due to the sense of superiority gained from such downwards social comparisons. 
Lateral social comparisons, comparisons against those perceived as equal to the self, can also be self-enhancing. Comparisons with members of one's in-group can lead be protective against low self-esteem, especially when the in-group are disadvantaged. 
Self-enhancement waxes and wanes as a function of one's ability level in the context of interpersonal relationships, and this, in turn influences interpersonal attitudes and behaviours. Three factors influence the self-evaluations people make: 
The concepts that people use to understand themselves and their social world are relatively vague. Consequently, when making social comparisons or estimations people can easily and subtly shift their construal of the meaning of those concepts in order to self-enhance. Strategic construals typically increase following negative feedback. Numerous examples of strategic construals exist, a small selection include: 
Strategic construals also influence the degree to which categories are believed to characterise other people. There is a general tendency to assume that others share one's own characteristics. Nevertheless, people reliably overestimate the prevalence of their shortcomings e.g. show enhanced false consensus effect, and underestimate the prevalence of their strengths e.g. show a contrary false uniqueness effect. People perceive their flaws as relatively commonplace but their skills as unique. 
Behavioural self-handicapping is the act of erecting obstacles in the path of task success in order to reduce the evaluative implications that can be drawn from task performance. This permits self-enhancement to occur in two ways: 
Ultimately, those who readily prepare themselves for the possibility of poor task performance beforehand use the strategy of discounting less. 
The effect of self-enhancement strategies is shown in the tendency of people to see themselves as having more positive qualities and a more positive future outlook than others. 
People show self-enhancement in the form of the above-average effect in many different ways. It is typical for people to profess to be above-average at a task yielding positive or desirable outcomes, and below average at a task yielding negative or undesirable outcomes. 
Some of the wide variety of documented examples of the above-average effect include observations that: 
People typically believe that their life will hold a greater number of positive experiences and fewer negative experiences than the lives of similar others. They have the same unrealistic optimism, but to a lesser degree, for others who are closely linked, such as romantic partners and close personal friends. 
Which definition is better at measuring self-enhancement has been disputed, as rating oneself more positively than one rates others is not seen as self-enhancement by some researchers. 
In some studies, self-enhancement has been shown to have strong positive links with good mental health and in others with bad mental health. Self-enhancing can also have social costs. Whilst promoting resilience amongst survivors of the September 11th terrorist attacks, those who self-enhanced were rated as having decreased social adaptation and honesty by friends and family. 
When plausibility reduces the impact of self-enhancement, undesirable evidence often has to be accepted, albeit reluctantly. This typically occurs when all possible interpretations of the evidence in question have been made. The reason for this unwilling acceptance is to maintain effective social functioning, where unqualified self-aggrandizement would otherwise prevent it. People will continue to self-enhance so long as they think they can get away with it. 
Both positive and negative moods can reduce the presence of the self-enhancement motive. The effects of mood on self-enhancement can be explained by a negative mood making the use self-enhancing tactics harder, and a positive mood making their use less necessary in the first place. 
The onset of a positive mood can make people more receptive to negative diagnostic feedback. Past successes are reviewed with expectation of receiving such positive feedback, presumably to buffer their mood. 
The presence of the motive to self-enhance is dependent on many social situations, and the relationships shared with the people in them. Many different materialisations of self-enhancement can occur depending on such social contexts: 
Psychological functioning is moderated by the influence of culture. There is much evidence to support a culture-specific view of self-enhancement. 
Self-enhancement appears to be a phenomenon largely limited to Western cultures, where social ties are looser than in the East. This is concordant with empirical evidence highlighting relationship closeness as a constraint on self-enhancement. The self-improvement motive, as an aspiration towards a possible self may also moderate a variety of psychological processes in both independent and interdependent cultures. 
There are nevertheless signs that self-enhancement is not completely absent in interdependent cultures. Chinese schoolchildren rate themselves highly on the dimension of competence, and Taiwanese employees rate themselves more favourably than their employers do, both of which show self-enhancing tendencies in Eastern cultures. 
One possible explanation for the observed differences in self-enhancement between cultures is that they may occur through differences in how candidly of tactically the motive to self-enhance is acted upon, and not due to variations in the strength of motive. Alternatively, self-enhancement may be represented only in terms of the characteristics that are deemed important by individuals as they strive to fulfil their culturally prescribed roles. 
It is an exaggeration to say that self-enhancement is the dominant self-evaluation motive. Many controversies exist regarding the distinction between the self-evaluation motives, and there are situations in which motives asides from self-enhancement assume priority. 
Where the truth about oneself worsens or varies it gradually becomes less feasible to satisfy all motives simultaneously. 
The United Jihad Factions Council is a confederation of Iraqi Sunni insurgent groups, including the Islamic Army and Hamas of Iraq, that now cooperate with the U.S. Army and the Iraqi Army. 
Anderson, John Ward (20 June 2007). "Dozens of Insurgents Killed in Iraq Offensive"; Washington Post. Retrieved 19 August 2007. 
After studying Law at the University of Hawaii, he served as legal director for the ACLU, worked with the Legal Aid Society of Hawaii and the Life Foundation, and was a member of the state's Ethics Committee. As a member of the "Governor's Committee on HIV/AIDS," he played a central role in formulating policy that would at once protect the public from unsafe exposure and maintain the confidence of carriers. 
Sedenhorstia is an extinct genus of prehistoric bony fish that lived from the Cenomanian to Campanian. 
Other Thai movies with the same title but not based on the classical poem were released in 2003 and 2012. 
Garuda came down from his celestial residence to gamble with an ancient king in a dice game. Garuda saw the beautiful Ka Kee, the king's wife, and kidnapped her. The king's musician helped her to escape by also seducing her. The king took offence at Ka Kee's unfaithfulness, for she had slept with three men. He punished her by banishing her to a raft that floated to the middle of the ocean, sure that she would not survive her ordeal. 